EPISTLE PREFATORY TO MY LADY.
DEAR LADY,
Were these days of fiction, rather than of fact, and
could the popular sense be persuaded to regard that
period of exciting circumstance in past history, called
the era of romance, in any other light than that of a
pleasant dream about to be forgotten, your charms
might once again bring into exercise, not merely the
lay of the minstrel, but the valour of the knight.
Instead
of the goosequill, spear and sword might, with
sufficient reason, be lifted in your service. Alas!
however
,
for the timeit brings forth no such offering. As
an especial rebuke to such glorious errantries as made
the middle ages the prime period of romantic
adventure
;
state prisons and penitentiaries frown upon us
from every quarterinstead of the warlike and stirring
blasts of the bugle, calling the watchful warder to the
turret, and arousing the sleeping porter to the approach
of the visiter, the tintinnabulary house-bell presents
itself conveniently at the portals, and the liveried
servitor
opens the door at the first friendly summons.
Romance
knows none of these comforts, and well may
adventure sigh after a period which left something for
achievement to do, in scaling walls and mounting
windows
.
Had we, my lady, been born in such a period,
doubt not that I should have done something worthy to
be named along with the daring doings of the time.
Doubt not that lance had been lifted, and bugle wound,
and battle done gallantly, in your behalf and for your
love. As the times are, however, this may not be the
case; and all that chivalry may now proffer to his
ladylove
,
is some little tribute of romance like this,its
relic and remembrancecomprised in a tiny volume,
quite unworthy of your genius, but all that I can yield
from mine. Pardon me, then, dear lady, that these
pagesmany of which have been already uttered in
your earshave received a name, which, though not
fairly identified with yourself or yours, must nevertheless,
and necessarily, refer to you for that countenance and
favour, which is more than popular applause to me.
May they not prove altogether unworthy your
acceptance
,
nor seem to be altogether ungracious in your
sight.
A DREAM OF THE EARTH.
I had a dream, which was not all a dream.
My mood is somewhat Germanthat is to say, it
inclines prodigiously to
diablerie;
and with a faculty,
which, if not dangerous, is at least troublesome, at
times, it conjures spirits from the vasty deeps of my
imagination, whenever I please to call them up. I can
have an assortment of them at, and for, my pleasure;
and though not over pleasant as companions, nor over
obedient as servants, I find them sufficiently docile for
all temporary purposes. I have my sprightly elves,
dancing for me of a summer nightmy fairies of the
evening on the pleasant hill side, and sometimes when
the bell tolls at midnight, I turn suddenly in my
elbow-chair
to behold a very pleasant looking sort of
Mephistopheles
,
peeping over my left shoulder. Of course, I
wish not to be understood to say that I behold these
images with a literal and
bona-fide
vision. God forbid.
I only mean to give an idea of those things that
sometimes
come to the half-shut eye, at that peculiar
moment
,
which is sometimes permitted to most men, when,
without losing any of our individual and personal identity,
we have a sort of dim consciousness of another state of
existence, and of having other company than that to
which we are usually accustomed. This condition of
mental excitation, I am not unwilling to admit, may be
exaggerated by a coal firea bottle of London porter,
and the silencethe whispering silenceof the midnight
hour, in your old library in the northeast corner.
There is something delightful to me in a mood of
this description. I may safely say, that, bating some
solitary hours, my greatest pleasures have come to me
at such a period, and while under such an influence.
I know not how it is with other men. They answer
for themselves. I would not pretend for a moment that
my habits, frenzies, or whatsoever they merit to be
called, shall go for a moment in illustration of theirs.
But with me, what I say, I not only religiously and
seriously
say, but I most seriously and religiously believe.
To me that state of dreamy existence, which is aptly
and beautifully designated by the poet, that of the
half-shut eye, is full of delights and delightful images.
I have often thought it the kind of mental intoxication
for which men frequently resort to opium, and the
influence
of which may be best ascertained in the torpid
felicity which the Turks, as a nation, exhibit, and which
they have already frequently acknowledged. The
Confessions
of an Opium Eater will better describe what I
mean and what I would say; and, as the book is not
only an instructive, but a truly pleasant one, I
recommend
it to the reader to supply any deficiencies at this
stage of my narrative.
My arm-chair is, of itself, highly inspiriting. It, no
doubt, contributes wonderfully to that state of general
preparedness which adds to the force of any invocation.
It is of the true oriental make. The reader will not
suppose me luxurious when I describe it. It is of
mahogany
of
a most solid structure. The legs are
capacious
,
and like the seat, calculated for the contingency
of any burden. Falstaff would not have filled, though
he might have fitted it. A soft velvet flowered cushion
of purple, inclines greatly to the sense of repose, which
the whole fabric is calculated to instil into him who
makes use of it. The arms are rendered inviting by
the use of a like material, and the back receives any
impression. Five degrees of the circle thrown under
the feet, give, with the slightest effort, an undulatory
motion to the whole, which contributes, like an
orthodox
sermon, or the opium already referred to, to a
slumberous quietude, that, of a long summer afternoon,
is wonderfully pleasant and becoming.
As evening wears, propped up in this not at home,
I laugh at the weather without, eschew visiters within,
place my feet on the fender, and survey the panorama
of creation through the crackling and half-burnt
embers
of an excellent sea-coal fire. Numberless are the
imagesvarious the pictureswide the prospects
glorious
the viewsand delightful the companions, that rise
to my view in that survey. I never use the poker;it is
a horriblean ungraceful engineand destroys many a
pleasant illusion. Coal after coal sinks from sight
others take their places, forming newer combinations;
and, as in a kaleidoscope, presenting infinite varieties
of well-adjointed and corresponding objects and
associations
.
If I behold in one huge mass of the black
pile just smitten by the flame, a gloomy and turreted
castle, manned with men in armour and ready for the
fightin another I perceive beneath its walls a hostile
and invading arry getting ready for the onset. The
occasional hiss of the escaping air answers all the
purposes of a trumpet; and as the masses respectively
flame and fall, I behold the overthrow of this or that
armamentthe invading or invaded. This, every body
will admit, is a very pleasant mode of passing away
those hours, which, with most men go unemployed; but
this is not all. As I have already said, the world of
spirits contributes also to my accommodation; and at
such a period, fancy becomes a recruiting officer, and
my senses are all severally supplied with what they
respectively require. Images from the natural and
spiritual world alike await my bidding; and without
describing a circle, filling it with skulls and scorpions,
making a contract with my blood in a manner most
horribly German, and invoking his arch majesty, the
devil, I command the creatures of the four elements,
and they come when, and sometimes before, I call for
them. The subtle Zephyr, the gloomy Gnome, the
skipping Hamadryad, the old Cyclops, the dewy and
plaintive Naiad, all throng about me, and manifold are
the adventures which I glean from their several recitals.
They make me the depository of their secrets and
mysteries; but, as they have no doubt told the same
secrets to thousands besides, I shall perhaps do them
but little injury, and betray a confidence without value,
as it is so much divided, by occasionally whispering to
others what they sometimes whisper to me. As I have
made no contracts with the creatures, I am not much
concerned about offending them, and if they play me
no pranks in mid-summer, by moonlight, I shall not
fear other inconveniences at their hands.
I remember a conversation, which, while under a
mood and in a situation like that described, I once
2*
had with our great originalunder the Deitythe
Earth. 'Twas on a summer evening, in my chair,
as aforesaiddinner being over, and the bottle under,
that had once been on, the tablethat I was favoured
with the presence of this terrestrial personage. Of
his make, person, feature, and so forth, I say nothing.
Let him speak for himself. So, taking a seat
comfortably
in the corner opposite, with a grave countenance
and paternally solemn accent, in reply to some of my
obliquitous enquiries, he went on as follows. If the
reader thinks it likely he will find the old one as
tedious as I did, he will be wise and go no farther.
You are right, said he, in coming to me for
information
on the subject of my history. Nobody so
well as one's self can tell one's story; so that now,
having fairly entrusted yourself to me, you will be so
good as to forget every thing which you have
previously
heard on this matter, and believe only that
which I shall tell you. I know you will think me
rather vain and self-complacent when I say this. I
know that among the miserable mass which make up
your species, it is quite a common belief that you are
au fait
on all topics, and that it is quite common for
each of you to know more of his neighbour's business
than he can possibly know of it himself. Still, I look
upon you as grievously in the dark on all that concerns
me. Of me and mine you know nothing; it will
depend
upon the patience and propriety which you may
now exhibit, whether I make you any wiser. The
good opinion which you generally entertain of your
own capacities has, in most cases, shot infinitely
beyond
your compass; and you are neither able to teach
yourselves nor others on some points, on which it is,
nevertheless, necessary you should be taught. All
your accounts, thereforethose in particular which
relate to meare mere absurdities, wild and
erroneous
.
Disposed to speculate and analyse, from the
atom of the immortal principle within him, man is yet,
however, but too little regulated in his conclusions by
the foresight and knowledge which should belong to
and describe it, to benefit himself very greatly by its
possession. He ate too little of the apple to be wise,
too much of it to be happy: enough for presumption,
too little for that fine taste and perception which,
having brought wisdom, teaches humility.
You will yourself have perceived, if I have not
greatly mistaken your character, that the process of
life in those portions of my body which have come
more immediately under your observation, is not
dissimilar
to the same process, as it is carried on in your
own animal condition. We are not seriously unlike
in all
vital
matters, and though you may think it in no
wise complimentary on my part to say so, our wants
and necessities, our qualities and our feelings, do not
perceptibly differ. We depend for life, and health,
and vigour, upon the same influences. We need alike
the same generous sunshine, the same refreshing
showers, the same grateful dews, the same cold and
heat, and we alike live and laugh under a common
Providence. Our moral resemblances are also striking.
Have we not our revolutions, our ups and downs? and
have we not both of us permitted our several
poles
to
be flattened? There is, certainly, but little difference
between us; and whether we look at the one state or
the other, we must feel assured that the many varieties
of fortune and condition which make up our existence,
tend greatly to its comfort and the excellent working
of the contrivance. Nor is our healthful state the
only object in this variety. The sense of enjoyment,
nearly the same with both of us, where our ignorance
and discontent do not blind us wholly to its
perception
,
appears in this to have been most graciously
consulted. The two grand seasons of the year, from
which the lesser and more minute and uncertain
divisions
arise, winter and summer, are made admirably
to relieve the duties and neutralise the influences of
one another. As the warmth of summer departs, the
cool, sharp, and bracing winds of October strengthen
and invigorate; and when winter, in turn, grows
troublesome
and fretful, its snows are agreeably broken in
upon and dissipated by its noisy departure in March;
while April and May, genially, by the balmy blossoms
which they bring, and the fresh zephyrs and showers
which attend on them, atone, like the gentle children
of an ungentle sire, for the severities of their rugged
predecessor, and cheer the languid spirits of man and
of myself. Is there not, in this, strong sympathy
between us? Do we not even clothe ourselves, with
a reference to feelings shared in common, under the
prevailing influences of these changing seasons? Your
winter woollens are not more thick and warm than
the snows which in the same seasons I wrap about me;
and do I not, in the pleasant spring-time, dress myself
in the very same variety of leafy flowers, which
garland
the beautiful girl whom I beheld you emb
Here I put my hand upon the old fellow's mouth.
What a tell-tale! He promised to say nothing further
about that, and I suffered him to proceed.
Still further, said he, and the analogy here is
of the most striking description. The decay of the
plants, the flowers, leaves, and trees, stores my bosom
with a rich, renewed, and second principle of life; as
with you the death of the animal man gives freedom
and full exercise to the hitherto confined principle of
immortality, which makes all that is worthy or valuable
in his original formation.
To say that I am supported in a pure and healthy
habit by the employment of the same or similar means
with yourself, would be, perhaps, only to remind you
of some among your early studies. Your researches,
allowing you to have been an industrious student, may
have taught you that, as in your own system, I must
become impure and diseased were there not a free and
general circulation of blood through my system. To
know that the blood lives, there is no necessity to
refer to Dr. Charles Bell, who has gone to considerable
pains to establish the fact; while Dr. John Bell, with
desperate silliness, labours to prove a doctrine directly
the reverse. These are discordant
bells
, and you will
give no heed to them. The blood has life, and having
it, I live. I have veins and arteries, the streams of
which intersect each other, and perpetually supply my
overgrown frame with the same animating principle,
and strengthen and invigorate me in much the same
manner as, in your smaller and microscopic formation
and structure, the attenuated ducts and channels
provide
your life with the sustaining fluids. To your eye,
it is true, the material possesses not precisely the
same external appearance; but the difference is of
indifferent note, when we know that the effect of both
is the same; that, deprived of the one, you perish;
and, like myself, bereft of the other, are resolved to
dust, and dispersed in the fine and subtile element.
This difference between your blood and mine is,
therefore, purely nominal, and beneath the
consideration
of a sober intellect. That I am not similarly
constructed with yourself, mere bodily outline
considered
,
is perhaps true; though you, perhaps, are but
little calculated, from your native capacities, to
determine
on this particular. It is not pretended that we
resemble each other in shape, nor would it have been
a wise arrangement to have had us do so. How should
I have been enabled to carry my huge body with your
legs? I might, it is true, have had a much better
standing; but, like most people cursed with being
lifted out of their proper element, I certainly should
have lost more in ease and repose than I had acquired
in pride of place and elevated station. As it is, my
structure is by no means deficient in grace and
symmetrical
arrangement. Beneath your eyes I am but a
heavy and elaborate massa great beastwithout any
of those nicer adaptation of parts to that fineness of
proportion, which are your modelling standards, and
to which you are in the habit of cutting, carving, and
squaring every thingvirtue, truth, religion, faith,
and probity, being all regulated, as I am informed, by
a pert, froward, selfish, calculating, conceited, and
most wofully ignorant and ill-advised creature, called
Fashion. If I have a protuberance or depression, you
term it mountain or valley, with a
sang froid
, not less
ungracious than peculiar, without for a moment
reflecting
that you speak of a living, moving, and feeling
creation. Should I not have life, who bring it forth?
Is not the hidden spring of all vitality in me? Do
not my waters (to employ your own phraseology, that
I may be the better understood) leap within me; my
hills tremble; my flowers and plants and trees bud,
blossom, bear, and prove their claim to every
peculiarity
in your life, by perishing at last? Do they
spring at your command, and do I not bring them
forth? In what, then, so far as vitality is concerned,
will we be found to differ? In our shape, you will
say; but are you able to determine upon the
proportions
of that which you cannot see?
Could you, in a glance, and but for a moment,
survey
my gigantic frame to its utmost extremities
could I be extended before your vision as a perfect
whole, laid out by an omniscient and particular eye
could you behold and determine upon my vast and
various undulationsmy hills swelling into grace
my vales, the delicate retreatings of a frame, each part
accommodated to its fellow, and chiselled into gentle
featuringsall parts beneath your glance, and the
symmetry of the whole beheld as you need never
expect
to behold itthen would you at once discover
and readily admit, that mere bulk is not alone the
characteristic of my person, and that I am in no wise
deficient in those features of evenness and grace, and
that delicacy of proportion, which your miserable
vanity will seldom permit you to recognise in the
make of any but your own species. I have my
deformities
,
it is true, for which I shall account hereafter;
but it will be quite time enough, when you have
removed your own `warts and tumours,' to trouble
yourself about mine.
Of my birth, like all other children, I know little
or nothing. I believefurther to establish and
confirm
the analogy between usthat, before reaching
my present elaborated, though even now incomplete
and still increasing bulk, I passed through several
stages of being and condition. There was an ordeal
term of infancy and imbecilityof childhood, youth,
age, with all their faculties of wind and vapour, as
known to yourself, through which I had to passpain,
and labour, and sweat, not forgottenbefore reaching
my present advanced, though still immature condition.
I believe, like yourself, I was called up in distinct
atoms from the boundlessness of space, the darkness
and the confusion of chaosthat I gathered, and
continue
to gather newer additions from the same source,
momentarilynot as your philosophy presumes to
suppose, from the natural determination to the centre,
but from the operation and influence of the mighty
willthe destinythe great spirit which had gone
forth, the propelling energies of whose cloudy wings
drove them onwards to the vast work of my creation.
Created thus, I swung blackly and heavily in the
eternal
sphereblind, confused, wandering and imbecile;
until that period of time, when, all things having been
prepared, the immortal Spirit covered me with his
wings, and life, animation, feeling, was the
consequence
;
and I leaped, with a blind and impulsive
determination, into the place which I now occupy.
Still all was darkness, and vacancy, and solitude, about
mein proportion to what I knew and felt, was my
desire to know and feel yet more; and I writhed in
ungovernable anguish for that light which I knew not
as yet how to have or comprehend. Like angels and
men, I too struggled against the mandate that made
and fixed me in the sphere I occupied. I, too,
rebelled
with a stiff-necked determination, arising from
my ignorance of the power I dared to defy. I leaped,
and struggled, and strove, but was bound down at last
to my office.
I was not, however, long condemned to remain
rolling in my huge sphere without companionship.
The heavy and solid darkness that weighed upon and
pressed me down with a presence, felt but unseen,
gradually began to dissipate. Sounds came swelling
mysteriously and faintly in the distance. Music, the
most ravishing and exquisite, came breathing and
wrapping itself about me. I became fixedchained
into stillness: a spell was upon mea languid delight
every tumult was hushedevery rebellious
discontent
quieted, and every thing forgotten in that first
song of the spheres, as they hailed and ushered in the
new-born light. How can you hope to understand,
or I detail, the character, or give you any idea of that
choice harmony which mingled with and made up the
sublime mysteries attending upon the creation of the
dependent elements, now first starting into life and
sound? How gradually and sweetly arose that melody
swelling on its nearer approach into a mighty and
ear-piercing bursta diapason of heavenly and myriad
voices; then, falling into a fine depression of faint
murmurings, giving forth sounds, such as might be
3
supposed to arise when immortal hands were wheeling
the throne of the Eternal over the golden floors of
heaven. In a moment every thing was hushed into a
deep silencethe very breathings of the infant Time
were unheard. But other soundsother melodies
succeededmusical and melodious, and yet not music.
You have heard such strainsfine, spiritual, and
commanding
in
the winds by nighton the wild waters
in the forests. The tempest and the calmday
and nighteven I, with my plants, and flowers, and
streamshave all conveyed them to your several
senses. It was the Spirititself a voice and a music
that bespoke the presence of the awful
I am
and
we trembled and shrunk into nothing and quietude
before it. It hadnot to compare it with any thing
of or in human lifejust such an effect upon me, as a
deep-toned bell would have upon you in the stillness
and solitude of the desert. It was thunder, and
majesty
,
and powerbut how sweet, how finely
attenuated
.
A pause, and then arose once again the delicious
melodies which had preceded it; and, in obedience to
the spell, the arches of heaven were unfolded, and
huge volumes of light, that mysterious agent of the
Deity, poured forth upon and around me. I grew dim
and blinded with excessive brightI luxuriatedI
leaped, and was maddened. Light was born, and for
the first time I beheld myselfI beheld the world of
which I was a portion. Vacancy was no longer the
occasion of my dread and doubt. I could now look
up, no longer crowded in upon and by the darkness,
and survey the unveiled heavensthe mysterious
sanctuary
,
glorious yet awful, thrown open, while the pure
streams of new-born light came rushing forth in solid
bodies upon each other. What a visionit flew to
my embraceI grasped, I hid it in all my recesses
it was mine, all mine, and I leaped and bounded with
a delirious transport! How grateful was its presence!
I surveyed myself as in a mirror, and grew in love
with myself and with every thing around me. Then
could I see glorious and innumerable agencies
directing
their flight upon their appointed officeswheeling
away, within the vestments of a golden light, and a
plumage borrowed from the land of Paradise, far upon
the verge of my horizonothers in immediate
attendance
upon the eternal thronefor
`They also serve, who only stand and wait'
all employed, all happy. Bright wings rushed
perpetually
over and around me, cleaving, with uncumbered
ease, the successive floods of transparent light, which
still continued to pour forth from on high; while
trooping bands, as they whirled in groups through the
mid-air, kept up a choral song of rejoicing, of worship
and of praise, to that supreme majesty from whom
came all their greatness and winning glory.
Voices were all about mevoices of power!
Images
of beautyfigures of light and glory descended upon
me, while, insensible as regards my own capacity of
motion, they performed a multitude of offices which I
could not comprehend. But all things were commanded
by a voice whose authority I felt and beheld. It was
about, above, around, and within me, at the same
moment
,
and at each utterance I thrilled and trembled in
every portion of my huge frame. Then rose a song of
gladness and of triumph; of thanksgiving, rejoicing,
and praise; so rich, so mellow, that, bound down, as it
were, in a charm, I lay wrapt, unconscious of all things
beside, till the melody had passed again into the azure
gates, from which it seemed to descend. The excess
of light and splendourthe glory, late almost
oppressive
,
was now mellowed down into softer hues and
more delicate featurings. The skies, no longer flaming
with gorgeous radiance, now became tinged only here
and there with the richer gleamsthrough which the
sweet cerulean flashed gently at frequent intervals; and
though the appearance of the world about me became
at this period more truly beautiful, I perceived, with
deep anxiety and fear, that my enjoyment was unstable,
and the rich floods of living light were evidently, though
gradually, departing. Not so rapidly, indeed, as when
it had bounded forth and enveloped me, but in a
procession
of slow and sweetly mournful bodies, seeming
to regret, as they re-entered their rich abodes, the fair
freedom to which they had lately fallen inheritors. I
struggled to grasp and to retain the still fleeting
deceptions
,
but in vain. Column after column gathered and
disappeared, till at length all had departed, leaving me
to the horrible vacancy of condition, almost enhanced
in misery by my knowledge of a sense of enjoyment,
rather productive of pain than pleasure, since it had
proved so fleeting and evanescent. I shuddered in
terror
,
when I recollected the chilling blackness which
had before enveloped me in its embrace. I grew
convulsed
I
was maddened by my excessive emotion.
Coldness and vacancy came rapidly over me, and I
trembled at my own wide, extensive, and unprotected
bulk. Unknown evils seemed to threaten me in the
coming time, the more terrible as they were unknown.
I dreaded the doubtful but fearful dangers, and
shuddered
and shrunk and writhed in a thousand
contortions
.
Then, on a sudden, I heard a rushing and
fearful
noise, as of two mighty hosts of wings and weapons
in battle. Roaring and foaming, it approached with
an increasing fury, to which I could liken nothing that
I had yet been conscious of. This confirmed my worst
apprehensionI knew not what to dread, and dreaded
every thing. Now bellowing, now clashing and
fretting
,
then moaning with a melancholy terror, as of evil
spirits in mortal agonies, I did not long remain in
doubt as to the character of my new danger. It was
not long before I felt my extremities covered completely
by an immense body of rushing watersmomentarily
mounting higher, and threatening, by increasing power
and violence, my very existence. I now, for the first
time, was taught to know my deadly enemy, the ocean.
In vain did I seek to rid myself of the assailantvain
were all my struggles and contortionsvainly did I
shrink from the deluging power. I was covered and
pressed down by the pitiless masses, that all the while
kept up their infernal ravings and plungings above me,
yelling throughout their gambols, with a savage triumph,
and mocking the efforts which I made to escape them.
Finding all exertion fruitless, I gave up my short dream
of delightful enjoyment, with a sort of resignation to
that fate, which I apprehended to be close at hand. I
felt myself almost enveloped by the wild and
interminable
waters; and though still a creature of perception,
I had now none of those hopes of a long and happy
3*
life which I had promised myself on commencing my
existence. I now discovered that there was no eternity
in pleasureno truth in hope; and that being, with
myself as well as man, was liable to fearful vicissitudes.
Yet why should I moralise? You are all sufficiently
ready in the inculcation of truthit might be better for
you, were all as ready to receive it.
Still, I survivedI did not then perishmy time
had not yet come. Many were the hourshow long
and weary did they seem to methat I lay in this
condition
.
At length, however, I began to feel a larger
relaxation in the burden upon me. The weight
appeared
to diminishmy joints were released, in great
part, from the power which had cramped and stiffened
them; and how inexpressible was my delight, when, by
these and other signs, I was assured that I was once
more about to regain my liberty. The departure of
my enemy was yet protracted. The waters rolled from
me gradually, and with little, if any, of that noise and
turbulence which had accompanied their first
appearance
.
Several hours had elapsed, ere they had left me
to the perception and enjoyment of the glorious day
that succeeded a night so sorrowful and dismal. But
they went at last, and again, to my remotest members,
I felt, as on the day before, the floods of refreshing light
and heat, rolling over me in their place. With a
mellowed
influence at first they gathered around me, till,
entirely descended from the gates of heaven, they
concentrated
themselves into a full orbed splendour, the
glow and glory of which I felt, but dared not looked
upon. What a life was that one day to me! My whole
frame was awakenedenkindled. I was all one
perception
every
member, every muscle and vein, leapt
with enjoyment; and flowers, and fruits, and trees, and
shrubs, generated by that first embrace with the vital
principle, sprung forth from my bosom, shielding me
from the consuming heat which had called them into
existence. How richly beautifulhow winning was
then my appearance! With what a grace, admitted
into the dances of the spheres, did I ascend the
whirling
axle, and become a member of that all-perfect
system
,
which, in its harmonious and unvarying
revolutions
,
at once indicates the nature, while it offers a true
homage to the handiworks, of God! All this day was
one of wonder and delirium. How did I spread
myself
forth beneath the heavens, to catch every gracious
smile and odour and breeze, that came therefrom;
while the blaze, that, like living waters, gushed from its
bosom, filled and enwreathed me with the richest
splendour
!
With delight I could now behold myself in my
remotest regions. I could see and luxuriate in the fine
though gigantic symmetry of my proportionsthe
graceful
undulation of muscle and matter herethe fine and
speaking elevation of feature there. Nor did I confine,
with undue vanity, my attention solely to my own
person
.
I looked long and delightedly to the many choice
images of wonderthe unique creations floating
gracefully
in gold and vermillion, and azure orbs, about,
around, and above me. Beautiful images descended
upon me; troops of spiritual forms leapt playfully into
the skies; pursuing each other with songs and sport,
and mingling together with a habit of joy, that savoured
of a frenzied and most unlimited delight. All things
were under a spella suna glorya high life of
beautiful images, and gentle and winning endearments.
But yet another change was at hand. The images
began to fade and depart. The forms of light and fairy
grew less frequent. The wings darted upwardthe
glow and the glory became mellowed into hues and
beauties, not less brilliant and captivating, but less
warm and brightand, as at length I beheld the
burning
globe descend and heard it hiss in the dark waters,
which, now, as if recovering a withheld spirit, began
again to roar and ramp and rise above my extremities;
and as my own body began to grow less and less each
moment in my sight, all my fears and apprehensions
returned
all
my emotions of rapture took their departure.
The night I had already spent was too well remembered,
and too sullenly endured, not to occasion many terrible
misgivings as to its return; and with a shuddering
horror
,
which neither the past pleasures of the day, nor
the hope, now strong within me, of its return, could
dissipate, I resigned myself to that destiny from which
I had no prospect of escape. But with what a
pleasurable
disappointment did I find, after some hours of
dreadful apprehension, that my limbs were yet free
from the watersthat the darkness and coldness of the
preceding night had failed to return; and while
deploring
,
however, the absence of that strong blaze,
which was now my chief privation, how was I
gladdened
to behold, of a sudden, a broad and beautiful
stream of spendour, like a transparent pillar from the
heavens, equally bright, far more beautiful, though
without
the heat, which marked and came with the day,
looking down immediately upon me. It grew as it
approached
,
in power and expansion, sending its pale and
silvery glances in every direction, illuminating all, and
resting with a smile of beautiful attraction, even upon the
billows of my mortal enemy. Shall I tell you that this
was the moonmaking her first maiden ascent into the
blue world, of which she is so beautiful and well-beloved
a tenantalone, and proud in her unapproachable
brightness. No songs of triumph ushered in her
approach
.
Her attendants were Silence and Quiet, and
they, like herself, and the Night to which they minister,
were born dumb. With what a feeling of delighted
awe, aided by her light, and emboldened by the placidity
of all around me, did I look upon the fierce waters I
had so much dreaded. There, in grim repose, stretched
out like myself in a slumbering quiet, did they rest
beneath
her spells. Not a billow stirrednot a breath
came from them; and, but for the perpetual heavings
of their breasts, I should now have regarded them, and
all the terrors they had made me undergo, as a mere
dream, a delusion. But shethat gentle spirit
towards
morning began also to decay. She looked no
longer down with an eye all brightness and beauty;
slumber seemed to fall upon her, a film passed over her
brows; and now, I discovered, for the first time, the
numerous lesser lights that came in her train, the
brightness and beauty of which had been hitherto
merged entirely in her own. What a fairy picture of
sweetness and sublimity! There was not a shadow
upon methere was not a cloud in the firmament;
and even the waters that howled fitfully in their sleep
at intervals, were wrapt in a garment of thin and fretted
silver. But when this Queen of Faery, scared by the
approaching day, had veiled her face in a dun mantle,
and the stars, following her example, to avoid the
absorption
of the greater splendour, had done likewise,
what new wonders were before me! There was yet
another change, and newer inconveniences. Sounds
unheard and unconceived before, were in my ears
the only strong feature of which was their utter
discordance
one with the other. As far as I could see,
my whole body had been taken possession of by a troop
of as disagreeably incongrous creatures as you might
by any stretch of imagination conceive. Some were
horned and unhorned, tailed and untailed, winged and
unwinged, four-footed, two-footed, and no footed
beast, bird, and reptile, flesh and fowl; the whole
variety
as you know them now: all were there, making
as perfectly free with my system, as if it were purely
and entirely their own. Some were nipping the plants
and grasssome reposing their limbs upon my own;
and, not a few inconsiderately burrowing into my body
with their sharp horns, and taking other troublesome
and indecent liberties with the body they had so
audaciously
invaded. I was indignant, as well I might be;
and strove, with a degree of vigour and violence which
merited to have been much more successful, to extricate
myself from their impertinence, but in vain. Some,
indeed
,
I did succeed in shuffling into the embraces of my
neighbour, the sea; but though I tumbled and twisted
in every possible direction, I failed to dislodge the great
mass, or persuade them into any civilities. While, as
if in punishment of my discontent, my limbs were
chained and fixed into the several positions in which I
had thrown themlumps and depressions were the
consequence; and a body, otherwise superbly and
symmetrically
beautiful, was now shaped to distortion.
These undulations in my animal make, your sages have
denominated valleys and mountains, and have spoken
of, and acted towards them, as if they had been in
reality the insensate masses, the names thus given them
are used to signify. I am thus suffering perpetual
injuries
,
bruises, and beatings from your people, in
resentment
of which, I sometimes, (for I am slow to
anger
,)
with a contraction of a knee, overthrow a
territory
,
and with the upheaving of my chest or side,
swallow up a city or an empire, and perform other
feats of a like irregularity. One ambitious fool among
you, did, in cutting through what he called a mountain,
difigure terribly my left nostril, but I revenged myself
upon him in a corresponding style. I destroyed his
fleet by a breath, and sent him to his own dominions, a
fugitive, as he had left them, a fool. Others again,
before
and since, not liking, it would seem, such
elevations
,
though in the formation of my frame actually
essential to symmetry, have levelled various of my
members, to an insipid evenness, and elevated, in
turn, many of my depressions, into positive deformities.
Some, not content with working their own advantage
at my expense, have allied themselves to my ancient
enemy, the seawith whom I am continually at war,
and from whom I daily wrest and rescue some of my
memberscutting trenches in my very bosom to admit
his billows; and endeavouring, in this wanton manner,
not merely to disencumber me of my component parts,
but, with a species of cruelty, purely Turkish, actually
to disembowel me. There are other incursions, equally
barbarous, which your people are in the habit of making
into my person; which, as I have already told, I
sometimes
revenge in lifting or relaxing a leg or an arm, by
which I have lodged a city or a state under the water.
It is by these changes (when fatigued in one position)
which I sometimes make, that your travellers have met
with new continentsthus, too, may you account for
the rising and falling of a lake or an islandin the
progress
of a single night. In stating my many wrongs at
your hands, I may charge you with numerous robberies.
Not content with what I place on my surface for your
good and at your free disposal, you penetrate with
pick-axe
and spear, into my very entrails, to pilfer my
possessions
.
Spoils which your fathers knew not of, or, if
they did, which they did not venture to touch, you now
grope into my treasuries for, lay violent hands on, and
pocket without acknowledgment, and without scruple.
I have little else to say, but should not omit,
though it does not very greatly enter into the materials
of my own history, to speak of some things which
more immediately concern yourself. I will return.
I had scarcely become familiar with the presence of
beast and bird, as already spoken of, when I was made
conscious of other objects. Two fair creatures were
before, and dwelling above me. They dwelt in the
bosom of a rich star, that hung at a small distance
above my horizon. Beauty, and youth, and innocence
were about, and enveloped and was a part of them
and from the moment I beheld, I lovedI worshipped
them. Their looks were lovetheir words were
musictheir smiles were peace. Nor was I alone in
my adoration. The most savage of the wild tribes
that were about me bowed and humbled themselves
before them. They walked unharmed by the tiger
the serpent crawled into his cavern as they went by,
and the doves met in their pathway, in amorous
discourse
.
Scarcely less beautifulnot less perfectly
madethough less perfect as it would seem from
subsequent
eventsthan the glorious forms and images
which came down from heaven, walking and
conversing
with them, how could we refuse our homage?
These were your parents, boy. Alas! how very
unlike
their children, then, though made to resemble
them, at last, as well in feature as in fortunedriven
from that habitation of delighta flaming sword set
behind and waving over themunknown dangers
assailing and threatening, and the first proof of their
fall from that high estate, and of their present
deformity
,
the relaxed homage of the brutethe
increased
insolence of the snakethe timid fluttering of the
dovethe one growling and the other hissing, the
third flying before them in terror, as they passed to
their new abode. But it is time to pause.
If I have not confined myself in this narrative
entirely
to the circumstances of my own creation, I have
not, at least, extended my account to that of objects
not relevant thereto. Of the subsequent revolutions
in my life I need say nothing. The history might be
troublesome for me to relate, and somewhat fatiguing,
certainly, for you to hear. Still it might instruct you.
It consists, and in this respect differs not from your
own, of many vicissitudes, changes, shadows and
sunshine
,
hopes and apprehensions. Not the least of my
annoyances is the knowledge that I am at the mercy
of your race, the victim of all your caprice and
extravagance
.
4
The destiny which makes me your victim,
now, however, with a spirit of retributive justice,
which marks all heaven's judgments, revenges me on
you hereafter. You will all, your great and low, lofty
and despised, alike, come and lie down in my bosom,
restoring me at last that which had been taken from
me at your formation. Of this you may not complain,
if, like me, you have been taught to know how many
are the trials of life, and how sweet is the slumber
that its close brings with it. You have other hopes,
than myself, and in this respect our destinies part
company. You dream of a high ascent into other
spheresyou put on a new lifeyou re-ascend that
pure and perfect star, from which your ancestors so
haplessly descended. This hope is not for meyet
shall I be satisfied, if once again permitted to behold
that glorytheir glory and my own, of which I so
freely partookin which I so joyously luxuriated,
when the stars first sung their pans, and the
ponderous
spheres, in compliance with their high destiny,
uttered their full concerted harmonies, in token of
their common existence.
The spirit had departed. I had been listening to
our common Parent. I had heard a story, such as one
may gather from the leaves and the plants, in the city
and in the forest, if disposed to listen to those
messengers
of the eternal Providence, sent wisely for his
solace and instructionilluminating his pathway, and
directing his feet.
CHATELARD.
The account which history gives us of this daring
and unhappy adventurer, is of as much interest and
quite as sadly romantic as that of Rizziowho, with
far less pretension, suffered martyrdom for a like error.
The first notice we have of Chatelard places him on
board the vessel which bore Mary of Scotland to her
unstable empire. The events of that voyage need here
no recital. We are told by the historians, who have dwelt
upon this particular in the fortunes of Mary with far more
precision than distinguishes their narrative throughout,
that, with a measure of grief, which, to most persons,
would appear highly exaggerated and artificial,
La
Reine Blanche
,as, from her white mourning, the
French had at that time designated hertook her
departure
from the shores of that fair country, in which her
education had been acquired, and which her heart could
never, at any period in her life, entirely leave. Nor
was this feeling at all abated by the other circumstances
attending her departure. Various and striking were
the omens of ill which marked her sailing, and filled
her melancholy spirit with apprehensions not
unwarranted
by the result; and when advised of the English
fleet sent by her bitter enemy and rival, Elizabeth, to
intercept her, not even the pledges of true faith from
her gallant but small retinue, could materially diminish
or alter the countenance of despair, with which,
uttering
a thousand exclamations of farewell! she kept
looking back upon the land which her eyes were so
rapidly losing. The strains of the young Chatelard,
served up to her senses with a spirit of corresponding
tone with hers, soothed, however, the gloomy temper
of the princess, and possibly prevented those wild and
violent paroxysms, which usually mark the more
extravagant
sorrows of the sex. In nature's exhaustion at
last, weeping herself to slumber, she sunk down upon
the couch prepared for her upon the deck of her vessel;
while, with a spirit more and more enamoured from the
subject of his contemplation, the daring boy who sung
above her, filled with hopes as delightful as they were
illusory, fell into dreams not less cheering than those
of his mistress were sorrowful.
The dawn of the morning found them in the most
perilous situation. They were surrounded by the
English
fleet, and no possible chances appeared for their
escape. In that hour the devotion of those about the
beleaguered princess was finely tried; and none were
more ready in their willingness to die in her defence,
than the young and accomplished poet. Indeed, as the
nephew of the celebrated Bayard, the knight,
sans peur,
sans reproche
educated in France, skilled in arts,
arms, and the required duties of a court the most
refined
of Europeless than devotion to death, and
firmness
amidst torture, could not have been expected
from the youth. His eyes flashed defiance as the tall
masts of the approaching and overwhelming force
loomed
out upon the horizon; and, throwing aside the harp,
to the strains of which through the night his fine voice
had formed at intervals a fitting accompaniment, he
drew his sword, and bending on his knee to his queen,
proffered it in gallant language, and begged to use it
in her service. Mary smiled through her tears upon
the boy, and, with a compliment which came with added
sweetness from her lips, gave him permissiona
permission
which made him happyto die in her defence.
But the watchful Providence had them in charge, and
at the moment of their discovery, a thick fog overspread
the seas. A bold hand was upon the helm, and guided
unwavering and silently on their course, they escaped,
by passing through the gathering prows of their enemy.
Chatelard was a favourite, and had the power of
maintaining that ground in the estimation of the queen
which his many accomplishments and warm devotion to
her service had long before won. Amidst opposing
claims he suffered nothing from rivalship, and while
other courtiers were exposed to the alternations of a
cloudy day, all was sunshine and smiles for him. A
poetess herself, Mary delighted in all those professing the
gay science; and though we have no remains of
Chatelard
by which his pretensions might be estimated, it
appears, from her regard, that his claims were at once
agreeable and peculiar. He wrote in all living
languages
.
He read with a voice and manner that
improved
what he read. He was ready and fluent in
composition, and her smiles so encouraged him, that,
at length, she herself became his muse, and he learned
in a little time to forget all others. Nor was his daring
unsanctioned by the circumstances attending it. She
seemed, perhaps unconsciously, to encourage his
madness
.
She replied to his verses in a strain equally
4*
amatory; and the rapt bard forgot entirely his poetical
existence in the feelings of the man. Accustomed to
every species of adulation, the tender verses of
Chatelard
did not offend the young princess; and she smiled
at his more extravagant flights, as at the flatteries
peculiar
to, and pardonable in, the poet. But her
condescension
was fatal to the lover. Her smiles tempted
him, says Brantome, to aspire, like Phaeton, at
ascending
the chariot of the sun. He grew mad in his
hope, and thinking of little beside, and caring for
nothing
else, the youth had no life but in the wild love
which he entertained for his sovereign.
It was at the close of one of those evenings which
Mary, freeing herself from the council and the
counsellors
alike, usually reserved to herself, her four Maries,
and such other of her household, as were classed with
her especial favouritesthat Chatelard, while
performing
to the queen, had drunk in his richest draughts of
delicious enjoyment. Though always gentle and
indulgent
,
she had been to the young poet, on this occasion,
particularly so; and there was that in his heart which
could not and would not be controlled. He had just
sung the words of a new poem, in which, as usual, her
praises had been embodied; the conceits of which,
borrowed
in part from the Italian, had won largely of her
admiration. The four Maries, not so fond as their
mistress of the divine art, had, one by one, fallen into
that species of torpor, which, if not sleep, is
wonderfully
like it, and which is not unusual to those kept long
in attendance upon a superior. The queen had not
ceased in her admiration, when the fertile genius of the
poet suggested a still richer conceit which his lips had
carried into song, and which at once called for another
acknowledgement from the gratified and royal listener.
She, at length, roused by his inspiration, catching a
portion of its influence, struck the harp which she bade
him place beside her, and sung, with great tenderness
and much effect, a little response to his strains, in which,
with a like conceit, she requited him.
The words were those of love, of deep feeling,
and though most probably they were dictated only in
that spirit of compliment and gallantry which
distinguished
the age, in that country in which both of them
had been educated, the adventurous poet regarded them
as reciprocating in every essential the mad passion of
his own spirit. Falling upon his knee, therefore, he
seized her hand, and fervently carrying it to his lips,
perceived with renewed delight that she did not rebuke
himthat she allowed him to retain it for a second, and
only did not permit a repetition of his offence. He
spoke to her with a soul which infused itself into every
syllable which gathered upon his lips. What he said,
he, himself, knew not. His heart was wild, and all his
senses in rebellion against his reason. He breathed
forth the adoration which he felt, and only offended
when, in the simplicity of his spirit, he dared to hope.
The queen rose, and for a moment she spoke not.
There was something of a sweet confusion in her eye,
which gave a moment's encouragement to the rash and
enamoured minstrel. It is not impossible, indeed,
that young, ardent, gentle, highly intellectual, having
a spirit attuned like his who addressed her, to the high
converse of the muse, and warmed to corresponding
sympathies, the pretension of the bard had been far
less heinous in her eye than, under other
circumstances
,
it might have appeared. Her manner was
not stern, though grave; and her accents, though not
encouraging, were neither severe nor frigid.
Looking
around upon her attendants, who had, without
much difficulty, worked themselves into the
profoundest
sleepwith resumed calmness she spoke to the
still kneeling and still entreating youth. His fine
and graceful figurehis wild, penetrating, and
impassioned
eyethe free and bold gesture of his action
the eloquence of his languagethe warmth of his
lovewere all so many advocates, not merely for
forgiveness, but for a corresponding love. That, in a
less elevated station, Mary of Scotland might have
nourished the flame she had enkindled, may not so
well be denied, and is far from improbable. But she
was a woman of strong good sensea moment's
reflection
convinced her of the madness of any thought
on the subject, and pitying the youth, with a
gentleness
of spirit not unwarmed by a due estimate, and a
proper admiration of his pretensions, she found it
necessary to silence them.
This must not be, Chatelardthis must not be.
You forget yourselfyou forget me, and presume
upon that favour, already a subject of complaint in my
court, which I have been fain, and it seems foolish,
to bestow upon you. What take you me for, young
man? Think you I am a child, and would you teach
me to forget the vast difference and distance between
us, as you yourself have forgotten it? Be advised in
time, ere the lesson comes too harshly and from
another
tutor than I, who have been, and am, quite too
indulgent to you now.
There can be no sterner tutor to my heart, sweet
sovereign, was the unhesitating response of the poet,
than your own brow thus frowning upon me; and
the only death which I dare not encounter is that
which comes with your anger. Say then, that you
forgive methat you grow not again wroth with me,
or I care not to leave this spot, though now so gloomy
with your frown. I am ready to perish here, and now
now, at your feet.
The vain flattery of your speech does not blind
me, Chatelard, to the presumption of your spirit; but
I forgive and pity your delusion, believing as I do,
that you do not feign, and seek not dishonestly to
practise upon me. Still, this kind of language must
be forborne. You must not be permitted to indulge
in thoughts so far above your condition, and so
injurious
to mine. You should remember that I am the
sovereign, to whom your allegiance is due, not the
fellow subject, with whose fortunes your own might
couple, and suffer neither rebuke nor contamination.
And, are you less my sovereign, sweet princess,
because I love as well as obey? Does the passion
which now speaks in my spirit, and warms it into
devotion
for thine, make me lose sight of the homage
which it thus doubly secures to thee? I know you for
my queenone graciously forgiving for my faults
one too indulgent to my merits. But not merely as
my sovereign do I know you. It is not as the painted
authority alone, whom the voice of a people, or the
rights of inheritance, have invested with power, that
the soul of Chatelord regards the person of Mary
Stuart. It is not the bauble of sovereignty and vain
sway which I have adoredit is not these which have
dazzled my eyes and misled my spirit. I have not
been won away from my homage by such as these;
and I regarded you, my princess, as too far above the
sex to which you by nature belong, to have much
regarded
them yourself. I know that you esteem not
royalty as the silly crowd who gather in its blaze. I
have not watched and lingered when all were gone,
and loved devotedly when all were hollow and
insincere
,
to doubt that your soul was as much above the
vain trappings of your state, as mine that dared, and
still dares, to despise them. And how shall we regard
those toys of human arrangement which make the free
spirit a reined and fettered thing, and would enslave
and bind affections and high passions, according to
chartered limits? I have not caredI shall not care
for such restraints, and well I am assured that you are
beyond their dictation and control. If you are not
if, with that frailty, which the familiar speech of old
time, hath laid to your sex, you have deceived me in
this,I have, indeed, and deeply, offended. But I
will not thus imagine, I dare not think, my princess,
that a spirit, so finely wrought as yours, can find a
difference in the state with which human laws hedge
around authority, giving it superiority over a mind
and affections, having no consciousness of aught by
which it might suffer in a comparison with authority
of the highest.
And granting, young man, that I thought as you
suppose. Granting, that in my mind, there was
nothing
in the state itself which should prevent a queen
from bestowing herself on the meanest of her subjects
who had found favour in her sightby what art come
you to know that such an one are you? What
divination
provides you with this goodly assurance? Why
hast thou taken, it for true, that, having such a free
doctrine as that thou hast so plainly imagined, I have
chosen to illustrate it to my subjects, with your aid in
especial?
The mortification of the poet he did not seek to
suppress
.
As the queen spoke, the colour came and
went on his cheeks, and as his words were uttered in
reply, they fell from his lips tremulously and only
with great effort.
Sharply, my sovereign, have you rebuked my folly,
but my pride in this suffers far less than the poor
heart in which it abides. It has been my thought,
that there were some spirits as sovereign by nature as
they were so by human creation; and my further
thought has been, that such a spirit was thine. Nor
can I yet think otherwise, though thou hast chosen to
reprove me for my wild love, not as it offends thy own
nature, but as it ill accords with the wonted usage of
that vain state with which the pageantry of ancient
folly has girt thee in. I love thee not less, however,
even now, hopeless as thou hast declared my passion
to be, and all humbled as thou hast endeavoured to
make that pride, which, till this hourassured as it has
been of no semblance of aught that was not high and
honourablewas never humbled before mannor,
whatever be my fate, can I cease to make the same
bold, and, as it appears to thee, most audacious and
offensive avowal. I cannot school the nature which I
have from heaven, to its own violation, because of
any earthly dictation. If it be criminal to love thee, I
am thus criminal; and fear me, if I know myself
rightly
,
that each future hour of my life, will somewhat
increase the crime for which the heavy penalty of
your stern frown and bitter speech is now gathering
in its reproof.
You are bold, Chatelordover bold, to your
queen, and, but that I deem you the honest subject
that you have always appeared, and now avow
yourself
,
I should be something more than offended. I
forgive you this boldness, and think not when I warn
you to greater prudence, and chide you for the
forwardness
of present speech, that I overlook and am
insensible to those gifts of nature and of art which so
present themselves in you, and make you, as I have
often said and thought, one of the fairest gentlemen
of my court. I am well delighted with your skill in
the divine art of poetry, and would be loth to lose
that sweet minstrelsy which hath soothed so many of
my saddest hours, and which thy skill so cunningly
awakens. But thou must be chary of thy speech and
thoughts in this foolish matter of which thou hast
permitted thy lips to prattle something too freely.
Thou hast marked the jealous scrutiny of those, who,
calling themselves my subjects, are yet my sovereigns,
and whom I dare not offend. Thou hast seen for
thyself
the malignant spirit with which this gross zealot,
whom they call Knox, inveterately watches over and
vapours at all that concerns me. Pursue not,
therefore
,
this madness, for, whatever my woman heart
might teach, my calm reason assures me it is nothing
less,and be as thou hast heretofore been, and I have
been glad to see thee, the noble friend rather than
subject, and make me not less, by thy future bearing,
than thine, as I would be.
The manner of the queen was even more gentle
than her words, but the parental character of both was
thrown away upon the infatuated youth. He was mad
enough to conceive this speech a full sanction for,
rather than rebuke of, his passion; and under an
impulse
,
the consequence of that unregulated play of the
passions which had him for some time before in
mastery
,
he dared to embrace the now terrified and
retreating Mary, while imprinting a fervent kiss upon
her lips. The maids of honour, awakened at her
cries, came to her rescue. The queen retired to her
chamber, and Chatelard was about to leave the little
ante-room in which this scene had taken place, when
a strong arm was laid upon his shoulder, and the
Regent
Murray stood before him. The poet was as
fearless in strife as he was daring in love, but
resistance
was hopeless. A score of serving men were at
the back of the earl, by whom he was immediately
taken into custody, and that very night committed to
a close prison.
The trial of Chatelard, by the proper legal
authorities
,
followed in due and rapid course under the
direction of the regal council. The great favour
which the poet had enjoyed, had procured for him not
a few enemies; and the jealous hate of Murray, against
all and every thing that stood for an instant between
himself and the supreme rule, which he always desired,
5
and at that time almost affected, furnished a spur, on
this occasion, to the active measures which were
adopted. The trial was had, and the misguided youth
was condemned to death. The gentle spirit of Mary
revolted when this sentence was delivered. She
laboured
,
though vainly, for its commutation; and the
stern temper of that stern people, or many among
them, over whom she reigned, set down that interest
and sympathy, which she now exhibited, to the worst
of all criminal attachments. As, with tears in her
eyes, and an eloquence not often surpassed even
among men, she rose in the council, if possible, to
affect
the decision by her own entreaties, and the
unhesitating forgiveness which she offered to the
captive
,
the rigid reformer, Knox, throwing aside all
sense of propriety, presumed to insinuate a guilty
interest in her prayer which did not exist, and never
had existed. It was then, thatas the queen,
disdaining
all reply, sunk back pained and exhausted upon
the cushions from which she had risenthe victim,
for the first time, rose to address the council.
I do not speak, said he, that I may not perish.
I am guilty of all that you allege, and, since I may
not dare to
live
, why should I scruple to die? I have
no fears of death, and, at this moment, but little love
of life. But for that malignant slanderer, who, not
daring to speak out his malice, yet meanly leaves it to
the sense of conjecture,I would speak to his shame.
It is false as he affirms it. I am the criminal in this
the only criminalif it be a crime to love, and with
adoration, not less warmly, though perhaps less
acceptably
offered, than that which I have entertained for
heaven. Let me, said he, turning to the queen,
let me, oh, most beautiful and well beloved princess,
do this poor atonement for my offence to you. It is
but meagre justice to your heavenly innocence, that I
say to this people who now sit over me in justice, that
my rash passion was no less ungracious in your eyes
than it has proved criminal in theirs. This, indeed,
is my sorrowsince the chains with which they have
loaded these once free and undishonoured limbs, and
the insolent speech and suspicion which they have
poured within these ears that had hitherto refused to
hearken to any sounds that were not noble and sweet
and the ignominious death which is in reserve for
mewould have all been as nothingay, would have
been sought for earnestly and anxiously, as a rich boon
and blessing, so that thou hadst felt some of that wild
passion in thy breast which thou hast so fatally
awakened
in mine.
With a refinement of cruelty, which seems to have
attended Mary through life, she was compelled to sit
in a latticed chamber overlooking the place of the
poet's execution. This measure was deemed
necessary
,
in order the more fully to exonerate her from the
suspicion urged by her enemies, that, having first
tempted, she had afterwards betrayed, the criminal.
It was thought necessary that she should seem to
rejoice in his just punishment. The unfortunate
youth was brought to execution on the 22d February,
1653. His conduct on the altar of death and
degradation
,
was marked by the most enthusiastic bravery.
He rejected the aid of the confessor; and, having first
read aloud Ronsard's celebrated hymn on death, he
turned to the chamber, through the lattice of which
the outline of the queen's form might be seen
imperfectly
,
and after a moment's pause exclaiming,
Farewell
,
loveliest and most cruel princess that the world
containsknelt firmly and gracefully down before
the block. A single shriek from the window announced
the moment of execution; and the queen fell into a
swooning fit, as the dismembered head rolled from the
gory trunk along the scaffold.
THE FOREST MAIDEN.
The subject of this little sketch is familiar enough to all
American
readers, and consequently needs nothing by way of preface.
As some additions, however, have been made to the history of the
event, as given by our historians, it may be as well to say, that
the personal feeling, which, in the poem, is made to prompt the
sanguinary passion of Powhatan, is purely gratuitous; and for
which there is no authority in the fact. Smith's life was
attempted
,
after he was in custody, by an Indian whose son he had
wounded or slain; and he was preserved with difficulty.
Powhatan
had two sons, at the period referred to, both of whom were
unharmed in this adventure. The addition here made, was
intended to place in a stronger light the amiable spirit of
Pocahontas
,
and the great sacrifice, by her father, of his personal
feeling and native impulse, in his compliance with her entreaties.
The description of the chief incident in the narration is, in all
substantial particulars, historically correct.
Oh, lightly beamed the maiden's smile
In careless mood, in regal bower,
Ere yet the stranger's step of guile
Brush'd one soft beauty from the flower.
A wild girl of an Indian vale,
With deer-like pace, that would not tire
And if her cheek be less than pale,
The sun had warmed it all with fire
And sweet the light that filled her eye,
And in the woods, or on the water,
In frail canoe when darting by,
All knew herPowhatan's young daughter
5*
He, Prince of many a mighty race,
Beloved and of unbounded power;
And shethe nation could not trace
A brighter or a gentler flower.
Among a savage people still,
She stood, from all their moods apart,
For dream of crime, and thought of ill,
Had never swayed her gentle heart.
A milder tutor had been there,
And 'midst wild deeds and wilder men,
Her spirit, as her form, was fair,
And gracious was its guidance then.
A Christian soul, though by its creed,
Untaught, amid her native wild,
Free from all taint of thought or deed,
A spotless and a gentle child.
Such, in her youth, and ere the blight
Of failing fortunes touched her race,
Was Pocahontas to the sight,
A form of lovea thing of grace.
Beloved by allher father's pride,
Nor less his pride, than, all apart,
The pledge for which he would have died,
The very life-blood of his heart.
The king has sought the chase to-day,
And mighty is the proud array,
A nation gather'd there
A bison herdso comes the tale
Is trampling down the quiet vale,
And none who love the land must fail,
To gather when they hear.
He wentthe father from his child,
To meet the monster of the wild,
But, in his fond embraces caught,
Ere yet he went, he hears her thought,
And, in his pliant mood, reveals,
The love his inward spirit feels.
And hours are gone, since thus he went,
By her, in wayward impulse spent,
When, hark! the war-whoop shrilly sounding,
Tis my father, said the maid,
And like sprightly gazelle bounding
She has left the long arcade,
Where, from many a forest brought,
Blossoms wild, and leaf, and flower,
She with hand of taste had wrought
To a wild fantastic bower.
Tis my father, said the maid,
As the chaplet down she laid,
But why should war-whoop's accent sound,
When the hatchet's under ground
Sure, the Oneida, from afar,
Wakes no vengeful voice of war,
When they laid the hatchet low,
Scarce is gone three moons ago
The leaf was burntthe calumet
Wafted fumes that gladly met,
And the spirit from above
Bless'd the sacred sign of love.
Powhatan gathers his warriors around
A rock is his throne,
And his footstool, a stone,
And the coronet plumes his broad temples have bound,
No courtier's servile brow is there,
But every head is raised in air,
And each strong chief, a warrior true,
A circle round the monarch drew.
The king, in conscious majesty,
Rolled around his fiery eye,
As the meteor hung on high,
To all it sees, and it can see,
Speaks of fearful things to be.
At his feet, upon the stone,
Sat the sylph-like girl alone
The dark tresses streaming down,
Fell upon her shoulders brown,
While, with fires unwonted burned,
The deep glances, upward turned
She, alone, at that dark hour,
Ventured nigh the man of power.
With soothing, but with doubting smile,
That fixed the monarch's gaze awhile,
But could not turn away the mood,
That even chilled the maiden's blood
And with a trembling tone, that broke,
Strangely the stillness round, she spoke
My father breaks no word with me,
Yet is he come, and has not brought
The spotted fawn, I fain would see,
By tender hands, unharmed, caught.
The task to him I know were light,
To rouse the silver foot, and take,
Even in its weeping mother's sight,
The bleating captive from the brake.
Yet comes he not, to mark his toil,
And tell his full success, to me,
With one poor token of his spoil
Not even the bison's head I see.
In vain, I askI ask it now,
My father, nor rebuke thy child
Why is thy accent stern and wild,
And why the red spot on thy brow.
What may this mean?No bison chase,
Nor failing sport, not often vain
Ere roused that symbol on your face,
Ormust not bring it there again.
Nor in your lookwhere'er I turn,
In every eye that lowers around,
I mark a dreadful fury burn,
That wants not speech or sound.
Where is my brother.
Let him speak,
Said the old monarch I am weak.
They brought a dead boy from the ring,
And placed him near the king.
Dumb was the maiden, as she fell,
Before the deadsmit as by sudden spell,
And motionless, save that her fingers strayed,
And took from out a deep gash on his breast,
That, thence she vainly but still fondly press'd,
A hacked and broken blade.
More darkly grows the monarch's brow
Ay, girl, you have no brother now,
And I, no sonthe glorious race,
That with the day-god kept its place,
Ere many moons, shall cease to shine,
A broken and a blasted line.
And you may shed the infant's tear,
Ye cannot move the silent there,
Whose spirit all impatient stands,
And waves us with its bloody hands,
Asks for the shade of him who slew,
The sacrificea warrior true,
And shall he ask in vain?
Smoothing the path of shadows, heaven
A just and sweet revenge has given,
To recompense the slain.
Impatient turn'd the warrior chief,
And bade a gloomy warrior nigh,
And utter'd a command, which grief
Had made imperfectLet him die,
At once and meet his settled fate;
And, if he feel his torture great
If one suppress'd or sudden shrick,
His terror or his anguish speak,
Then shall my soul perchance deny,
The wretch, the blessed boon to die,
Since I were woman to provide,
For my brave son a coward guide.
The block is prepared, the weapon is bared,
And the chiefs are all nigh with their tomahawks rear'd,
The prisoner they bring, in the midst of the ring,
And the king bids the circle around him be cleared.
Unmoved, though in a hostile land,
And girded by a savage band,
Unknown to yielding mood
His limbs, but not his spirit, bound,
How looks that gallant stranger round,
With high and fearless blood.
The block before him they display
He shrunk not from the dread array,
But with a tone as high,
As their own song of death, he boasts,
Made by his arm, the thousand ghosts,
That wait to see him die.
Yet once, as o'er his mind there came,
The memory of a foreign name,
Perchance, a heart long tried
And, as his memory active grew,
And to his thoughtful spirit drew
The wandering band, the brave, the few,
That late were at his side,
His eye could scarce conceal the tear
That struggled, swelled and trembled there;
Which, as the savage saw
Dishonouring all his former fame,
And emblem of the deepest shame,
He spoke their fearful law.
Be quick, nor long delay his death,
For fear, that, in his latest breath,
He taint my native land
I would not have the warrior die,
Nor sound his glorious battle cry,
Nor keep the fight-fire in his eye,
Nor boast his matchless brand.
But heI pity, while I scorn
The tribe in which the wretch was born,
And, as I look around,
I glad me that I can descry,
Amid the brave men gathering nigh,
Not one who dreads the battle's sound,
Not one who fears to die!
They cast the prisoner on the ground,
With gyves from neighbouring vines they bound,
And on a jagged rock they laid,
His destined head, with fell parade!
His eye is full of stern despair,
The club is raised aloft in air
Alas! he reads no pity there!
The warriors round, though taught to see
Such dreadful doom for aye impending,
Yet seem, with one accord to be,
In awful silence hush'd
The arm that wields the mace is bending
The instrument of death descending
No mercy in the faces by,
Betokeneth humanity
When forth that maiden rush'd,
From the low stone, where still affrighted,
She sat, her mental sense benighted,
And stayed the club in its descent,
Whilst on her fairy knee she bent,
Pass'd one arm o'er the prisoner's brow,
Laid her head on his own, and now
As to the monarch's wond'ring eye,
Her own was turn'd appealingly,
Bade the stern warrior strike the blow.
How could that dark old king forbear,
Though writhing with his own despair,
To still her plaintto grant her pray'r!
How could he check the angel grace,
That gave such beauty to her face,
How stay the more than sweet control,
That, to the savage could impart,
Tho' all untaught, the Christian soul,
The woman's mood, the human heart!
Oh, true the pray'r, and short the strife,
She wins the captive's forfeit-life
She breaks his chain, she bids him go,
Her idol, but her country's foe,
And dreams not, in their parting hour,
The bonds from him she tears apart,
Are nought in pang and fearful power,
To those he leaves around her heart.
PONCE DE LEON.
Would you then hear a story of true love?
Sit down and listen.
The lover of Spanish story must remember Ponce
de Leon; nor is he likely very soon to be forgotten by
the American reader. His history, the renown of his
achievements, as well in old as in new Spain, have
wrought for him the magic of a name in both
countries
,
and made him too familiar to all memories at all
conversant with the stirring and busy period in which
he lived, to permit of that oblivion, in his case, which
has obscured so many of his contemporaries.
Washington
Irving in his Companions, &c. has given a
very pleasant and interesting sketch of his life, the
perusal
of which, will compensate the idle hour which it
employs. As a knight of romance, we find him
fulfilling
,
to the card, all the dues and duties of the code and
court of chivalry, in its most elevated era; a service,
for which indeed, we are free to acknowledge, he was
peculiarly fitted. He was brave and daring to a
proverb
,
strong in person, fiery in spirit, true to his
affections
,
earnest in his devotions, a lover of valorous deeds,
for valour's sake, and fond of the sex as became a
disciple
of the school of gallantry in the time of
black-letter
romance. It may not be important to dwell
6
longer upon this head, for, I take it, these things are
quite as well known to other people as to myself.
The wars of Grenada had now for some time been
overthe Moors expelled for ever the delicious country
in which their elysium had, perhaps, been quite too much
placed, and but for the strife and wild adventure which
followed the unveilment of the new world to European
eyes, the whole kingdom of Spain had fallen into a
most unseemly, and at that period, unnatural and
unbecoming
quiet. The hum and hurry of war had ceased
to keep awake the cities; and the spirit-stirring blast
of the trumpet gave way at nightfall to the gentle and
more delicate and seductive notes of the guitar
At evening, by some melancholy maid,
To silver waters.
Knighthood, if not positively unfashionable, began to
be somewhat cumbersome, at least; and if the coat of
mail did here and there continue to be worn by the
warrior, more solicitous of former than of present
times, it was not unfrequently concealed by the
vestment
of gorgeous and embroidered silk. In fact, the
entire nation, even at the moment of its greatest glory
and true regeneration, had begun to adopt that peculiar
languor of habit, the consequence of a sudden flood of
prosperous enterprise, which, in after times, when a
superabundant wealth provided them with the means
of a boundless and luxurious indulgence, has made
them a very by-word and a mockery among the nations.
This condition of the national character was not then
perceptible, however; certainly not to themselves, and
perhaps not to the surrounding powers; and the repose
in which the nation lay, had become particularly irksome
to those brave adventurers who looked to carve out their
fortunes with their weapons. The world was their
oyster
,
and with them the speech of ancient Pistol must
have been of favourite and frequent application. Peace
was not only inglorious but unprofitable; and the
discovery
of America was a godsend quite as necessary
to the kingdom of old Spain, in ridding it of the excess
and idle population, made by the sudden termination of
its protracted warfare, as in extending its dominions
and enriching its treasures.
Though fully as renowned as any of the brave spirits
of his age and country, for every accomplishment of
arms, and every requisite of adventure, Ponce de Leon
did not, however, at this time, take part in the new
crusade, for the conquest of the Indian regions. There
were, indeed, sundry good and sufficient reasons why
such a step should be unnecessary, and might have
been imprudent. Ponce was now getting rather old
he had been fighting the good fight for his king and his
faith, from boyhood up, against the infidels, and quite
long enough to render unquestionable his loyalty to
both. Beyond all this, howeverand although we
shame to say it of so brave a knight, yet the truth had
better than not be knownPonce had of late suffered
some strange sensations of weakness, in regard to a
certain capricious damsel, the daughter and only heir
of a neighbouring Castellanor, as it now runs,
Castilian
a
knight of the noblest stock, who could,
without
any interregnum, trace his genealogical tree, in all
its branches, beyond the flood. Some may find, also,
a sufficiently good reason for the supineness of our
hero, in the fact of his being now well to do in the
world. He had been any thing but a loser in the wars;
had been at the sacking of not a few among the
Moorish
towns; and the spoils thus acquired had been well
employed, and with no sparing hand, to enrich and
adorn a couple of fine castles on the marches, which
the liberality and favour of the queen had committed to
his keeping. These perhaps, were each and all of
them strong enough, as reasons why he should not any
more adventure his life for gain or glory. But his
amour, his new passion, the rod which swallowed up
all others, had got completely the better of the knight's
understanding; and he did nothing but think, talk, and
dream, from morning till night, and night till morning,
of the beautiful but capricious Leonora D'Alvarado.
It was a gone case with Don Ponce; and he now
had more barbers and friseurs in his pay than he ever
knew in his young days, or should have known in his
old. But all in vainthe loves of our knight were
unfortunate
the
course of true love did not run smoothly
with him. Leonora was quite too young, beautiful,
and wealthy, not to be most fashionable, and most
fashionably
capricious and coquettish. She laughed at the
old knightmade merry with his awkwardnesses,
ridiculed
his gallantries, which, indeed, did not sit over well
upon him; and with much hardness of heart, denied him
her attention whenever he sought to be very manifest
with his. She was a gay and wild creature; and with so
much grace and winningness did she play the despot,
that, while the old knight absolutely shrunk and
trembled
beneath her tyranny, he loved still more the
despot
,
and became still more deeply the victim of the
despotism. It was, as we have already remarked, a
gone, and we regret to add, a hopeless case, with our
hero. Nor was it with him alone, we do her the
justice
to say, that the wanton baggage so toyed and trifled.
She had a thousand admirers, all of whom she treated
and trampled upon in like mannerfeeling, and never
hesitating to make use of her power, without pause or
mercy, till some cut their own throats, or the throats
of one another, while she, who made all the mischief,
cut each of them in turn. No sooner, however, did
one array leave the field, than another came into it:
such were her attractionsdestined, however, to
experience
like treatment, and be driven away in turn by
other victims. She was indifferent to the fate so hourly
experienced; and many are the epithets of
indignation
and despairing love which they bestowed upon her;
song, sonnet, sigh, and serenade, alike failed to find in
her bosom a single accessible or pregnable point, and
knight after knight came and saw, and went away in
his chains.
Don Ponce was not one of those who so readily
despair
.
He had sat down too often before the Moorish
castles, from one year's end to the other, not to have
acquired certain valuable lessons of patience, which
stood him in stead in the present strait; and, looking
upon the conquest of the lady in question, and with
much correctness of analogy, as not unlike those to
which, in the Moorish wars, he had been so well
accustomed
,
he concluded that though he might be able
to do nothing by sudden storm, he certainly could not
altogether fail of success in the course of a regular
blockade. The indefatigable patience and
perseverance
6*
of the besieger, he well knew, not unfrequently
wore out both these qualities in the besieged; so he
sat down before the fair fortress, and regularly
commenced
his approaches. Never kept besieging army
so excellent a watch. Ponce was, and had been at all
times, an exellent general; the Moors had taught him
the nature of strategy, and he taught his retainers.
They knew their duty, and did it. Not a messenger
entered the castle of the beleaguered damsel that was
not overhauled. He permitted no succour to be thrown
into the walls, and the unfortunate waving of a
handkerchief
from any of the lattices, did not fail to bring out
the whole array of the beleaguering force, ready to put
to death any auxiliar, or arrest any supplies that might
have been going to the succour of the besieged. At
length all his outworks having been completed, his
own courage roused to the sticking point, the
preparations
for a final attack made perfect, and believing
that his antagonist would now be willing to listen to
reason, our knight sounded a parley, and the fair
defender
of the fair fortress readily, and without pause or
seeming apprehension of any kind, gave him the desired
interview. Nothing, of course, could have been more
delightfully pleasant or pacific. The knight, as had
been his wont, on all great and trying occasions,
appeared
in full armour; and the damsel, conscious of
her true strength and the legitimate weapons of her
sex, wore, Venus-like, her own graces, set off, and
exquisitely
developed, by the voluptuous freedom of the
Moorish habit. As there was now no necessity for any
further delay, the preliminaries having been well passed
on both sides, our hero began. Half dignity, half
despair
,
he made a desperate exposition of his case. He
described his love, its inveteracy and great irritability,
in moving language; now in prose, now in verse, and
all in the spirit of that artificial period when love wore
wings and worshipped sunbeams, and chivalry carried
a lyre in one hand and a lance in the other, ready, in
the event of a failure on the part of either, to supply its
place with a more faithful auxiliarand it was not
unfrequently
the case, that the fair but fickle damsel,
having bidden defiance to the persuasive melodies of
the former, was borne away triumphantly by the
discords
and terrors of the last. Don Ponce was terribly
eloquent on the present occasion. Never amorous
knight more so. He narrated all his endeavours at
her attainment; his labours more numerous and
magnificent
than those of Hercules; he detailed at length,
and with no little glow in the way of colouring, his
various
visitations by day, long watchings by night in the
perilous weather; described the curious presents,
procured
at infinite trouble and expense, solely for her
gratification; the thousand and one new songs made
purposely in her honour, and at his instance, by the
most celebrated minstrels, several dozen of whom he
kept in pay solely for the purpose. He then proceeded
to describe the honours of his state, his great wealth,
substance, dignity, and so forth; and, with all due
modesty, he referred to the noise and notoriety of his
deeds of arms, and the fame, name, and glory which he
had thereby acquired. He dwelt with peculiar force
and emphasis upon the nature of the establishment,
which, upon marriage, he designed her; and, with
much, and in the eye of the maiden, tedious minuteness,
entered upon an enumeration at large of the manifold
sources of delight and comfort which such an event
would necessarily occasion. Having, by this time,
exhausted
all his
materiel
of speechification, he wisely
determined upon coming to the point, and in a fine
string of verse, prepared for the occasion, and
rounding
off his speech admirably, as the distich is made to
do the scene in the old English drama, he concluded
by making her the offer of his hand, heart, and
substance
,
little expecting that, after all said and done,
such a young maiden should still have the hardihood to
refuse. But so she did; looking archly in his face for
a few seconds, she placed her slender and beautiful
fingers upon the few small specks of grisly hair that
still condescended to adorn his temples, and laughingly
exclaimed
Why, bless me, Don Ponce, at your years! how
can you talk of such a thing! You are quite bald, and
so wrinkled, that it's wonderful to me how you can
possibly think of any thing but your prayers.
This was answer enough, a' God's name; and
boiling
with indignation, yet baking with undiminished
ardour
and love, the worthy knight hurried home to his
castle, immersed and buried in the utmost despair and
tribulation.
The indifference, not to say ill treatment of Donna
Leonora, was not enough however to efface from the
mind of our hero the many and deep impressions which
it had imbibed in favour of that capricious beauty. The
very sportiveness of her rejection, while it necessarily
increased, could not fail, by the seductiveness of her
peculiar manner, in lightening, its severity; at least it
gave an added charm to her loveliness in the grace of
its expression. He now thought more of the coquettish
creature than ever; and the apprehensions, indeed, the
now seeming certainty, of her loss, threw him into a
fever, which was, of course, duly and professionally
heightened by the great number of his attending
physicians
.
The Sangrado principle was at work upon him, and,
but that the fates had determined he should be
preserved
for better things, he had ceased to join in the
good cheer of his table, and gone, not to eat, but to be
eaten! It was on the fourth or fifth day of his malady,
history is doubtful which, that in a moment of interval
from pain, his lacquey brought intelligence of one
below
,
in the guise of a mariner, who desired sight of his
highness, and the royal representative in those parts,
the most mighty, and valorous, and wise, Don Ponce
de Leon, chief of unnumbered titles, and doer of
unnumbered
deeds, &c. &c. Though not surprised by
the application, for Don Ponce was an officer of the
king, the knight felt some strange anxieties to see the
stranger, for which he could not precisely account, and
did not hesitate, accordingly, to command his
appearance
.
The new comer was a Portuguese mariner,
seeking permission from the knight as the king's
sub
in
that section, to make recruits for properly manning his
caraval, from the dominions of the knight. He
proposed
,
as was greatly the fashion at that time, to make
certain new discoveries on the western continentthe
new world which Columbus a little while before, with
unexampled generosity, gave to Castile and Leon,
and which, with still greater generosity, they accepted
at his hands. In addition, however, to the lands, and
savages, and gold, the articles commonly enumerated
among the promises of these adventurers, our
Portuguese
,
reviving an old tradition of his people, pledged
himself to the discovery of the far-famed fountain, to
the waters of which was ascribed the faculty of
conferring
perpetual youth upon those who drank of them.
It had long been a prime article in the fancies of the
Portuguese, that such a fountain existed somewhere in
the Indian seas, and the singular success attending the
enterprise of Columbus, at its time of conception
regarded
as so visionary, now inspired a large degree of
credence in every story, however monstrous or
extravagant
.
Our mariner spoke with singular
confidence
as to the localities of this fountain, and so very
accurately did he describe the features of the spot in
which it was to be found, with such a lavish degree of
poetical illustration, not to say poetical justice, that, on
a sudden, Don Ponce, to the surprise of all about him,
who before thought him on his last legs, found himself
perfectly restored. He leaped from his couch,
embraced
the tarry Portuguese with most unqualified
affection
;
and three or four of his attending physicians
happening, most unfortunately for them, at that
moment
to make their appearance, he gave orders to
trundle
them from the walls of his castle, in company with
all the pills, potions, and purges, by which they were
usually accompanied; an order, we need not add,
almost
as soon executed as given. Congratulating
himself
,
with unalloyed pleasure, upon his new acquisition,
our hero, to the surprise of every body, determined upon
a voyage of discovery, in proper person, to the
newly-found
continent.
I will find these glorious waters, this fountain of
youth; I will surprise, I will win this proud lady; I will
get rid of this ill-favoured complexion, these trenches,
this miserable apology for hair.
Such were the broken exclamations of Don Ponce.
Where's Don Ponce going? asked the
impertinent
.
What's that to you? said the knight; and having
made a visit, to take leave, he left the sight of the
sneering
beauty, entered his vessel, and the sails, under a
favouring breeze, loomed out gloriously and
auspiciously
in a balmy atmosphere, as they bore the old
veteran, but young lover, in search of the heretofore
hidden fountain of perpetual youth.
Years had now rolled away, and the world very well
knows, or it ought to know, how Don Ponce de Leon,
after many mishaps, disasters, and delays, discovered
the object of his want and search somewhere in the
fertile wildernesses of Florida. It answered all his
expectations, and had the desired effect upon his
person
.
He grew, upon drinking from it, straightway
comely and strong in person and buoyant in mind:
and, though tolerably well supplied with the latter
characteristic, already excessively warm and ardent in
his temper and affections, his joints grew more supple
than ever, and he could feel his blood articulating in
his veins perpetually, the then new and popular, but
now old and unpopular
areyto
of Oh, 'tis love, 'tis
love,' &c. The stream, however which caused all
this change in the moral and animal man, was quite a
small one; and its virtues, having soon made
themselves
manifest, it only served to supply the first
comers, and was dry to all succeeding. A single
draught was quite enough for all his purposes; and
perfectly satisfied with the measure of success which
attended his adventure, Don Ponce began again to
direct his attention to his native country. He thought
of his broad, bright fields, and of his vineyards, and
his retainers, and his castles, and then he thought of
Donna Leonora, and her fields, and her retainers, and
her castles, and all her other charms, personal and
contingent; and so thinking, he commenced his
return
.
But this was no easy matter. He had to fight
his way through troops of naked Indians, and wild
woods, and wicked briars, and swamps that left him
half naked; now losing his way, and almost despairing
to find it again; now exposed to perils from savage
men, and to temptations from savage women; such,
indeed
,
as frequently led his chivalry into singular
adventures
,
and nameless and paralysing difficulties.
But he surmounted them all; as how, in reference to
his new acquisitions, could he do less? He had taken,
as it were, a bond of fate for life. The gray hairs had
fallen from his brow, and been succeeded by others of
a less equivocal complexion, and in less limited
quantity
.
The wrinkles had left his cheek, the dimness
his eye; his step was no longer enfeebled and
uncertain
,
he felt himself quite as young as when, in the
vigour of his boyhood, he had wrestled with a romping
maid of Andalusia, and was not overthrown.
He stood once more, after an interval of many years,
upon the deck of his caraval; and, as he proceeded
over the mighty waste of waters that lay between him
and the land of his nativity, his thoughts grew more
than ever active and lively; his spirit more anxiously
aroused as to the condition in which he should find all
things upon his return. His chief apprehension,
however
grew out of his affair of the heart. Should the fair
Leonora have become the bride of anotherand was
all his personal beauty to be left upon his hands?
This was a damning difficulty, and all in vain did he
seek to wrestle with and avoid the reflection. It grew
but the stronger as he approached the shore; and when,
at his castle's entrance, he put the question to an old
retainer, and hastily demanded to know that which his
heart yet trembled to receive, how was he rejoiced to
learn that all was safe, all as when he left, and the
capricious
damsel quite as accessible as ever. He paused at
his castle, such was his impatience, but to arrange his
habit before intruding upon her.
If, said he, my gray hairs, my wrinkled face,
my infirm gait, were really her objections before, she
can no longer entertain them. I will wed-her on the
spotshe cannot, she dare not, she will not resist
me!
Surely not, Don Ponce, surely not; we always think
well of the man who thinks well of himself. Csar
never struck into a path so perfectly sublime, as when
he said,
Veni, vidi, vici;
say so too, Don, and the
thing 's settled.
Thus manfully determined, our hero appeared in
the halls of his neighbour Castellan, the father of the
lady, and, with a view of present prospects, so likely
to be that of the knight. Their meeting was hearty,
7
though it took the old gentleman some time to
understand
how Don Ponce could get young while he himself
got old. The grateful mystery of his transformation
once explained, however, and matters were all well. He
did not waste more time upon the father, than a
proper
courtesy actually called for; but, after the first
proprieties, hurried, with all a lover's agony of
impatience
,
to the bower in which he had been taught to
believe his mistress awaited him. What a moment of
delightful anticipationwhat funds of love in store
what raptures and felicitations at hand! He was on
the thresholdhe was in the presence. There she
stoodthe same sylphlike form, the same figure of
consummated symmetry. But why veiled? He rushed
valiantly forward, fell upon one knee before her, and,
oh, unlooked for condescension, she sunk into his
arms? He did not hesitate for a moment, but tearing
away the thick folds of the envious veil, he proceeded
to impress upon her lips, the kiss, so long treasured
with a perfect fidelitywhen he beheld, not the
Leonora
he had leftnot the beauty of her girlhoodnot
the creature of exquisite delicacy and youthful
fragrance
,
that queened it over a thousand heartsbut a
superannuated and withered damsel, of wrinkled face,
starched features, and lips to which kisses of any kind
appeared to have been strangers for a marvellously
long season. Don Ponce had never remembered that
the term of years employed by him in gaining, was
spent by her in losing, both youth and beauty. Nor,
in this error was our knight alone. To all of us, no
changes are so surprising, none, certainly, so
ungraeious
and painful, as those of the young, and delicate,
and gentle, under the hand of time and human
circumstances
.
Fifteen years had done much for our
hero, but much more for our heroine. He could not
believe his eyes.
Nay, lady, there is some mistake here, surely,
said he, releasing himself partly from his burden. I
came to see the beautiful Donna Leonora D' Alvarado.
And I am she, most noble knightthe same
Donna
Leonora to whom your heart was so perfectly
devoted
,
simpered out the now gracious coquette.
I must see Don Guzman, said he, I must learn
the facts in this matter; and flying out of the presence
of his goddess with even more rapidity than he had
flown into it, he appeared before the sire of the
ancient
beauty.
Don Ponce, where are you going? said the old
man.
Home, Don Guzman, said the young one.
Why this hurrydoes my daughter refuse? If
she does, Don Ponce, be assured that in your favour
I shall constrain her inclinations, warmly urged Don
Guzman.
Not for the world! was the reply of our hero,
not for the world; and hark ye Don Guzman, the
truth may as well be said now as ever. I no longer find
your daughter as I left her. I am quite too young for
her, I perceive. Pray permit me to send for her use
and your own, a bottle of water, which I took from a
certain fountain in India. I can assure you that it
will do you great goodyou both stand very much in
need of it.
Tradition does not say, whether the water thus
furnished
had any effect upon the fair Leonora. One
old chronicle insinuates that she brought her action
for a breach of promise against the young knight, but
failed to recover. This point is apocryphal, however.
He, we know, returned to America, and, after losing
an eye, in a fight with the Indians, and experiencing
many other vicissitudes, died of chagrin, from many
disappointments, as well in concerns of ambition as in
those of love; without, says the legend, from which
we borrow our narrative, losing a single beauty of
that youth, so marvellously vouchsafed him, by
Providence
,
in the discovery of that wondrous fountain in
the wildernesses of Florida.
THE VENETIAN BRIDAL.
The course of true love never did run smooth.
It was a glad day in Venice. The eve of the feast
of the purification had arrived, and all those maidens
of the republic whose names were written in the Book
of Gold, assembled, with their lovers, parents, relatives,
and friends, and in the ornamented gondolas repaired
a beautiful and joyous crowdto the church of San
Pietro de Castella, the residence of the patriarch, at
Olivolo. This was on the extreme verge of the city
its neighbourhood almost without inhabitants, and only
occupied by a few priests, whose grave habits and
secluded
lives had imparted an additional sombreness to
the naturally gloomy characteristics of the spot. But
it was not gloomy now. The day of St. Mary's eve
had come, and all was life and joy in the sea-republic.
The marriages of a goodly company of the high-born,
the young and beautiful, were to be celebrated, as was
the custom, in public. Headed by the doge, Pietro
Candiano, the city sent forth its thousands, and every
form of life was in motion to be present at the
festivities
.
Many hearts were throbbing with anticipated
joys; and the emotions of many a young bosom might
almost have been counted in the strong pulsation
evident
through the close pressure of the virgin zone.
But there were at that spectaclesome hearts
interested
7*
in the progress of the festival, who felt any thing
but gladness; and when girded in by thousands of the
goodly and the braveby golden images, and flaunting
banners, and proud symbolssome there were
untasteful
enough to desire escape from their overpowering
associations. As the fair procession moved on and up
through the gorgeous archways of the cathedral to the
altar, where stood the patriarch ready for their
reception
and the performance of the solemn rites, marked
you not one face more pallid, more tearful than the
rest? Is hers the emotion of joy? Is that tremulous,
that indecisive, that unconscious step, the indication of
a heart at easea fancy full and flowing with
imaginings
of delight? Is the tear now gathering in her eye
significant of gladness or of grief? It needs no second
look to determine. Francesca Ziani was going to the
sacrifice. A single glance over her shoulder, as she
passed along through the crowded assembly, fell upon
a noble cavalier, standing in an attitude of utter
abandon
at the entrance. There were volumes in that
glance, and Giovanni Gradenigo could not fail to
understand
it. There he stood, hopeless, helpless, in
utter despair, leaning upon the arm of his relative,
Nicolo Malipieri. He saw his own heart's grief in that
one glance of the unhappy maiden. They had loved
they still loved; but she was the victim of parental
authority
.
Giovanni was not the favourite of her father,
and, in an evil hour, the poor girl was destined for
sacrifice to the weak and wealthy heir of Ulric
Barberigo
.
The hour was at hand, and with a feeling little
short of desperation, Giovanni Gradenigo still looked
and lingered, even after all hope had departed.
I will not bear this, Nicolo, he exclaimed, at
length. I will make one effort more. They shall
not so lord it over true affections. Francesca was
mineshe is mine even now in the sight of Heaven.
How often have we vowed it. How often have our
vows been heard. Shall they not be blessed?Shall
they be thus defeated by that mercenary monster,
miscalled
her father? No! stand by me, Nicolo. I will
speak in this matter.
What would you do, Giovanni? exclaimed his
friend, interrupting his advance. How can you now
effect your object? Their names have been long since
written in the Book of Gold, and the doge himself may
not change the destiny. Let us go, my Giovanni, and
seek consolation in other charmsin more attainable
affections.
But he urged in vain. The impatient and passionate
youth heard or heeded not the advice, and put aside the
obstruction. Resolutely he advanced amidst the crowd,
gathered round to observe the ceremony which had not
yet begun. He made his way to the spot where stood
his Francesca, and a more deadly paleness came over
her countenance as he approached her. The crowd
gave way from before him, for he was beloved in
Venice; and as many knew in what course set his
affections
,
a tearful interest grew apparent in many an eye
at the fate of the young lovers. He stood before the
small circle of the parents and relatives of Francesca
and Barberigo, who, on his approach, had encompassed
her about. Gently but firmly he put them aside, and
approached the maiden. He took her almost lifeless
hand, which her mother would have withheld, into his
own, and his words were of a touching sorrow.
And is it thus, my Francesca, that I must look
upon thee? Is it thus that I am to behold thee
forgetting
thy virgin vows to Gradenigo, and yielding them
willingly, with thyself, to another?
Not willinglynot willingly, as I live, Giovanni,
not willingly. I have not forgottenI cannot forget
but would that you should forget, as I pray you to
forgive. My sin, believe me, is involuntary. I shall
love no other than you.
Falteringlyalmost faintingly, she thus articulated,
while a deeper interest grew up in the countenances of
all those around who could catch any portion of the
half-whispered dialogue. The parents would have
interfered
,
but it was not a moment in which they could
exhibit a stern heart, such as was too natural with
them; and there was that in the deep grief of the
defrauded
and defeated lovers which commanded respect
even in those bosoms most concerned in bringing about
this defeat. Calmly, therefore, almost sternly, Giovanni
spoke to the mother of Francesca, as she continued at
intervals to interfere.
Have you not enough, lady, in thus bringing about
your purposes? Is it not enough that you would have
her sacrifice herself and me: must she also be denied
the privilege of parting with one she must hold a part
of herself? For shame, lady, this is scarcely
becoming
.And
as he spoke, the more gentle spirits around
looked upon the stern mother with faces expressive of
a like rebuke. The youth continued, now addressing
the maiden:
And if you did not love this man, my Francesca,
why is it that you have so soon yielded to his
solicitations
and their commands? Had you not my affections
in keeping, and what right had you to sacrifice them?
Thought you not of me in that hour when you
consented
to this sacrifice of us both?
Hear me, and pity, if you cannot forgive,was
the sadly impassioned response of the maiden to the
severe speech of her lover. Hear me, Giovanni,
and blame me for my weakness, if you will, but doubt
not that I loved and must still love you
What is this you would say, Francesca?beware!
and the mother held up her hand in warning; and the
poor girl, as if terrified by some fearful association of
ideas, shrunk back, trembling and terrified.
The youth looked sternly upon the obtrusive and
stern parent, dropping at the same moment the hand of
the maiden, which till then he had retained. With a
melancholy, which promised to be not less lasting than
fatal, upon his countenance, he took a last look at the
unhappy victim of a like fate with himself, and slowly
turning from her, exclaimed: Well, Francesca! it is
then all over, and the hope for both of us is gone for
ever. Yet this I had not looked for. It had been my
hope that we should have been happybut now
She rushed towards him as he moved away. Her
hands were uplifted, and but a single and broken
sentence
escaped her lips, as she sank fainting upon the
floor. ForgiveOh! forgive!
He had gone.
Let us go, he exclaimed to his friend, as they left
the body of the crowd. I can stay here no longer
yet feel it hard to tear myself from the fascination of
her presence. God! I cannot breatheI am choking,
Nicoloundo my collar.
Thus incoherently exclaimed the noble youth, as a
sudden burst of music from the body of the church,
announced
the ceremony begun.
But the people had assembled for pleasure and a
spectacle, and though sympathising with the sufferings
of the lovers as largely as it is possible for the people
to do, they could not permit of any protracted
interruption
with any thing like patience. Sympathies are very
good, but must not be suffered to take up too much
time. So thought the Venetians, and accordingly the
little episode just narrated had scarcely been over
before
they insisted, by every means common to the
populace
,
upon the performance of those very ceremonies,
the prospect of which had made so miserable these two,
in whose fortunes they were so largely interested. The
ceremonies were begun. The doge led the way in the
procession, first, on behalf of the republic, assigning
portions to twelve young maidens, chosen for this
purpose
from amidst the mass of those not sufficiently
opulent
to secure husbands without. After this, advanced
the several couples, and tie after tie, and pledge after
pledge, was entered upon, while all the spectators grew
as deeply absorbed in the scene they witnessed, as if
they themselves were parties to each engagement. At
length, in turn, came the almost expiring Francesca
Ziani, and the wealthy but weak and worthless
Barberigo
.
Their approach again aroused the interest of all
who had beheld the previous scene between the
discarded
lover and herself. The bridegroom led the half
unconscious victim to the altar. The bishop began
the ceremonies, and called upon her to speak in
response
.
But she was spared the necessity of reply.
The doors of the church were burst open with a
tremendous
crash, and Barbaro, the pirate of Istria, and
his six brothers, heading a formidable band, who had
long fixed upon this ceremonial a rapacious eye, chiefly
on account of the great wealth accompanying it, now
rushed forward, with drawn swords, among the
affrighted
array. They had no scruples of conscience, and
soon dismantled the church of all its splendour. They
loaded themselves with the booty which the richly clad
dresses of the company afforded, the nuptial presents,
and the church ornaments; and, not content with this,
a greater sacrilege yet, they seized upon the trembling
persons of the young brides themselves. There could
be no resistance, for no weapons were permitted to
those engaged in the ceremonial; and in spite of the
tears of the maidens, and the vain struggles of their
lovers, the former were borne away at the sword's
point, by these ruthless men, and, hurried on board their
vessels, were soon out of sight of the almost
heart-broken
relatives and friends, from whom they had been
taken.
The cry reached the city, and soon all was in
commotion
there.
What are these clamours, exclaimed the
despairing
and gloomy Giovanni Gradenigo, as he rushed to
the lattice. These cries come from Olivolo, and tell
of something terrible. A gondola rushed down the
canal, and he called aloud to the gondolier.
Have you not heard, said the gondolier; and he
soon told the story. Giovanni cried out to his friend,
and rushed down to the harbour. There stood the
citizens, unknowing what to do, and hopeless of every
thing.
Why stand ye here? exclaimed Giovanniwhy
stand ye here? Come with me, gallant gentlemen
come on, brave cavaliersye who would strike for
Venice and he led the way to the galleys in the
harbour. Promptly taking command in the general
confusion, he pointed out the course, and having made
due enquiries, he gave the direction to steer for the
Lagune of Caorlo.
His whole appearance had been changed by this
event, and those who, heretofore, had only known him
as the despairing lover, the inanimate and inactive
dreamer of an ideal hope and home, now wondered at
the strong spirit, and firm and fearless audacity of the
confident man who had undertaken to lead them.
Though having greatly the start in the race, yet,
stimulated
as were the pursuers, by the strongest human
incentives
,
and led on by such a spirit as Giovanni, the
pirates could not but be overtaken. They are at length,
when they had begun to be hopeless of success, cheered
with the appearance of the hitherto unseen robbers.
First one bark, and then another, came in sight, until
the whole corsair fleet was before them, urging an
embarrassed
way through the intricacies of the
Lagune
.
Courage, bold hearts, cried the youth, we shall
soon be upon them. The pirates, in their haste, have
got entangled in the
lagunes
, and cannot easily escape
us. We shall soon be upon them.
The confident tone employed by their leader had an
electrical effect upon the sinews of his men. The
sturdy oarsmen grew cheered in their labour, with the
strong prospect of success attending it; and the knights
prepared their arms, and got themselves ready for the
conflict. And it came. They gained uponthey
hailedthey came up with the enemy. There was
little parley, and that was in tones of the fiercest fury.
Yield thee to the mercy of St. Mark! was the
shout of Giovanni to the pirate chief, Barbaro of
Istriote
.
St. Mark must strike well, before Barbaro shall
yield him tribute!
There was no other speech between them, and the
galleys grappled. The Venetians leaped on board
of the pirates, and their fury was little short of
madness
.
Their wrath was terrible, and they smote with
an unforgiving vengeance. The Istriotes fought bravely
as they had been accustomed, but every soul of them
fell. Their blood discoloured the sea in which they
perished.
The victors came back with their spoil, unharmed
and in triumph, and preparations were made, the same
evening, to conclude the bridal ceremonies, so
inopportunely
interrupted in the morning. The original
distribution
of brides was persevered in, with but a single
exception; for the Doge Pietro Candiano, with that
high exercise of authority, which at all times, in its
palmy days, distinguished the Venetian swaybut with
a sentiment of justice which found its sanction in
almost
every bosom, now determined to bestow the hand
of Francesca upon Giovanni, as the only equivalent
reward
for his gallantry and conduct in her rescue, and
8
his great service to the republic. But where was
Giovanni
?
The maid, blessed beyond her hope, awaited
him at the altar. But he answered not to his name,
and a herald was despatched in pursuit of him. At the
final moment, when, in the struggle with the pirates,
victory had crowned his enterprise, he had received a
severe wound from the axe of one of the brothers of
Barbaro, just as he had sent that much dreaded
chieftain
to his last account. He had strength barely to
behold and to shout his victory, when he sunk fainting
upon the deck of his vessel, and was borne out of sight
by his friend, Nicolo. He was now, at the summons of
the herald, borne, grievously wounded, into the
assembly
,
for each member of which he had done and
suffered
so much. The Doge declared his purpose, and
with fond heart, and eyes streaming with joy, his own
Francesca bent over him to confirm the glad
intelligence
.
But, with the consciousness of the sweet
fortune
that awaited him, the ear was conscious no
longer. The lips were dumb for everthe young
Giovanni
lay lifeless in the arms of the scarcely less lifeless
Francesca. It was a sad day after all, since its
triumph
came with so great a loss; but the maidens of
Venice still think, that there was more happiness for
the youth thus perishing, than would have come to
either of the surviving, if separated, lovers.
VASCO NUNEZ.
For the interesting adventures of this truly great warrior, the
reader is referred to that pleasant volume of Washington Irving,
The Companions of Columbus, where the chief features of this
sketch will be found narrated. The writer owes little of it to his
own imagination.
Triumphant, on a peak of Darien,
Perch'd on the narrow isthmus, there, he stood
A moment, ere he cast his eyes below,
And trembled in his awe. Beneath him roll'd
The broad Pacific, never yet before
Unveiled to European. What were then
The feelings of Balboa? Who shall tell
The struggling, deep, emotions of the soul,
So high aspiring, whento crown at last
The hope so fruitful in great enterprise,
And noble consummationon his eyes
Burst forth that mighty prospectthat deep sea,
In the virginity of its pure waves,
Unrifled of a charm, for the first time
Won to a mortal's armsor, who conceive,
When on the summit of that isthmus throned,
Higher than sovereign, and on either hand
Ranged the two sister seas, for the first time
Given to each other; he, that gallant chief,
Most noble and most valiant of the sons
Spain sent on this great service, stood alone,
And look'd upon his conquest? Who shall tell
The melancholy pride of his great soul,
When the achievement, long withheld, and won
Only by toil at lastthe fearless toil
Of true adventure and achievement great,
That greater grew from trialwas his own;
And, to a spirit as aspiring, he
Added a name and triumph, scarce below
That of the Admiral, who led the way,
First, in this path of glory. With glad eye,
And soaring sense, and spirit almost drunk,
In its excess of rapture, dumb he stood,
And gazed upon the waters. Were these, then,
The billows of that Indian sea, which clasps
In its capacious bosom, those broad isles
Of boundless, unimaginable wealth,
In gold and gems o'erflowing, locking in
The spices and the perfumes of the east,
The world of spoil, the field of enterprise,
Meet for that ocean chivalry, to whom
The sea and land, the wild, and wilder yet
The savages that sway them, have no bar!
Was this that glorious seaor, prouder still,
Had fortune yielded to his daring aim
Some lonely, lock'd-up ocean of the wild,
Some savage realm of water, undisturb'd,
Save by the Indian's bark, when, at the dawn,
He plunges through its silvery depths, unscared,
For the pearl oyster, and at eve returns,
Laden and glutted with his precious spoils,
To his lone wigwam by the reedy shore.
Such were the conqueror's dreams, yet not forgot
In his own triumph, was the God who gave
That sea, before a waste, untrod, unknown!
Bent knees, glad hearts, spoke audible the prayer,
Of that true band of warriors, as the cross,
Hewn in the tallest tree, was lifted up,
And stationed o'er their heads, whilst every eye
Grew pregnant with its tearssome upward turn'd,
To heaven, in thanks and gladness; many more
To the deep quiet waters at their feet.
Twas midnight, and the stars were in the heavens,
Each in his brightness. Not a single cloud
Dimmed their profusion, and upon that sea,
Curl'd into gentle billows, with a swell
Like the voluptuous heavings of the breast,
Of some fair princess of the burning east,
They show'd their countless and repeated lights,
With a most emulous glory. From the south,
Where it had wander'd the protracted day,
Amidst the profuse gardens of the wild,
And with their odours laden, whence it came
The gentle breeze, skimming the azure waves,
Rippled them into life, and bore them on,
With an incessant murmur, to the shore.
The reeds bent down to meet them, and gave forth
The tones of their united musicmeet,
In its unmeasured beatings, to the sense,
For that broad wilderness of sea and land.
Whilst each, from its ascent, gradual but high,
From hill to hill extending, meeting oft,
Above, and arching o'er the vales between,
The tall and spiry pines, through the still hours
Kept up their solemn chorus, chiming in,
Monotonous but meet, with the deep seas,
And the soft zephyrs floating o'er their breasts.
'Twas midnightbut the chieftain did not sleep
How could he sleep! The creature of his sleep
The dreams that so had wrought him for long hours,
And kept him wakeful many a night before
The vague conceit, the rich expectancy,
Of boundless conquest and unrivalled name,
That wrought his soul's ambition from the time
He first had dream'd of glory, were his own
The hope of a long life was realised!
8*
He was no more the creature he had been,
When boyhood was a season of delight,
And hope had many a semblance. When amid
The festive throng, for mirth and music bent,
At evening by the waters, or attuned
To a more fell employment, he was found
Rashly adventurous, daring still the first,
Where all were daringin the tented field,
Join'd in close combat with the tawny Moor,
A kingdom on his arm. The ruthless mood,
Indifferent to aught but valorous deed
And bloody retributionall were gone!
And in their stead a loftier spirit came,
Keeping him watchful. His advent'rous mind
Felt its own wing, and knew its strength at last
And soared into the heavens; and, eagle-like,
He brooded 'mong those mountains through the night,
And meditated with the matin chime,
His flight across the waters, where to lead
He knew not; but his dreams, his waking dreams,
Peopled the wilds beyond, with glorious forms
And empires of the sun. He too would give
To Castile and to Leon a new world,
And more than he, the mighty Genoese,
Another ocean with its tribute wealth,
And uncomplaining waters.
Thus the chief,
As with his sword upon the grass, he made
Unmeaning strokes, unconscious, mused alone
Not long alone, for on his shoulder fell
The weight of a strong hand, yet not in wrath.
He started from his trance. Beside him stood
One of the wise men of that soaring time
A spirit which, through abstinence and toil,
Long study, reachings vast and infinite,
And grievous penance, in its age had grown
Familiar with the stars. To him they were
Not less than spirits, for they did reveal
The future with the past. Unveil'd to him
They were all present; and in rocky cells,
In ruin'd castles, and secluded caves,
And from the crowd remote, he conn'd the page,
Nightly, of human story; and could read
All fortunes, and could conjure them at will
Into the secker's presence. Such was he,
Who, on the morning watch of that calm night,
Stood by the musing Spaniard on that peak,
The peak of Darien, and looked, with him,
Sad, on the new-found sea that lay below.
To him the chief, who paused awhile, thus spake:
Triumph, at last, old Cicer! All in vain,
The rocks, the woods, the mountain streams, and worse,
The drooping spirits of our wearied host,
And our own fears opposed us on our way.
These have we overcome, and Balboa now
May vaunt his conquests on the kindred page,
That shines with Colon's glory. Have I not
Given a new ocean to our monarch's crown,
A tributary world, a countless race,
And an unbounded, vast and nameless wealth,
Not to be number'd. Have I not outspread,
Even to the embraces of this foreign breeze,
That blossoms in its odour, come afar,
Doubtless, from gardens of the orient realm,
Hard by to Ophirhis unconquer'd flag;
And on this rock, beheld from either sea,
Planted the sacred standard of our faith,
The hallowed cross; in token that the wild
Is now the care of Christ, henceforth to be
The creature of his people?and yet more,
For his true honour, have we not outborne
The glory of the Spanish name and arms,
In perilous adventure, crowned at last,
Through heaven's sweet mercy, with complete success?
These, Cicer, cannot, shall not be forgot;
And Balboa's name, when he shall be no more,
Shall have its chronicler, and spell the ear,
And on the lips of story sound as well,
As any in his record. How will 't read,
With Vasco Nuncz de Balboa, to write
Colon the Admiralworld-finders both!
The Magian paused a space, and in his eye,
Where brightness, strangely mingled up with gloom,
Wore an appalling lustre, not unlike
Such as our dreams for spirit forms provide
A darker shade, a deeper, sadder hue,
And, it might be, a large but single tear,
Unbidden gather'd. Calmly then he spoke.
My son, at Palos, by the convent walls
Of La Rabida, your old mother dwells:
I saw her, when we last departed thence,
On this adventure. Not to me unknown,
The future, as you found it. You were then,
Already, known to gloryso men call,
Words from their fellow-menand 'twas her pride
To speak of you as all the country spoke.
I could not check the current of her speech,
Nor were it kind to do so; but aroused,
And ravished with the subject, when she grew
Wild with imagined triumphs and great spoils,
And all the gauds of fortune, in my heart
I sorrow'd for her strange simplicity.
I did not tell her that her eyes in vain
Would, till the sunset, o'er the waves look out
For her son's caravel. I did not say,
What, well persuaded, I might well have said,
That all your triumphs were to end at last
In a wild dungeon, and a bloody grave,
And ignominious scaffold
Nay, start not
It is my grief, as 'tis thy destiny,
That I should mourn for that I must foresee,
And thou escape not. Hearken, then, awhile.
Thou wilt remember, on our voyage out
I traced thy fortune. Thou did'st seek of me,
Its features, but thy quest I still withstood,
As aiding not thy service to be known,
And, haply, moving thy too soaring thought,
Too much to dwell upon it. But with me
It grew a settled study. From my art
Of which in praise I speak not, when I say
It has not fail'd me oftI linger'd o'er
Thy varying fortunes. Every step thou took'st,
Whether in peace or war, in court or camp,
In ease or peril, I beheld at large.
I saw thee trace thy journey to the wild
Thy each reversethy final, full success,
Until the mighty waters, which now roll
Incessant to our feet, proclaim'd thy fame;
And to the daring soldier gave the praise
Of calm forethought, deliberation wise,
And an intelligent sense, that all confirms
In this thy conquest. Here then are we now
So far, the fortune I have traced is true!
What more, what more? impatient, then, the chief,
Asked of the aged man. Let me know all
I do esteem thy art, and well believe
Thou lovest me as thy son. Thou wilt not speak
What 'twere not well to hear; and, well I know,
Thy wisdom, if ill fortune do betide,
May guide my wilder'd bark, and bring it safe.
Speak then at once, nor think that at thy speech,
Though fearful be its form, my soul shall quake,
Or my knees tremble. Let me know it all,
That I may battle boldly with my fate,
However vain the struggle, as becomes
A son of Spain, a warrior of the wild,
A spirit prone to combat with the seas,
And brave them at their wildest. Speak, old man;
Give thy thought words, and let my fortune stand
Before me on the instant.
The magian spoke:
When in the gather'd stars thy fate I read,
In one remote and solitary light,
I saw its bane and baleful influence.
A single star thus quartered in the heavens
Teem'd with malicious auguries, and shook
All fires malign upon thee. It was then
I sought its secret power, and early read,
That, while afar, in the extremest east,
It kept its foreign station, thou wert safe;
But when with daring wing it took its way,
And where the evening hangs her golden lamp
O'er the sun's chambers, shook its lurid fires,
That hour to thee was perilously dark,
And death, a bloody, ignominious death,
Was gather'd in its verge. That hour's at hand
Look forth into the west. Behold, apart,
From all communion with its fellow lights,
Where, with audacious blaze and angry beam,
That fate casts forth its fires. Redly it burns,
And, as exulting in the near approach
To the destruction of its victim, takes
A subtle halo round it. There are stars,
That to the eye of mortals seem but stars,
Yet are they evil spirits. Such is this.
They are not of the class with which they roam,
Their lights are not like those which burn around,
Nor have they the like genial influence.
They hold a fearful power o'er earthly things,
Man, and the worlds about him. O'er the earth,
And on the waters, they do exercise;
They have their moods, and bitterly at war
With all God's works, they seek for their annoy;
Impede their fortunes, or attend them on,
Even to success, as, with thee, this hath done,
That, when they hurl them down to the abyss,
The height shall be a perilous one they leave.
The gentler lights of heavenly providence
Shrink from their foul contagion, till they stand
Apart, and from the rest all separate.
Some they precipitate from their high spheres,
Leaping into their place; while the dethroned,
Extinguish'd in the deeps of all their light,
Find there a dwelling-place, to their new case
More apt and fitting. Such pow'rs have these
O'er men and stars, as these do err and shoot,
Out from their proper places. Over thee
Yon planet hangs its spell, and thou art mark'd
Its victim, surelyall thy triumph nought;
Thy spoils for other spoilers, and thy deeds
Nought valued, nothing doing for thy life,
But all against thee. Jesu be thy shield.
Ere many days, and he, who at that hour
Beheld himselfby all the world beheld,
The hero born for conquest and renown,
Died on the block. The crown had passed away
The moral was complete, and in the vast,
The utmost height of his unbounded sway,
And glorious triumph, far beyond compare,
Among his human fellows, Balboa died
A hero's glory and a felon's fate,
Closing a perilous life of many toils
And true adventure. The magician's dream
Was soothand he, whom worlds could not contain,
So vast his spiritwhose far-darting soul
Saw from its skyey pinnacle, the new
And boundless shores he conquer'dhe, the brave,
The gallant in renown, where all were brave,
Perish'd, unheard, unheedednot an eye
To weep his fortunes; not a single arm
To do his nature justice, and redress
The wrongs of men and nations. Thus he died
The world he conquered yielding hima grave!
THE DEATH OF A FAIRY.
With one, prone at any time to their encouragement
and acquaintance, nothing contributes more, while
enfeebling and prostrating all the other faculties, than a
warm fever, to the growth and strength of fancy and
imagination. An attack of this description, arising
from cold, taken in a recent indiscreet exposure, kept
me awake all last night, and rendered particularly
active and acute an imagination not apt to slumber
very considerably at any time. The night was one of
clouds and gloom, and fatiguing silence. I heard not
even a dog bark in the streets, and the ticking of the
clock was the only sound that for several hours came
audibly to my senses. At length, however, I should
say about one o'clock in the morning, I could plainly
distinguish something like a humming but suppressed
whisper, as of many voices confusedly but cautiously
employed in dispute, which seemed to arise at the
extreme corner of the chamber in which I lay. Then
my eye was attracted to a small glimmering which
flashed out at intervals, I had almost said and certainly
thought at the time, from the top of my spermaceti
candle, which stood centrally upon the mantel. From
the emission of light, however at periods, marked by
the usual unsteadiness of its pale and delicate sparkle,
I judged and judged rightly, after a moment's
reflection
,
that the gleam was that of a glow-worm, which,
by some means or other, had begun
To pale its ineffectual fires,
in the place of the more certain aid of my candle;
illuminating its own little sphere with a splendour,
which, though it could afford but little aid to my
observation
at any other time, served fully on this
occasion
to give me a perfect insight into the matters then
going on. Through its medium I could distinctly see,
that I was not, as I had been at retiring, the sole
occupant
of my chamber; but that hundreds of little
creatures, formed like human beings, though on a
scale of the most diminutive insignificance, were
busily employed in a variety of offices, within its
precincts, making every thing around them their own,
and behaving with as much familiarity and freedom in
the four walls, as if they, and not I, were the owner
and proprietor. Their tiny forms, clothed in gay
green vestments, were tinged and tinctured here and
there with spots of the richest gold and crimson, while
the light and gossamer wings, which depended with
an air of the most perfect spirituality from their
shoulders, approved them those gay creatures of the
element,
That in the colours of the rainbow live,
And play i' the plighted clouds.
Gradually the whole scene became developed to my
survey, and I could see that they were employed in
some great procession, at once of attraction and
solemnity
.
They formed a double circle, and performed
9
a variety of fantastic evolutions, which might be dances
for aught I knew of their habits and indulgences
chanting all the while, in a low but highly musical
accent, the following song, which, to my ear, savoured
of a most pleasing melancholy.
SONG OF THE FAIRIES.
Come in thy robes of quiet night,
With each attending spell around,
And let the wanton zephyr's flight,
Be pinioned to our fairy ground;
The stars shall bring each gracious light,
And music in the reeds shall sound.
Think'st thou that earth, alone for thee,
Poor jealous mortal, Heaven has made
Thou hast its rule and so have we,
With both our wills alike obeyed
Your sovereign sway by day you see,
For us hath night her charms arrayed.
Her maiden charms of stainless sky,
And odour'd breath, and wooing air,
And many a countless luxury,
Denied to bless your humbler sphere
Sweet spirits, too, when moons are high,
Descend from heaven to revel here.
Take thou the day, but to us leave,
The gentler hours of evening still
Your sterner spirits may not heave,
At wanton beam or rippling rill
Yet for each flower that dies, we grieve,
And dread its fate and mourn its ill.
Was this song intended for my ear? I thought so,
and did not think it improper, however imprudent it
might be, to look and listen. They did not dance
long, but dividing themselves into two nearly equal
bodies, they assembled directly in front, but yet at a
small distance from each other, drawn up in battle
array, and seemingly for the purposes of war. Some
were armed with the thorns of the orange-tree and
rose-bush
,
while the more common instruments of warfare
seemed to be the scented flowers of the one and the
buds and blossoms of the other. A solitary cricket
had been impressed into the service as a trumpeter by
the one side, who sounded his little bugle at intervals;
while on the other hand a parcel of cherry stones,
enclosed
within the outer rind of the walnut, answered
the purposes of the drum for the other, being rattled
by a dwarfish but giant-looking member of their own
lilliputian tribe. Thus prepared and directed, they
approached each other with a degree of fury more
characteristic of a fierce combat, and more determined
affray; and the conflict was waged with a degree of
ardour more like a
mele  outrance
, than one of sport
or courtesy.
Various were the results of the strife. Here a feeble
warrior, overpowered with innumerable rosebuds,
concentring
at the same moment on his person, would sink
down on the field, and the fight would be renewed with
aggravated fury above his body, as well with the view
of securing it from captivity on the one side, as to bear
it away as a trophy on the other. If the one party was
successful, the body of the unfortunate combatant was
borne from the field on a litter, woven together of vines
and leaves; and on the other, if the enemy proved
triumphant
,
chains made of blossoms of the pride of India
were put upon his hands, his wings were sprinkled with
dews, and sometimes clipped, and he was borne away
to a dungeon, made of a huge calabash, the entrance to
which was barred with spokes of cane and cedar. For
a long time was the battle continued, without any
apparent
advantage on either side. New fairies were
perpetually
arriving, joining themselves to one or the other
party, and, by this means, protracting the combat,
which, among those originally engaged, would
otherwise
have been settled completely. Mingled as they
were, by this time, together; having lost all the original
ardour in which they had begun, the fight had at length
settled down into an affair of so many individuals,
terminating
,
finally, in so many single combats, which
seemed to be waged with a more particular fury than
before. The feeling was now personal and less
general
.
Passions became concentrated and at work, and
the combatants chose those for their encounter against
whom they appeared to entertain some especial enmity.
I could plainly see that there were several of this
description
on foot; where such innocuous weapons as
rosebuds and orange blossoms, were made to give way
to the more formidable influence of pointed spears of
cane, or sharp thorns of various kinds; and some were
armed with lath whips or bludgeons, with which they
sought as well to disfigure as to maim their opponents.
Among these combats, my eye singled out one of a
nature
purely personal. The parties seemed to entertain
for each other a more than common degree of hatred
and dislike. The utmost malignity shot out from their
eyes, and was distinguishable in their actions; and,
disregarding
the rest of the combat, and all the scene
beside
,
saving and excepting the portions in which they
were necessarily engaged, they seemed to recognise no
other object than their entire destruction; nor did this
fury and singleness of purpose appear only to operate
upon and to affect the two. Whether it was that there
was a feud existing between them, known to their
nation
,
and which, like those of Scotland, had to be fought
out; or whether the novelty of their desperate fight
threw an air of ridicule and rebuke upon all others less
severe, I know not; but it was evident, that in a little
while they were the sole combatants on the ground, and
every interest of a more general nature was suspended
in the survey of the sharp controversy which they
contrived
to carry on. Nothing could exceed the skill,
seemingly, with which they pursued the combat.
So far as bodily prowess was concerned, they
appeared
pretty equally matched, and it was left to their
respective knowledge of the
science
to determine the
affray. Their skill seemed perfect; and from the ease
which characterised their actual style of fight, it was
difficult to guess, how, unless some unpropitious
circumstance
should throw its weight into the scale, it could
be decided. The helm, the shield, the curved shoulders,
and closed wings, alternately shrunk beneath the
severity
of their several blows, which, though they seemed
to stagger the party receiving them, exhibited no
wounds and drew no blood. This might be owing
in part to their defence, and partly to the excellence
of their guard. Sometimes, suddenly unclosing their
silky wings, they would whirl away into the air, to
9*
alight only the more unexpectedly before the
antagonist
,
changing the ground, and in hope to take him
upon advantage by the surprise. But their efforts did
not seem productive always of the proposed results;
for, to speak in just terms of their cunning in the art of
fence, if one did exhibit a surprising degree of activity
and skill in this flight, the other seemed not the less
well prepared to encounter and to foil him. But the
parties
grew sensibly weaker, more irritable, and less
guarded than before; and at length, when I least
expected
the affair to terminate, or terminate in this way,
the larger and more robust of the two, in a moment's
inattention, and by a sudden backstroke of his enemy's
bludgeon, received a severe blow on the arm, and with
a slight shriek from the excessive pain, let fall his
weapon, and stood at the mercy of his opponent. This
condition of things now brought the whole array once
more to loggerheads; particularly as the more
successful
champion, following up his advantage, brought his
wounded opponent to the ground by a second stroke,
even more severe than that which had disarmed him.
The fight was just about to recommence, when I thought
it high time for other parties to interfere, and
recollecting
that it was an old faith among the vulgar, that
water was an effectual barrier against the passage of
fay or fairy, I resolutely and somewhat desperately,
stretched my hands forth from the bedside, to where
stood my wash-stand, and seizing upon the ewer,
conveniently
filled with water, I took deliberate aim at the
two combatants, who stood apart from the rest. At
the first hiss of the water one of them took to flight,
but the wounded champion, unable to move, was
certainly
and suddenly soused all over, and a complete
stream thrown around him, preventing access from any
of his companions. I had no sooner achieved this feat,
than I was forcibly impressed with all its fearful
consequences
.
There is no class of spirits, of the earth,
earthy, so revengeful, so troublesomely revengeful,
according to the faith which recognises their existence,
as the fairy. They are renowned for their tricks upon
travellers, housekeepers, particularly old maids and
bachelors, and spinsters of a certain age. They tease
old coquettes, and worry young ones. They pinch the
sleeping wife, newly married, and rouse her and her
young lord up, more frequently o' the long nights than
is altogether consistent with their health and quiet.
But, why enumerate? Every body has read that fine
fancy of Mercutio,
Oh, then I see Queen Mab hath been with you,
She is the Fancy's midwife, and she comes,
In shape no bigger, &c.
If every body has not read it, every body ought to read
it, and they lose who do not. But, as I expected, the
toil and turmoil was now only about to begin. Certain
it is, the whole fairy tribe were in the utmost tremor
and tribulation for the fate of their companion thus
taken in the toils. The rival armies forgot all further
contention, and united their forces for his extrication
all but the champion by whom the prisoner had been
overthrown. His malignity seemed more particularly
to have been marked and specific, from his conduct on
this occasion. He paused but a moment to survey the
condition of the prisoner, and I thought I could
discover
something like a grin of delight on his sharp and
speculative features; then taking wing, he passed out
of my sight, but in what manner or direction, I could
not at the moment discover.
There was now a tremendous buzzing and shuffling
in my chamber; all was doubt and deliberation among
the petty people. In their whisperings I thought I
could make out, every now and then, the hundred
half-formed
plans proposed for the liberation of their
comrade
,
all proving ineffectual, however, for they did
nothing towards it. Now the chairs would creak and
rattle beneath the weight of half a dozen of them,
endeavouring
,
in this way, to behold the predicament of
their companion, which otherwise, through the dense
mass collected around him, they could not have seen.
In the mean time, what with his leaguer and his bruises,
the captive himself uttered at intervals a low
complaining
murmur, like the sighing of the winds through
some decaying crevice in your shutter. A sad,
zephyr-like
sigh, the dreamy faintness of which was quite as
touching as the grief in which it might be supposed to
have its origin. But to their plans for his extrication.
First they collected all their roses, and endeavoured to
bridge a way for him over the water, by which he might
escape without touch or taint from it; but the leaves
became penetrated with a strange susceptibility, and
the poor gladiator appeared to suffer so greatly from
his wounds, that assistance was necessary to bring him
out of the difficulty by a force independent of his own.
In the effort to pass to him, it was discovered that those
making the effort stood no small chance of incurring a
life forfeiture; the heavy liquid, penetrating with its
dank influence the silky and gauze-like texture of their
wings, and leaving them also at the mercy of the cold
and cruel creatures of the earth. It would be
impossible
for me to describe the many efforts, the
indefatigable
energy, and determined adherence to their purpose,
exhibited by the little creatures on this occasion.
Unwavering
,
however, as they were, it was soon
discovered
that their efforts must be vain, unless the party
whom they sought to free could co-operate with their
labours. This, from the severity of his injuries, he
could not do, and their purpose was not now so much
his release, as their revenge upon him who was
particeps
criminis
, in thus placing him
hors du combat
. I
soon perceived, from sundry demonstrations, that my
turn was at hand, and I prepared for it accordingly.
Unfortunately, in my previous hurry in making my
prisoner
,
I had squandered away more water than was
necessary, and had put it entirely out of my power to
fence myself in from attack, by a wall of it around me,
which I might have done. With some of it in reserve,
at least, I might have kept them in salutary check from
the awe which it would have necessarily inspired. But
they came to the attack, unobstructed, and in fearful
array. A sort of chiming howl, which, though not
louder than the chirping of a cricket, excited a
considerable
degree of nervousness, preceded their advance,
and led me to many disagreeable anticipations of what
was to come. At length their batteries were fairly
opened, and siege commenced in regular form.
Heaven
only knows, I cannot remember, and certainly
would not pretend to describe, the many terrors which
they employed for my punishment. At one moment
my ears were assailed with the hummings as of ten
thousand musquetoes, gaunt wretches, whom the
winter
had exhausted of blood, and who now came with
their accursed bugles and suckers to my veins for their
replenishment. Then their fangs, darted resolutely
into my cheeks and nose, rendered it imperatively
necessary
that I should thrust myself entirely beneath the
coverlid and trust to it for protection; but in covering
my head rather too hastily, I left my feet bare, and the
invading army only transferred themselves from one
extremity to the other. Having secured these
members
also by a familiar contraction of the knees, I
conceived
myself perfectly secure, when to my utter
astonishment and horror, I heard them taking the
screws out of my bedstead, one by one, with a fearful
rapidity; and found the old posts, originally none of the
surest, tottering as well under their additional weight as
from my tremors, and promising a speedy dissolution.
In the mean time another strong body had seized upon
the bedclothes, and by concerted arrangement, was
drawing them entirely from my person. This was
quite too much. I made a desperate effort, leapt
out of the bed, and seizing my clothes, endeavoured to
put them on. But here again the mischievous urchins
had been at work, and had performed, with singular
ingenuity and haste, that peculiar operation upon them,
which is known among swimmers as a trick practised
upon the clothes of those who are in the water, by those
who are out of it. My linen was in fifty knots, my drawers
in no less; and when I attempted to put on my pantaloons,
I discovered the legs filled with stockings, vest,
neck-cloth
,
and slippers, in such hostile confusion as to create
an awkward question in my mind, whether or not I
might ever calculate on their extrication. I was at
this stage of the conflict, and in this perilous condition,
when, all on a sudden, a shriek burst upon my ears, so
piercing yet not loud, shrill yet not unmusical, so
pleasingly
delicate, and yet conveying an idea of so much
agony, that I felt the blood curdle in my veins, and the
hair stood upright and bristling from my cold and
clammy temples. I recovered my position in bed, and
resumed my covering. The enemy had left me, and
all further attack seemed given over. They had a new
object of interest, and of far deeper consideration. The
shriek we had heard was from my captive, and they now
surrounded him in his death agony. They recognised
the peculiar cry of pain and of approaching
dissolution
;
and, by some effort, whether of him or of
themselves
,
he had been removed from the prison, within
which I had placed him. Supported on a layer of young
leaves, they busied themselves in finding either
restoratives
or sedatives of some kind, and in their own way,
but seemingly in vain; for, with a gentle sigh, that
seemed
like the faint echo of distant music, he breathed his
last in the arms of those immediately attending him.
The glow-worm dropped from the place from whence,
through all the time, he had directed their revels with
his light, and was seen no more; but the faint tramp of
their footsteps, as if they were marching in order, and
a low strain, that rose at intervals like a dirge upon my
ear, told me of the great loss they had suffered, and of
the grief that attended even upon the death of a fairy.
A STORY OF THE SEA.
This is a mystery of the deep sea,
Please you to hear it? You will marvel much,
For he that made it hath a mighty power,
Calling up wond'rous forms and images
Art cannot compass.
It was on a pleasant day in the month of September,
that I received a notification from the captain of a
small vessel, in which my passage for a distant port
had been engaged, apprising me of his intention to
sail immediately. I had been already delayed for
some days, the wind being in our teeth; and, though
still loth, as all young travellers usually are, to leave
home for the first time, the suspense and impatience
from waiting had been such, that the hurrying call had
the effect of something like a pleasurable reprieve
upon my mind, and I instantly obeyed it. A few
moments
sufficed to complete my preparations, and in two
hours all hands were on board; and the little
swallow-like
packet, under outspread wings, and a clear and
beautiful sky, was rapidly leaving the land. We had
but two passengers beside myself, both equally young,
and equally new to the perils and mysteries of the
sea; and, for a moderately long voyage, the prospects
of enjoyment were rather more limited than was
desirable
.
We were soon conscious of our mutual
dependence
,
and accordingly we entered into a determination,
each of us, to do our little for the common comfort
and gratification. What with striding the narrow
deck, half the time in the way of one another
watching
the land of our birth-place and homes fast receding
from our eyes, and calculating, with many doubts, the
various chances of our voyagewe contrived, as may
be supposed, to get through the first day very
amicably
,
and with tolerable satisfaction. We were now
fairly at sea. The plane of ocean became rapidly
undulated and more buoyant. Broad swells of water
bore our bark like a shell sportively upon their bosoms,
then sinking with equal suddenness from beneath, left
it to plunge and struggle in the deep hollows, until
borne up by other and succeeding billows. Space and
density, in glorious contrast and comparison, were all at
once before us, in the blue world of vacuity hanging
and stretching above, and the immense, seldom quiet
and murmuring mass spread out below it. The land
no longer met our eyes, though strained and stretched
to the utmost. The clouds came down, and hung
about us, narrowing the horizon to a span, and
mingling
gloomily with the surges that kept howling
perpetually
around us, growing at each moment more and
more threatening and restless. Not a speck besides
our own little vessel was to be seen amidst that wild
infinity, that, admirably consorted, was at once beneath,
above, around, and about us. Two days went by in
this manner, with scarcely any alteration in the
monotonous
character of the prospect. Still the weather
was finethe clouds that gathered between, formed a
shelter from the intensity of the tropical sun, and, in
10
that warm time and region, were a positive luxury.
But, towards the evening of the third day, there was a
hazy red crown about the sun as he sunk behind the
swell in our fronta curling and increasing motion of
the black waters rushing impetuously forward to the
wild cavern into which he descendedthe wind
freshened
,
and took to itself a melancholy and threatening
tone, as it sung at intervals among the spars and
cordage
;
and, while it continued of itself, momentarily, to
change its burden, appeared, with a fine mystery, to
warn us of a yet greater change in the aspect and
temper
of the dread elements, all clustering around us.
The old seamen looked grave and weather-wise, and
shook their heads sagaciously, when questioned about
the prospect. The captain strode the deck impatiently
and anxiously, giving his orders in a tone that left little
doubt on my mind, of a perfect familiarity, on the part
of the ancient
voyageur
, with the undeceptive and
boding
countenance of sea and sky. Night came on,
travelling hurriedly, and cloaked up in impenetrable
gloom. The winds continued to freshen and increase;
and, but a single star, hanging out like hope, shot a
glance of promise and encouragement through the
pitchy and threatening atmosphere. The prospect was
quite too uncheering to permit of much love, or many
looks on the part of fresh-water seamen. By common
consent, we went below, and, ransacking our trunks,
were enabled to conjure up a pack of cards, with
which, to the no small inconvenience of our captain,
we sought to shut out from thought any association
with the dim and dismal prospect we had just been
contemplating. He did not, it is true, request us to
lay aside our amusement, but he annoyed us
excessively
by his mutterings on the subject. He bade us
beware, for that we were certainly bringing on a storm.
He had seen it tried, very often, he assured us, to
produce
such an effect, and he had never known it fail.
His terrors brought us the very amusement for which
he was unwilling we should look to such devilish
enginery
as a pack of cards. We had not needed this,
to convince us that the seaman was rather more given
to superstition than well comported with the spirit of
the age. He was a Connecticut man, thoroughly
imbued
with blue laws, Cotton Mather, &c. and all the
tales of demonology and witchcraft, ever conceived or
hatched in that most productive of all countries in the
way of notions. He lectured us freely and frequently
upon his favourite topic, on which much familiarity had
even made him eloquent. We encouraged him in his
failings, and derived our sport from its indulgence.
Believing fervently himself every syllable he uttered,
he could not understand our presumption in doubting,
as we sometimes did, many of the veracious and
marvellous
legends of New England and the Sound,
which he volunteered for our edification; and when at
length, convinced of the utter impossibility of
overthrowing
what, no doubt, he conceived the heresy
of our scepticism, he appeared to resign himself to the
worst of fates. He evidently regarded each of us as a
Jonah, not less worthy of the water and whale than his
prototype of old; and, I make not the slightest
question
,
would have tumbled us all overboard, without a
solitary scruple, should the helm refuse to obey, or the
masts go by the board. His stories, however, I am
free to confess for myself, and I may say for my
companions
also, however our philosophy might be
supposed
to laugh at the matter, had a greater influence
upon all of us than we were willing to admit to one
another. Upon me, in particular, the impression
produced
was peculiar in its character. Not that, for a
single moment, I could persuade myself, or be
persuaded
by others, that the mere playing of any game
whatever could bring down upon us the wrath of
heaven
,
or hatch a fiendish form upon the deep, but
naturally disposed to live and breathe only in an
element
of fiction and fantastic change, I drank in every
thing savouring of the marvellous with an earnest and
yielding spirit. He seemed to have been born and to
have lived all his life in a witch element. He had
stories, filled and worked by this principle, of every
section of the world in which he had sojourned or
travelled
.
Had seen the old boy himself, in the shape of
a black pigeon, in a squall off the capes of Delaware;
and once, on the night of the twenty-seventh June, had
himself counted the phantom ships of the British fleet,
under Sir Peter Parker, as they were towed over the
bar of Charleston, in South Carolina, to the attack of
Fort Moultrie. What seemed to vex him most of these
things was, that the Carolinians, whom he pronounced
a most obstinate and unteachable race, refused to
believe
a word of the matter.
But his favourite legend, and that which he believed
as honestly as the best authenticated passage in
Scripture
,
was that of the flying Dutchman, who was driven
out of the German ocean; and in process of time, and
for some such offence, was doomed to a like travail
with the wandering Jew. This identical visionary he
had seen more than once, and on one occasion had
nearly suffered by speaking him. It was only by dint
of good fortune and bad weather that he escaped unseen
by that dreadful voyageur, to be noticed by whom is
peril of storm, and wreck, and utter destruction. It
was of this dangerous sail he had now to warn us. We
were told that this sea, and almost the very portion
which we now travelled, was that in which the
Dutchman
,
at this season, usually sojourned for the exercise,
with more perfect freedom, of his manifold vagariesa
power being given to him, according to our worthy
captain, for the due and proper punishment of those
who, when his spirit was abroad upon the waters, dared
to palter and trifle in idle games, sport and buffoonery.
The voyager evidently apprehended much; and, as the
gale freshened, his countenance grew more gloomy,
and his words more importunate in reference to those
levities and sports which we had fallen into. To pacify
him we forbore, and were compelled to refer to other
resources for the recreation we required at such a time.
There were three of us, and we told our several stories.
The youngest of our trio was young indeed. He was
tall, slender, graceful; eminently beautiful, a highly
intelligent mind, and a finely wrought and susceptible
spirit. He was deeply in love, truly devoted to the
young maiden; and the short time contemplated to
elapse before they should again meet, was one of great
and bitter privation. Becoming intimate from the
circumstances
of our situation, and probably from certain
innate sympathies, we learned all these particulars from
his own lips. He described the charms of his mistress,
10*
gave us the entire history of his connection, his hopes,
and fears, and prospects; and, in turn, we were equally
communicative. His name was Herbert.
The storm increased, and with so much violence,
that we were fain to go upon the deck, impatient of our
restraint below, though by no means secure, even with
ropes and bulwarks, and a tenacious grasp above. I shall
never forget the awful splendour, the fearful, the
gorgeous
magnificence of that prospect. In the previous ten
minutes the gale had increased to a degree of violence
that would not permit us to hang out a rag of sail, and
the vessel, under her bare poles, was driving down upon
and through the black and boiling waters. Nothing
was now to be seen but the great deeps, the vast and
ponderous bulk and body of which groaned with its
own huge and ungovernable labours. Horrible abysses
opened before us, monstrous and ravenous billows
rushed
after us in awful gambols. Mountains gathering
upon mountains, clustering and clashing together, threw
up from the dreadful collision tall and spiry columns of
white foam, that keeping their position for a few seconds
would rush down towards us, like some god of the sea,
bestriding the billows, and directing their furies for our
destruction. Under such impulses we drove on, with
a recklessness fully according with the dread spirit that
presided over the scene; now darting through the
waters, occasionally rushing beneath them, then
emerging
and throwing off the spray, that shone upon the
black and terrific picture, in a contrast as grotesque
as the tinsel ornaments upon the robe of a tyrant, in
the thick of a battle, or at the execution of thousands.
On a sudden our course was arrested by a mountain of
water, under which our vessel laboured. She broke
through the impediment, however, with a fearful
energy
.
Another sea came on, which we shipped, and
the bark reeled without power beneath the stroke. I
was thrown from my feet, and seized with difficulty by
the side, the water rushing in volumes over me. Again
she sprung up and righted, but with a shock that again
lost me the possession of my hold. At that moment a
shriek of agony rushed through my senses; and
immediately
beside me a passenger, one of my companions,
torn from his hold, was swept over the side, into the
unreturning ocean. He passed but a foot from me, in
his progress to the deep. How terrible was his cry of
deathit will never pass out of my memory. He
grasped desperately at my arm as he approached me.
He would have dragged me with him to death, but I
shrunk back; and his lookthe gleam of his eyeits
vacantly horrible expression will never leave me. The
vessel rushed on, unheeding; and I saw him borne by
the waves buoyantly for many yards in her wake before
he sunk. He called upon Heaven, and the winds
howled in his ears, and the waters mocked his
supplications
.
Down he went, with one husky cry that the
seas stifled; and the agony was over. That cry brought
a chilling presentiment to my heart. Despair was in it
to all. Though I seemed to live under a like influence,
there was a degree of strange recklessness even in
our scrupulous captain, for which I could not, and
indeed
did not seek to account. I felt assured we could
not long survive. Our vessel groaned and laboured
fearfully; her seams opened, and the waters came
bubbling
and hissing in, as if impatient of their prey. Still
she went on, the violence of the storm contributing to
the buoyancy of the billows, and aiding her in keeping
afloat. But, amidst all this rage and tumult, this strife
of warring and vexed elements, there was yet one
moment
in which they were under an universal calm; one
awful moment afforded, seemingly by the demon who
had roused the tempest, that we might be enabled
adequately
to comprehend our situation. The feeling in
this extremest moment was the same with all on board,
with no exception; and one unanimous prayer went up
to heaven.
It was but a moment. The winds and the waves
went forth with redoubled violence and power. There
seemed an impelling tempest from every point of the
compass. Suddenly, a broad and vivid flash of
lightning
illuminated the black and boiling surges;
lingering
upon them sufficiently long to give us a full glance
of the scene. Immediately in our course, came on a
large and majestic vessel. She had no sails, but
pursued
a path directly in the teeth of the tempest. She
came down upon us with the swiftness of an eagle.
Her decks were bare, as if swept by a thousand seas
we were right in her paththere was no veering, no
change of courseno hope. The voice of the captain
rose above the tempestit had a horror which the
storm itself lacked. It spoke of the utter despair
which was the feeling with all of us alike. The
flying
Dutchman, was all he could say, ere the supposed
phantom was over us. I felt the shocka single crash
and crew, cargo, vessel, allwere down, crushed
and writhing beneath its superior weight, struggling
with and finally sinking beneath the exulting waters.
But where was she, the mysterious bark that had
destroyed
usgone, gone! no trace of her progress,
except
our broken fragmentsour sinking hopes.
There had been no time for preparation or for
prayer. The fatal stranger had gone clean over, or,
indeed through us; and, though sinking myself, it
appeared
to me that I could see her keel, with a singular
facility of optical penetration, cutting the green
mountains
behind me, with the velocity of an arrow. Around
me, scattered and sinking with myself, I beheld the
fragments of our vessel, together with the struggling
atoms of our crew and company. Among these,
floating
near me, on a spar, I recognised the fair and
melancholy
features of young Herbert, the passenger,
whose love affair I have already glanced at. I felt
myself
sinking, and seized upon him convulsively. The
spar upon which he rested veered round, and, grasping
it firmly, I raised my body to the surface. He felt
conscious
of its inadequacy to the task of supporting both
of us, and strove to divert its direction from me. But
in vain. Neither of us could prove capable of much,
if any generosity on such an occasion, and at such a
time. Our grasp became more firm; and, while death
and desolation and a nameless horror enveloped every
thing in which we were the sole surviving occupants,
we were enemies, deadly and avowed enemieswe,
who had exchanged vows of the warmest friendship
to whom our several hopes and prospects had been
unfolded
with a confidence the most pure and unqualified
we sought each other's destruction, as the only hope
in which our own lives could repose. He appealed to
me with tearsspoke of the young girl who awaited
himthe joys that were promisedthe possibility of
both surviving, if I would swim off to a neighbouring
spar which he strove to point out to me. But I saw
no spar; I felt that he strove to deceive me, and I
became
indignant with his hypocrisy. What was his love
to me? I laughed with a fierce fury in his face. I
too had loves and hopes, and a wild ambition, and I
swore that I would not risk further a life so precious in
so many ways.
The waters seemed to comprehend our situationa
swell threw us together, and our grasp was mutual.
My hand was upon his throat with the gripe and energy
of despair; his arms, in turn, would about my body.
I strangled him. I held on, till all his graspings, all his
struggles, and every pulsation, had entirely ceased.
My strength, as if in close correspondence and
sympathy
with the spirit that prompted me, seemed that of a
demon. In vain did he struggle. Could he hope to
contend with the fiend of self, that nerved and corded
every vein and muscle of my body? Fool that he was,
but such was not his thought. He uttered but a single
namebut a brief wordthrough all our contest.
That name was the young girl's, who had his pledges
and his soulthat word was one of prayer for her and
her happiness; and I smiled scornfully even in our
grapple of death, at the pusillanimity of his boyish
heart. I had aspirations, too, and I mocked him with
the utterance of ambitious hopes. I told him of my
anticipated triumphs; I predicted my own fame and
future glory, and asked him the value of his worthless
life, in comparison with mine. He had but one
answer
to all this, and that consisted in the repetition of
the beloved one's name. This but deepened my frenzy
and invigorated my hate. Had he utterred but one
ambitious desirehad he been stimulated by one
single dream of glory or of greatness, I had spared his
life. But there was something of insolence in the
humility
of his aim that provoked my deepest malignity.
I grappled him more firmly than ever, and withdrew
not my grasp, until, by a flash of lightning, I beheld
him blacker than the wild waters dashing around us.
I felt the warm blood gush forth upon my hands and
arms from his mouth and nostrils, and he hung heavily
upon me. Would the deed had not been done.
Would I might have restored him; but the good spirit
came too late for his hope and for my peace. I shrunk
from my victim. I withdrew my graspnot so he.
The paroxysm of death had confirmed the spasmodic
hold, which, in the struggle, he had taken of my body.
My victory was something worse than defeat. It was
not merely deathit was the grave and its foul
associations
its
spectres and its worms, and they haunt
me for ever.
We were supported by the buoyancy of the ocean
alone, while under the violence of its dread
excitements
;
and I felt assured that the relaxation to repose
of the elements, would carry us both down together.
Vainly did I struggle to detach myself from his grasp.
Freed from one hand, the other would suddenly clasp
itself about my neck, with a tenacity only increased by
every removal. His face was thrust close into mine
the eyes lit up by supernatural fires glaring in my own;
while the teeth, chattering in the furious winds, kept up
a perpetual cry of deathdeathdeathuntil I was
madwild as the waters about me, and shrieking
almost
as loudly in concert with the storm. Fortunately,
however, I had but little time for the contemplation of
these terrors. The agony of long suspense was spared
me. The storm was over. The spar on which I
floated, no longer sustained by the continuous swell,
settled, at length, heavily down in its pause, and
without
an effort, I sunk beneath the waters, the corpse of
my companion changing its position, and riding rigidly
upon my shoulders. Ten thousand ships had not
sustained
me under such a pressure. The waters went
over me with a roar of triumph, and I felt, with
Clarence
,
how horrid 'twas to drown. Even at that
moment of dread and death, the memory of that vivid
picture of the dramatist came to my senses, as I realised
all its intensely fearful features in my own fate. What
was that fate? The question was indeed difficult of
solution, for I did not perish. I was not deprived of
sense or feeling, though shut in from the blessed air,
and pressed upon and surrounded by the rolling and yet
turbulent waters. For leagues, apparently, could I
behold
the new domain in which I was now, perforce, a
resident; the cold corpse still hanging loosely but firmly
about my shoulders. I settled at length upon a rock of
a broad surface, which in turn rested upon a fine
gravelly
bed of white sand. Shrinking and sheltering
themselves in innumerable crevices of the rocks around
me, from the violence of the storm that had raged above,
I was enabled in a little time to behold the numberless
varieties of the finny tribe that dwelt in the mighty seas.
Many were the ferocious monsters by which I was
surrounded
;
and from which I was only safe through the
influence of their own terrors. There were huge
serpents
,
lions, and tigers of the ocean. There roved the
angry and ever hungry sharkhis white teeth, showing
like the finest saws, promising little pause in the
banquet
on his prey. There leapt the lively porpoise
there swam the sword-fish, and galloped the sea-horse.
They were not long in their advances. I saw the
sea-wolf
prepare to springthe shark darted like an arrow
on my path, and, with a horror too deep for expression,
I struck forth into the billows, and strove once more for
the upper air. A blow, from what quarter I know not,
struck the corpse from my shoulders, and was spent
upon my head. My body was seized by a power, in
whose grasp all vigour was gone, and every muscle
relaxed
.
On a sudden, the entire character of the scene was
altered. My enemies assumed a new guise and
appearance
,
and in place of fish, and beast, and reptile, I
perceived myself closely surrounded by a crowd of old
and young ladies, busily employed with a dozen
smelling
bottles, which they vigorously and most industriously
employed in application to my nostrils. Where was I?
Instead of a billowy dwelling in the sea, I was in
possession
of the large double family pew in the well-known
meeting-house. I had never been to seahad not killed
my companionwas not drowned, and hope never to
be; but the whole affair was a vast effort of
diablerie
a horrible phantasm of the
incubi
, got up by the foul
fiend himself, and none other, for my especial exposure
and mortification. The old ladies told me I had been
11
trying to swim in the pew; the young ladies spoke of an
endeavour to embrace the prettiest among them; the
gauntlike, however, most charitably, put it down to a
spiritual influence; as (
entre nous
) doubtless it was.
So much for taking late dinners with a friend, drinking
my two bottles of Madeira, and going to a night
meeting
,
when I should have gone to bed.
THE BROKEN ARROW.
The execution of the brave but unfortunate, and
perhaps
deluded, Indian chief, Mackintosh, by his infuriated
countrymen, is perhaps within the familiar recollection
of most readers. The term Broken Arrow, is here,
in their own figurative modes of expression, made to
apply to that warrior, from the fact, that a portion of
his adherents came from the section of country,
principally
under his control, and which was generally known
by the name of the Broken Arrow country.
Mackintosh
was the victim of a popular commotion. His
influence
with the people was beyond comparison or
rivalship
,
and he presumed upon it to enter into a treaty
disposing of the lands of his nation without the
concurrent
votes of his colleagues in power. A party of two
or three hundred, led by Menaw, Mad Wolf, and other
leading warriors, took the work of retribution summarily
into their hands. They sought him out at his own
residence
in the neighbourhood of Coweta. The first
intimation
which he had of their attack, was their summons
to surrender. Mackintosh was as fearless in battle as
he was politic in council, and scorning any idea of flight,
throwing on his hunting-shirt and weapons, he, at once,
though with a perfect knowledge of his danger, made his
appearance, and was about to address them. But his
enemies knew the danger of such a permission too well
not to arrest it at the outset. His eloquence was
prodigious
,
and its effect upon the peopleupon a people
of savages too, who are, more than any others, subject
to its influencewas, of course, matter of apprehension
and fear to the rival leaders, whose great object was his
destruction. Before he could utter a sentence,
therefore
,
he was shot through the head by Mad Wolf, a fierce
warrior of considerable talent, who had called
Mackintosh
forth, and who, as he fired, told him to prepare to
die by the law he had himself made and himself
violated
.
The followers of Mackintosh, a considerable part
of the nation, compelled to emigrate after this event to
the west, are supposed to have joined in the dirge which
follows.
A voicea voice of wail. The forest rung
With a strange cry of sadness, and a song
Of sorrow mixt with triumph. There they come,
A thousand warriors of the uncultured wild,
Chiefs of the old domainthe solemn waste,
Deep woods and waters drear. They gather now,
To the performance of a solemn rite,
The parting from their homestheir fathers' homes,
The graves of the past ages. Yet, no tear,
Swells in that sad assemblagesad, but stern
'Twere vain and weak to mourn the destiny
That tears may not avail, nor plaints avert,
Nor moaning lighten. Yet a cause of wo,
Not deeper than their parting, yet most deep,
Rests in the midst before them. The brave chief,
The warrior, and the arrow of their tribe,
Swift, strong and terrible, to whom their hearts
Were given in homage, and whose eyes had been
Their guides and watchers, now, among them lies,
Cold and insensible. He will lead no more,
Their arms to battle. He will teach no more
Their thoughts in council. He will be no more
The father he has been. Well may they wail,
For broken is the arrow from their bow,
The mighty overthrown, that still o'erthrew,
And had no fear of the struggle. All is o'er,
And the last song of burial they must yield,
The song of death and glory to the brave.
Ye warriors who gather, the brave to deplore,
And repine for the chief ye shall witness no more,
Let the hatchet of fight still unburied remain,
Whilst we joy in the glory of him that is slain.
Unbounded in soul, as unfearing in fight,
Yet mild as the dove when untempted to smite
In battle the tiger, in peace the young fawn,
Whose footstep scarce brushes the dew from the lawn.
Stood he not in the thick of the battle's array,
When their warm blood like rain o'er the smoking grass lay,
And the Seminole chiefs from his tomahawk fled,
While the best of their warriors before him lay dead?
And long did their women in deep sorrow mourn,
Looking forth for the braves who could never return
For their scalps the full swell of his legs had embraced,
And his women had woven their teeth round his waist.
But vain were his triumphs, since now we deplore
Our sorrow begins, for his battles are o'er
His last song was heard on the hills by the day,
But at midnight its echoes had faded away.
Far down in the valley when evening was still,
We heard the deep voice of the wolf on the hill
And hark! said the Arrow, when starting to go,
Is not that the screech of Menaw, my foe.
11*
He comes not, the coward, to mingle in fight,
Whilst the red-god stands by and looks down with his light,
But in darkness, that emblems his bosom's own hue,
He sneaks to perform, what he trembles to do.
The chief took his rifle, and whetted his knife,
And went down to see where the wolf was at strife:
There came up a clamour of death to the hill,
And the echoes return'd it, and then all was still.
And the chieftain lay dead in his gore, but his hand
Still clung to his knife, tho' it stuck in the sand
They dared not approach him, even dead as he lay,
And they bore not the scalp from his forehead away.
Let us fling not aside, since the arrow is lost,
The bow which we kept at such perilous cost
We can fit a new shaft to its string, when afar,
And go with the Sioux and Dog-skin to war.
Farther westfarther west! where the buffalo roves,
And the red-deer is found in the valley he loves
Our hearts shall be glad in the hunt once again,
'Till the whiteman shall seek for the lands that remain.
Farther westfarther west! where the sun, as he dies,
Still leaves a deep lustre abroad in the skies
Where the hunter may roam, and his woman may rove,
And the whiteman not blight, what he cannot improve.
One song, to the home that we leave, of regret
'Tis the song of a sorrow, but no eye is wet
One song for the hills and the valleys, and one
For the arrow now broken, the nation undone.
Farther westfarther west! it is meet that we fly,
Where the red-deer will bound at the glance of an eye:
Yet slowly the song of our parting be sung,
For the arrow is broken, the bow is unstrung.
HAIGLAR.
A STORY OF THE CATAWBA.
Yet shall the genius of the place
Reveal the story of their race;
And Fancy, by tradition led,
Explore the river to its bed
Each savage rock, each hill and dell,
Shall find its fitting chronicle.
The Catawbas, now a miserable tribe of some three
hundred persons, occupying a territory of fifteen
square miles, in the upper part of the state of South
Carolina, was, at one period of American history, the
most chivalrous of all the savage nations. To the
warmth and courage of the southern character, they
added all the capacity of endurance peculiar to the
north; and among the Indians, bore a reputation,
which, for their qualities, had no competitor among
them. They were a lively, generous people, and fast
friends and allies of the Carolinians when the infant
white settlements were surrounded on all hands by
deadly enemies. The Carolinians were not ungrateful,
and have nothing with which to reproach themselves
in their treatment of this people. They have been
maintained in the state with a tolerance at once due
to humanity and former service, and grateful to the
now decaying but once powerful nation.
Many are the stories told of the Catawba, calculated
to do them credit for valour, enterprise and generosity.
The traditions, still preserved of them, are numerous,
and sufficiently lively and interesting to keep them in
memory. That they have not found their way into
print must be attributed rather to the want of the
novelist than the novel; rather to the deficiency of
bard than subject. They relate a story, among others,
of a young chief, who, though acknowledged to be
brave and manly, had nevertheless for a long time
failed to distinguish himself. His name was Haiglar.
His nation was at war with the Shawnese, and the
strife was waged with a deadly hostility between them;
but Haiglar joined not in the fray. Party after party
went forth upon the war-track, but Haiglar loitered
behind among the smoke of the cabins; and engaged
in no more perilous adventure than the bear-hunt.
He joined neither in the toil of war nor the song of
victory; and the field and the council and the dance
alike failed to attract the spirit of the nimble-footed
and strong-armed Haiglar. Still his courage was
unquestioned
.
They had seen it too often tested beyond
doubt or denial. They had beheld him in the fight.
They had seen him win the spoils, and secure the
honours of victory; and while they lamented his
inaction
they failed to discover the motive. The chief
incentive to the Indian's valour being his personal
glory, his feats have a selfish origin. This being the
chief characteristic impulse among them, the
patriotism
of Haiglar was never arraigned; and perhaps,
under no circumstances would have been, unless,
indeed
,
the very existence of his nation was endangered.
This was not the case in the present instance, and
Haiglar went not forth upon the war-track.
But where did Haiglar go? What course did he
take when he bent his steps from the cabins at dawn,
and with his hunting knife at his side, and armed
only with his bow and well-filled quiver, entered into
the forest, and returned not that day, or late at night,
or after the lapse of many days. He brought home
game most usually upon his shoulders when he did
return
,
but that was no hard task for the well-known skill
of the hunter; nor was it ever known in his more early
years that his spirit was so over-fond of the pleasures
of the chase, particularly when the glory of war was
to be acquired. Let us follow his steps.
It was a bright day in early spring that the young
hunter passed out of his clay cabin, and buckling his
knife to his side, took his bow from the caves of his
humble dwelling, and passed out of the town, that still
lay silent and in repose. He bent his way, seemingly
without a care for concealment, yet cautiously and with
a heedful regard to the slumbers of its inmates. He
was soon behind the precincts of the village, and the
forests thickened around him in their solitary yet
seductive
grandeur. Onward did he pursue his way,
looking neither to the right nor the left; and though
the sluggish turkey, roused from his slumbers by the
approaching footfall, started up at his side, scarcely
giving a glance at the affrighted and retreating bird.
Sometimes a squirrel leaped from the tree before him
to one more remote; and now the bleatings of the
young fawn, just left by the doe, struck his ear, yet he
turned not aside. His spirit seemed not to recognise
these interruptions; though, perhaps, his physical senses
fully comprehended them. For an hour or more did
he thus tread the mazes of the forest that thickened
around him more deeply at every step; and in this
travel had he, with the swift foot common to the
Indian
,
proceeded many miles. He had penetrated into a
choice secluded amphitheatre of nature, formed by
large and umbrageous trees disposed in a circle, when
he suddenly paused in his journey, as if it were at an
end. And so it was. A shrill whistle brought him a
companion, beautiful as a star, in the Indian
imagination
.
A light and rather diminutive form emerged
from the cover of the woods, in a direction opposite
to that at which the young hunter had entered. Her
step was free and ethereal. Her figure approached the
delicacy of the white maiden when most delicate, and
if the brown of her skin was darker, there was a
southern
glow and freshness upon it, and an eye shone
above it with a lustre that amply redeemed the dusky
loveliness of cheek and forehead. Her dress was
primitive, but served to conceal a form of even more
perfect symmetry than it is our lot usually to encounter
in the walks of civilisation. She was, indeed, the
beauty of her tribe; but this tribe was the Shawnee,
the deadly foe to the nation of her lover.
This may account in part for the absence of Haiglar
from the war path of his people; yet only in part, for
the father of Marramatt (that was the maiden's name)
was rather an outskirter of the Shawnee, and in no
good odour among them, He obeyed their laws,
attended
their council, joined them in the chase,
sometimes
in battle, but yet had little sympathy with them,
and they less confidence in him. To what causes this
relationship was owing it is not over important we
should know; it is enough that it was as we say,
and that from the operation of causes but partially
known even to his people, old Cunestoga found it
politic and proper to leave the usual shelter and
clanship
of the town of his tribe, and pitch his abode in
the beautiful natural retreat in which we have found
him. His wigwam was embowered still deeper in the
recess of the amphitheatre, upon whose proscenium, if
we may be permitted so to style it, Marramatt went
forth at morning to meet the embraces of her lover.
We can readily imagine the difficulties placed, by
this condition of the parties, in the way of the lovers.
They could not form their union in the presence of
their people. Haiglar could not take his bride to his
own wigwamnor call his children by his name, nor
be head of his family with the daughter of one
who fought with the war party of their enemy, and
who rallied at the war-whoop of the subtle Shawnee.
Nor, on the other hand, could the maiden take her
lover into her father's wigwam, and break the mystic
wand of union and perpetual love before him. The
Catawba was as odious in the sight of the Shawnee, as
the Shawnee in that of the Catawba. The barrier was
impassable between them. Still, the embarrassment of
the situation had its charm, and the mystery of their
loves almost compensated for all other privations.
She hung upon his bosom in the dim forest, and asked
for no witnesses; and we question whether there would
have been any addition to the happiness of Haiglar,
from the belief that his whole tribe was looking down
upon his love. The selfishnessthe jealous
exclusiveness
of their situation, was itself a luxury to them.
They had watchers however. Haiglar had not
always
gone to his place of assignation unobserved and
unsuspected; nor had the charms of Marramatt been
without admirers. There was in her own tribe a youth,
who without any positively bad, was yet unpossessed
of any known good qualities. He was a tolerable
warrior and a sightly personage. His valour and
person
,
however, were not remarkable; and the love
which he proffered to Marramatt, with the sanction
of Cunestoga, her father, had gone unregarded. He
had not ceased to love altogether, but he had also
learned to hate. In foregoing his professions,
therefore
,
he did not forego his claims; and if he did not as
frequently show himself to the beauty, he contrived,
nevertheless, to keep her most commonly in his sight.
It was not long, therefore, before he discovered the
amour of our lovers. He discovered, and his anger
was doubly roused in finding in his rival the enemy
of his nation. He more than once had raised the
arrow
to his eye for the destruction of Haiglar, but he
feared to injure the girl, or he dreaded the dangers of
an abortive attack, or he desired a moment, when, from
circumstances, he might secure all advantages to
himself
,
from the destruction of his foe.
The leaves rustled and there was no windnot a
breath of air, and the stir was sudden and momentary;
not continued, as when the turkey runs from his cover.
The chief started upon his feet, while Marramatt
sat upon the long grass, and looked up anxiously in
his face.
I hear sounds, my beloved; there are those upon
my track who mean me no good: and he leaned his
ear to the ground, yet he heard nothing but the ripple
of the rivulet. Still, with the native caution of the
Indian, he tightened the belt at his waist, in which were
stuck his knife and tomahawk. He threw the loop of
the unfrayed sinews, which made his bowstring, over
the elastic yew, and prepared for any interruption. He
waited not long. Emerging at the same moment from
the woods, at equal distances around him, he beheld
the approach of a party of Shawnese, more than twenty
in number, among whom the rejected lover of
Marramatt
was conspicuous. He paused for a second, as
if in hesitation, but seeing that they intercepted his
course homewards, he sprung off for a hollow rock in
an oblique direction, a few miles distant. The
swiftness
of foot, for which he was renowned, stood him in
stead; and the light hunting dress of the Catawba gave
him also great advantage. Thus fleeing, however, he
kept up a running fight with his pursuers; and, by his
aim, and skill, and swiftness, he contrived to slay seven
of them before they were enabled to surround and take
him. They carried him in sad triumph to their
country
.
He had filled them with shame and grief; yet the
proverbial respect for valour which the savage
entertains
,
compelled the utmost respect and consideration
for their captive. But this could not save him from his
fate, and they condemned him to the fiery torture.
With a wild parade they took him to the place of
punishment
,
which lay near the banks of the Salutah river.
He was unpinioned, for they had so beaten and
maltreated
him, and he had suffered so much from want of
12
food and the wooden stocks which had been placed
upon him, that it would have argued pusillanimity in
his captors to have shown apprehensions of his escape.
But Haiglar was not the warrior to perish thus. His
Indian education had taught him better; and while a
Christian would most probably have resigned himself
with prayers and tears to his fate, this brave warrior
was thinking of his freedom. They approached the
place of torment, and commenced their preparations.
When most employed, however, with a sudden and
powerful effort he dashed aside those who stood in his
way, and plunging into the river, swam like an otter
underneath the current, rising only to take breath. He
soon made the opposite shore and ascended its banks.
But he had no time for delay or hesitation. His
enemies
were on his heels, running every way in pursuit of
him, and discharging their poisoned arrows. The
heart of the Catawba never yet failed him. He replied
to their cries by shouting the war-whoop of his tribe;
and cheerily urging his way, without pause or
misgiving
,
he soon took the lead of his pursuers. But the
Indian does not readily give up the pursuit, and it was
now a point of honour which deeply interested their
pride, to punish the Catawba who had worked them
such injury, and had so eluded their vigilance. They
pursued him all daytill night. Five of them were in
advance of their fellows, and at midnight they paused
in a small hollow of the woods for slumber and
refreshment
.
The Catawba, knowing his speed, took his
ease, and knew more of his pursuers than they of him.
He felt the pursuit relaxed, and was anxious to
ascertain
the cause. He began to retrace his steps, and
came within sight of their encampment. He beheld
their repast, and watched them sink down to repose;
and hungera wolfish hunger, and revenge, and the
pride and passion of his nation came upon him, and he
bent his way down from the jungle where he had been
concealed, and placed his feet firmly among his enemies.
They were all in deep sleep around him. Fatigue
had drawn largely for repose upon their senses, and
they fell easy victims to the fury of the famishing
Catawba
,
with their own tomahawks, for they had taken
away his arms. He destroyed them all. He stripped
them of their scalps, selected arms for himself, and
partook, till refreshed, of the dried meats and parched
grain which had been left from their repast. He had
still a large distance to travel, for they had taken him
to the bosom of their tribe; so, setting off afresh, he
pursued his way to his own nation in a sort of running
march, resting by nights against a tree, and employing
every moment of the daylight in his perilous journey.
The residue of his pursuers, coming up to the place
where he had slain the five, in terror gave up the
pursuit
.
They set him down as a wizard, and concluded
it wise to have nothing further to do with him.
At length the old scenes came up before the eye of
the warrior. Here was the hill and here the grove,
and at the turn of the next coppice, and beyond the
next elevated ground, he would come upon the
wigwam
of his beloved Marramatt. He knew the strong
heart of the Indian maiden, accustomed to a life of
peril; yet he felt that the grief of his beloved was not of
easy relief, and his steps grew more cautious, and his
heart throbbed more quickly, as he approached her
habitation. He entered the deep forest with light
footstep
.
He trod in the bed of the running water, and on
the short grass, and paused every now and then to see
that all was safe in his path. Thus did he come at
length to the small inner grove that sheltered the
habitation
;
and timely was his arrival, for the savage chief
whom Marramatt had rejected, stood before her in
insolent triumph, and her father lay bound and bleeding
at his feet. One of his creatures stood at his side,
ready to obey his bidding, and keeping close watch
above the body of the old man, who lay silent and
uncomplaining
,
though in pain and not speechless. The
girl pleaded for the life of her father, whom Onomatchee
brutally threatened, except upon the condition which
she as firmly continued to withhold. At length he
raised his uplifted tomahawk, and placed his heel upon
the bosom of Cunestoga. The girl threw herself upon
the body, and raised her uplifted arms in its defence.
The hatchet was, in fact, descending, when a swifter
arm than his, anticipated the blow by another, and the
skull of Onamatchee was cloven by the tomahawk of
his rival. In a moment the grasp of the avenging
Haiglar was upon the surviving Indian, who, with sullen
ferocity, avoiding his own defence, buried his knife in
the bosom of the old man at the very instant that
Haiglar's
entered his own. And now the young warrior
forbore not the conflict with the Shawnee. He went
not now into the dim forest on the trail of turkeys, but
a young maiden sat singing on his wigwam floor,
through the long day, of the swift foot, and the strong
arm, and the brave true heart of her own Haiglar, the
young king of the Catawba.
THE MENTAL PRISM.
FROM THE GERMAN.
What strange creatures of the element are we! How
sadly dependent upon the adverse influences of sunshine
and shadow; how curiously moulded to receive and obey
their impressions, and follow the tendencies they so
imperatively
prescribe. In the one we luxuriate with a
champaigne exhilarance, that has something little short
of madness in it. The other, on the contrary, tramples
us down into a feverish morbidity and gloom, that
renders
it a matter of little difficulty to establish the some
time propriety and utility of suicide. A zephyr from
the south woos us blandishingly into the arms and
endearments
of summer; while a little after, a rugged
northeaster compels us to wrap up in a hundred weight
of fearnought, or shrink sullenly and savagely into a
dark chamber, over a coal fire, with a dense and
unwholesome
vapour stifling and strangling all the choice
and generous spiritings of our more natural impulses.
The clouds gather about and overspread us, and we slink,
tiger-like, into our dens and deserts, from whence, with
the ready elasticity of the lizard, upon the first glimmer
and glance of the sunlight, we rush forth in thousands
to bask in his beams.
It is not so much a need of the body as a
requirement
of the mind, which compels us to recognise and
obey these opposite influences. By their several and
12*
successive exercises, a happy and healthy temperament
is provoked and brought about, each influence acting
upon and modifying the other. Nevertheless, the
thousand
love the sunshine, to the one who seeks the shade;
and in this they duly defer to the great principle which
regulates nature. The mind has, in all cases, a tendency
to light. The eye looks and longs for the daylight, as
devotedly as the lover for his mistress, or the
imprisoned
bird for the freedom of the blue air and high
dominion
;
and yet how differently do men esteem it! No
two look upon the elements alike. Your sun is by no
means mine. Your shade is cold and repulsive to me.
The stream in which you bathe with delicious delight
has a freezing complexion; and the long rambles which
you take by moonlight are my utter aversion. Let us
illustrate the case by a dialogue, which came to my
ears a few days back, when you were declaiming poetry
to your looking-glass, in the back parlour, and I was
enjoying a lunch and bottle in the refectory. The
parties were our two friends, Walsten and Mordaunt;
the antipodes, as you well know, of each other. Walsten
begins, prefacing his remark with a pinch of snuff, the
sternutatory operation of which, for twenty minutes,
appeared
to derange and disorganise his very system of
vitality.
Walsten
. How beautiful, Mordaunt, is the nature
around us. How cheering is the sunshine. How
enlivening
its gracious influence. The stir of the day, the
buzzing confusion and lively hum of life and
employment
,
are grateful indications of its presence. We go
abroad and bask in it, in all our colours of rejoicing;
and with its generous influence thousands of the
light-hearted
and the gay are gathering about us. The clouds
are all dispersed, the rains are over, the atmosphere
of gloom and chillness has made way for a more benign
and invigorating freshness and warmth; and innocence
and beauty and youth acknowledge, by a hearty
unanimity
of smiles, the pure and pleasant feeling of
cheerfulness
and joy, which its presence not less indicates
than inspires. Nor does it come alone to the gay and
the light-hearted. To the sad and the sick, to the old and
infirm, it carries a welcoming and reviving grace. No
bars may shut it out. The prisoner feels it in his
dungeon
,
the slave glows with it in his chains. It descends
upon the bosom of the labourer, and his heart leaps
more lightly in his, than in the bosom of the monarch,
wielding the destinies of a thousand thrones. No earth
is denied its presence, and every water is gladdened
with its beams. In the deepest wilds of North America,
shooting up the mighty and far-stretching Mississippi,
in his overburdened pirogue, the bold hunter beholds
with rapture its coming splendours, darting through the
thick foliage above him, cheering his spirit and
directing
his prow. The wanderer in the desert and upon
the ocean; the pilgrim, whose feet are wounded by sad
travail among the sharp rocks; the exile, with no eye
to mark his progress, and no heart to sympathise with
his fortunes, gathers from its beaming promise, the
countenance of an ever-watchful and presiding God.
He feels, too, that the same beam that warms the
wayfarer
in the wilderness, blesses the cottage of his
boyhood
;
his heart goes back with it to all his distant
affections
,
and the warmth of that imaginary association
gives him renewed courage to pursue his way.
Mordaunt
. How tedious and untrue are all these
raptures. The sunshine is very good in its way, perhaps,
but I do not like it, and you give but one view of its
influence
.
You forget to speak of the miasma which it
calls up, fatal to human life and happiness, from fen
and forest. You say nothing of its burning heats, which
invariably give me headach, and frequently fever. You
overlook entirely the thousand plagues which it
engenders
during its summer reign; its flies and its insects,
that buz in your eyes, and fill your throat, and dip their
filthy wings and legs in the very dainties you so much
delight in.
Walsten
. You are an incorrigible monster: nothing
gives you pleasure. You quarrel with every thing and
every body. Does not the wine-cup sometimes offend
you?
Mordaunt
. Yes, when it has a spider in it. If I look
upon things gloomily, Walsten, and distrust the
semblance
of life more frequently than yourself, it is
because
my experience is something more than your own.
You are for ever describing nature as a rosy-cheeked
girl, decked out in her bridal habiliments, and panting
with scarcely repressed anticipations at the altar. To
me she appears a stale and cunning old maid,
bedizzened
with paint, concealing her yellow complexionnot to
speak of the thousand wrinkles that mark her faceand
with artificial roses in her no less artificial locks. She
is, doubtless, as highly delighted as yourself with a garb
and decorations so holiday-like, yet they have been
turned and trimmed ten thousand times already for as
many persons. The green garment she wore, just so
festooned and perfumed, coloured and worshipped, even
before the time of Deucalion. For centuries her
larders
and liquors, her fruits and flowers, have been
furnished
from the table of death; and the colours of which
her cheeks are made have been ground from the decay
of her own children, from whose dust comes her dazzle,
from whose bones emerge her beauties. How know
we in what company we are now walking? May not this
wide arena, spreading and circling us about, be the
sepulchral
dwelling-place of your ancestors and mine? May
not the same winds which bear us the fragrance of yonder
lindens, be impregnated with the ashes of Arminius? Do
you not feel it even now in your nostrils? Yon rivulet,
from which you are perpetually quaffing, with a delight
to me unaccountable, may have concealed and rotting
at the bottom the bones of your great-grandmother or
mine. It matters not which, there is perhaps but little
choice now between them. The soul which spoke a
philosophy
you hold so fine in the skull of Socrates, the
spirit that prompted the fine visions of Plato, may even
now give life to yon reeling follower of Sardanapalus.
The transition, be assured, is not great, from the high
and dreamy morality of the one to the voluptuous theory
which taught the abuse of the present hour in
apprehension
of its loss. Is the picture a comic one, that
your laughter grows irrepressible? I see nothing to
occasion
merriment.
Walsten
. Pardon me, Mordaunt, but I do. Your
phiz and philosophy alike are irresistibly comic, and
suggest some farther speculations in a corresponding
humour. How, if our bodies, according to the notion
you entertain of the soul, should undertake, in a like
manner
,
to wander through an infinity of ages? What, if
after death, they are compelled to continue the same
functions, though perhaps in a different form and figure,
as when under the guidance and direction of a soul?
Mordaunt
. What draw you from your proposition?
I am not quick-witted, you are aware; you must provide
me with steps to your problems.
Walsten
. Do you hear the melody of the bird which
sings over us. It is not a melody, perhaps, in your
ears, but you hear it?
Mordaunt
. I do; it has been croaking in concert with
yourself for the last half hour, and with as little method.
Walsten
. May she not have arisen from the urn of
Tibullus, whose song was as loving as hers? Having
won his spirit, she deserts his tomb, and repeats the
tender melodies, which he taught in life to humanity.
Perhaps a Pindar soars triumphantly, in the form of
yon towering eagle, to the communion of the blue
heavens. Some atom of the rose-lipped Anacreon may
prompt the wanton zephyr, which so audaciously stirs
the ringlets of yon bright-eyed damsel; and to be more
minute, for your satisfaction, who knows that the
bodies
of extravagant lovers are not now flying in subtle
flakes of hair-powder, through the locks of their
surviving
mistresses? Will you pretend to say, having your
theory seriously at heart, that the doubly-dried bones of
the dead usurer are not now chained down in the rust
of a hundred years over the money-chests he so loved
in life, and yet left, unenjoyed, behind him? Nor should
this species of retributive justice be withheld from all
other kinds of offenders. Would it indicate an
inappropriateness
of justice, were the bodies of those in life
afflicted
with that worst madness of all, the
cacoethes scribendi
,
transmuted into types, and woven into goodly
reams of foolscap, groaning for ever under the
printing-press
,
which they so often made to groan in eternalising,
along with their own, the nonsense of their successors?
To deal further in these analogies, my dear Mordaunt,
would be to find you, some hundred years hence,
wailing
with the melancholy whippoorwill, in the seclusion
of an American forest.
Mordaunt
. Will you never be serious, Walsten; not
even in your examination of the mysteries of truth and
nature? How do you propose to make your discoveries,
with your intellect perpetually convulsed with
laughter
?
Walsten
. True; in such a situation and mood, I
should do little towards the attainment of knowledge;
but, with as much reason, may I ask what shall be the
extent of your progress in the same labour, if your eyes
are perpetually obscured with tears?
Mordaunt
. Your philosophy is a strange one, indeed,
if the nature of things, and the existence of truth, which
should be immutable, is susceptible to such influences
as spring from the sad or merry heart or
countenance
?
Shall wisdom become a pawnbroker, and
accommodate
her stores to the necessities or the humours
of her neighbours? At this rate, a jaded stomach will
destroy a people, a pampered appetite overturn a
dynasty
;
a glass of wine give immortality and adoration to
a gang of highwaymen. If, in our pursuit of
philosophy
,
so much depends upon our humours, I shall be
glad to know in what humour do you propose to set out
in your search after truth? For my part, I am at a loss
to see in what respects the gloom of my habit unfits me
any more than the mirth of yours to undertake the
search.
Walsten
. Not less, perhaps: the extremes touch, but
at points equally foreign from the proposed object. They
are both, perhaps, equally unfit, inasmuch as they give
their complexion to, and necessarily alter that of the
objects they survey. We see through a false medium,
and see nothing rightly. The glass is dark with you and
dazzling with me, and both of us are blind in
consequence
.
If, however, yours be the preferable mood for
the search after truth and the acquirement of wisdom, I
should prefer to be perpetually at fault. I would not
willingly be wise, or even happy, on such conditions.
Mordaunt
. Happy! that is another of the slang
words which, without any definite signification, the
herd of public teachers and common hearers so
commonly
employ. Pray, what do you mean by happiness,
and by what process do you propose to attain it?
Labour
,
you say, is the condition of life; wisdom its
purpose
or mean, and happiness its reward. Miserable
delusion; superstition worse than Egyptian; calf
worship
,
bull worship, snake worship! You see
momentarily
,
thousands and thousands of men and women
spreading their gala sails on the summer day and sea
in the silly pursuit. Happiness dwells, say they, a
queenly beauty, on that bright and blessed island.
There they go, fleet after fleet, whirling in the
unavoidable
and necessary circle; coming back for ever to the
point from which they departed, or battered to pieces
on rocks and quicksands. Of the survivors of the gang,
in reference to their destination, and its attainment,
you may well exclaim,
apparent rari nantes in gurgite
vasto
. You see them, after a long and fruitless labour,
swimming to the shore with difficulty, or carried down
the stream to the unreturning floods of eternity. This
is the pursuit of happiness, and these are they, poor
adventurers, that worship and seek for the coy divinity,
whose existence is in their diseased and morbidly
foolish
fancies alone.
Walsten
. You describe truly the pursuits of the
erring, and I am not ready to deny that such are the
majority of mankind, since the sole aim of life is to
learn how to live.
Mordaunt
. To die, rather.
Walsten
. Well, to die, if you prefer it. But it does
not follow because men take the wrong road to the
temple, that it does not therefore exist. To this the
lawyers would unhesitatingly say,
non sequitur
. But,
before giving you my idea of the what and whereabouts
of happiness, permit me to ask, even if these mariners
fail in reaching their port, has the voyage itself no
beneficial results, no advantages?
Mordaunt
. None that I seeunless, perhaps, you
refer to the pleasures of viewing what small poets and
painters call a fine landscape, in the teeth of storms,
and seas, and shipwrecks, and death. If such a
prospect
sufficiently compensates to your mind, the
privations
,
perils, and perplexities that come with it, I am
free to say your notion of human happiness and mine
if I have anymost essentially differ.
Walsten
. They certainly do. The pursuit has
something
in it, as it relieves that monotony of existence
which necessarily comes with a life, such as yours,
passed without risk or excitement; and, if the
adventurers
13
do miss the main end of their embarkation, they
occasionally make out to acquire something which, in
part, rewards them. All the views of men are
generally
extravagant; and they perhaps do well, in the
way of tradeputting it on the most business footing
we canif their returns for their adventures reach to
one half the amount of their proposed profits. Shall
I, my friend, failing to find the rose of my search,
reject
the violet which offers itself to my hand? Shall I
quarrel with the choicest airs of May, because a
thunder-cloud
sometimes conflicts with them? The day is
beautiful now, but to-morrow it may be stormy. Shall
I brood over the contingency in gloomy anticipations,
while I utterly disregard the pleasure in my grasp?
Mordaunt
. Pleasure again. Can you never speak
without the employment of words having no definite
idea? But you promised me a definition of what
people
mean by the phrase happiness. I would see what
is the stuff out of which you propose to make it.
Walsten
. I promised you my notion, and not that of
any body else. That I am willing to bestow upon you,
in the hope of its doing something to make you more
contented with your neighbour and yourself.
Mordaunt
. You are charitable, at least, and I cannot
do less than pay all attention. Proceed.
Walsten
. The leading error, then, in my mind, under
which the great human mass appear to labour, in the
search after and desire for happiness, is the proposing
to themselves the pursuit of some one single object.
At the commencement of life most men set out with
this distinct proposition in view. They choose some
prominent and select roadaim at some individual
goal and objectperhaps difficult of access, and the
attainment of which only proves the real object of
desire
,
as far off and utterly unapproachable as ever.
Mordaunt
. This is what I have always said. In
what do you propose to amend the error of the herd?
where lies the difficultythe mistakewith them?
Walsten
. The mistake lies in the proposition itself,
since no single pursuit in life can be carried on, unmet
by controlling and counteracting circumstances, which
invariably thwart and divert from the course; and in
the end compel us to leave it. Of course, you know,
that human happiness, under such influences, must be
of a nature subject to many qualificationssince hope,
one of the prime incentives to human impulse,
presupposes
a certain discontent with the present condition,
and a desire for its change, in one or many respectsa
feeling directly adverse to that Arcadian felicity and
undisturbed
content, which forms, in the beau ideal of the
poets, the state and quality of genuine happiness. It
is not of this condition that I would speak. The
happiness
of man, such as he should seek in this life, is a
state of hopes and cravings, as free from contigencies
as they can be made consistently with his own and the
nature of things around him. Such a state, it appears
to me, is rather the consequence of a successful and
harmonious combination of circumstances, than the
overcoming of any one difficulty, or the successful
search after and attainment of any given end or object.
The attainment of such a temper of content, as without
rejecting the presence of an active and unsleeping hope,
at least takes from it all unreasonable and exaggerated
elevation of aim; and, if not of easy attainment, is, at
least, not likely, in the event of defeat, to leave the
mind in a state of morbid and diseased prostration.
Such a mood can only arise in the mind by a careful
economy of the affections and the emotions: a close
consideration of what is worthy of, and available in,
pursuit
.
Indeed, it is in happiness as in money making
you must take care of the sixpences if you want to have
control over and to make use of the pounds.
Proposing
a moderate aim, and we are neither so liable to
overthrow, nor apt to feel it so sensibly. The life of
the child is made up of the momentary and occasional
pursuit of trifles; and his enjoymentsI may say his
happinessfor the time, depend entirely upon his
success
in their pursuit. Then, if we analyse them closely,
we are but children of a larger growth, and more
advanced
period, and call for toys, simply increased in
proportion to ourselves; and, I take it, that a close
and economical attention to the little things of being,
would be far more likely to result in the due attainment
of the object of desire, than any single plan which the
mind may propose,and for a very obvious reasonthe
man who has spent twenty years of his life in the
pursuit
of one road to happiness, is very apt, when he
discovers
himself in a desert, and the delusive
oasis
retreating from his eyes as remotely far as ever, to lie
down despondingly and die. He despairs of success
he dreads to retrace his stepsindeed he cannotand,
if he diverges into other paths, he only involves himself
in intricacies which baffle him at last, and do not alter
the destiny, so liable to overthrow, which he himself
had chosen. There is a way to avoid all this. The
path is a safer one by far; and, though it may lead to
no visionary condition of life, the attainment of which
would subtract all the charms from heaven itself, at
least it can result in no dreadful and soul-mastering
disappointments and defects. We should be careful to
make every thingthe humblest in natureminister to
the felicity of the moment. If the beauty and scent of
this flower gratifies, for a moment, a solitary sense,
why should I trample it unenjoyed under my foot? If
yon purple-coated cloud wins my eye and kindles my
fancy, let me survey it. Does the breeze come about
me with a sense of freshness, I throw open my vest to
its embraces. I reject nothing that soothes the excited
pulsethat cheers the wandering hopethat
invigorates
the saddened spirit. So, with an eye to the
employment
,
in the negative of a corresponding doctrine,
I avoid all contact and communion with those things
which are like to become offensive to me. I avoid
the thorn which woundsthe storm which terrifies
the gloom which palls. Nor, do I rest here. I would
gather up carefully, and regulate, my own emotions.
I would set a high value upon them, far beyond
the market standard of the mass. I would lock
them up as I would a treasure, which, in the long
winter
nights, with the bright fire blazing before me, and a
glad circle gathered round, I would count over and
contemplate. My heart should be a capacious granary,
in which I would garner up all the impulsesthe
humblest
and wildest wanderings of all my senses. The
great mass of men neglect all these, and regard them
as the merest trifles. They aim at the attainment of
the mountain, overlooking entirely the atoms of which
it may be made. They set forth, unfortunately, with
some very brilliant and inviting illusion before them;
13*
and, when upon their approach it vanishes, they come
to the conclusion, as you have done, that all is vanity
and vexation of spirit, and that the object is no where
to be found; when, as is most generally the case, their
ill success is entirely attributable to their own idle,
extravagant
conceptions and misdirected exertions.
Mordaunt
. This is speculation and conjecture, not
philosophy. The experience of the world itself, not
less than my own, is decidedly against you. For the
single grain of enjoyment that falls among rocks and in
barren places, there spring up, luxuriantly, a thousand
bitter plants of grief and vexation. For the smile of
joy, the human eye articulates a thousand sorrows.
Do groups of the living gather around usmyriads of
the once living are crowded beneath us. The dancer
whirls along in gladness, while the worm perishes
under
his feet.
Pastpast
, is written upon all
things which meet my eye, and mingle in with my
spirit. A requiem and a wail of death comes to me in
every breeze,
Walsten
. Incorrigible Mordaunt! will nothing bring
you to reason? Would you not smile and rejoice,
when I say to you, that beneath the sheltering branches
of this linden I embraced for the first time my beloved
Constance?
Mordaunt. Walsten, Walsten
, under this very tree,
the wife of my heart lies buried!
So much, we may add, for human philosophy. Is
not the very name of it, gentle reader, a grievous yet
laughable absurdity? The very
ne plus ultra
of human
knowledge is found in the text; all that we know is,
nothing do we know!
THE RED-CROSS KNIGHT.
Come, cross my hand with the silver white,
Fair youth, and I will bring,
From the future's realm of hidden night,
The secret, the unknown thing
For mine's a wild and a wondrous art,
And I've a fearful power,
I know the springs of the silent heart,
And I search the coming hour.
He cross'd her hand and her deep black eye,
Was fixed upon his own,
And in her face was a majesty,
And in every look a tone.
The colour has fled from his cheek but now!
And his look is wild and his heart beats low.
Fond hopes, she said, and her brow grew sad,
Vain dreams now fill thine eye,
And thy breast is lit with many a glad
Rich thought of ecstasy.
I mark a changing streak of red,
Upon thy cheek, that now,
Even as I speak the word, has fled
To crimson o'er thy brow.
'Tis the mark of a deadly passion traced,
So deep that it will be,
A weary time ere age-effaced,
That token shall fly from thee.
I mark the curling lip of pride,
I mark the eye of scorn,
I see hopes seen by none beside,
Defeated and forlorn.
And in my spirit's prophecy,
I tell thee, fair youth, beware,
For thy hope shall bring no joy to thee,
And thy joy shall awaken care.
Nay tell me not of a thing so dark,
But from thy skill unfold,
The evil that comes, with a certain mark,
That its strength may be controll'd.
'Twere all in vain to tell thee when
The passionate pang will rise,
For it blinds the eyes of mortal men,
And they may not then be wise;
But this I may say, for before my sight,
Much of the future stands in light.
Speak on what thou see'st, I cannot fear.
Give the dark truth to my eager ear.
I see a light within a bow'r,
I see a bark at sea,
From the one thou bear'st a blushing flow'r,
Which the other bears from thee.
I see thee fly to distant lands,
And many there are who bow,
But none may do thy fierce commands,
And bring what thou lovest now.
And thou wilt wander wan and wild,
The light of thy reason almost gone,
Now helpless as the unweaned child,
Now desolate and lone.
And thou wilt call and none will hear,
Tho' often times a sound,
Like music that's fled will reach thine ear,
And thou wilt look around.
Yet even thy wild and wanton eye,
That sees what may not be,
Will fail, though much it may espy,
That single thing to see.
And now the bower again is bright,
And the one more lovely still,
Within that bower, by evening's light
Awaits till the night grows chill.
The bark is waiting by the sea,
And the idly flapping sail,
Seems, for its stay, reproaching thee
As it tempts the fresh'ning gale.
The morrow dawns and thou art gone,
The slave of thy passions then,
But thou'lt return alone, alone,
And weshall meet again?
Nay, more, nay more, the young knight cried,
But the maid was gone, that, by his side,
Had muttered the perilous tale of time,
Of many a sorrow and many a crime.
But the tale in after days was sooth,
For much the young knight learnt of truth,
And thus he sung, as he left the maid,
To go with the king on the far crusade
Tis the red-cross that is streaming
O'er the thousands of the brave,
Who, of victory now dreaming,
Are about to cross the wave
But the glory shines in seeming,
And they go but to the grave!
Oh! Europe, in thy story,
I do not care to shine
Tis not in search of glory,
That I leave this land of thine
And in the savage foray,
Be that early fortune mine.
'Tis not for me benighted,
By hopes for ever vain
To pine, with feelings blighted,
Beneath a woman's chain
From all thus disunited,
Maddelle, I'm free again.
Thus do I proudly sever,
The bonds that would enslave,
I break the spell for ever,
Though I break them in the grave
The Red-cross Knight must never,
Be a fickle woman's slave.
But the fate of the young knight foster'd well;
He stood the shock of the Infidel
But a trial more sad in the loss of fame,
In the future hours upon him came;
And the gipsy girl stood by his castle strong,
And the gloomy Almys thus heard her song.
Thy sunny hours are o'er,
Thy glories are no more,
And the majesty and power have departed from thy brow;
Of the crowds that to thee knelt,
Of the few that with thee felt,
There is not one remaining to give thee welcome now.
A stranger in thy halls,
The dark shadow on thy walls,
Is the only sole companion that thy fortune leaves to thee;
No vassal comes to wait,
In the absence of thy state,
And the hollow chambers give thee back thy footsteps dismally.
But thy heart's unshrinking pride,
Though the rabble may deride,
And thy undiminished spirit, is within thee as of yore,
When in thy young renown,
Thou hast struck the foeman down,
And the hero fled before thy stroke who never fled before.
Oh, then thy name was high,
And when lofty dames were nigh,
And the bright saloon re-echoed to the gentle and the fair,
Did prophetic fortune come,
To portray the future doom,
And show thy haughty spirit all, the sad reverse so near.
Now, no saloon is bright,
In the revelry of night
No minstrel sounds the welcome for the beautiful and brave;
Thy purple robe is worn,
And thy nodding plume is torn,
And soiled and trodden in the dust the scarf that beauty gave.
Thy banner waves no more,
Thy victories are o'er,
And the lips that bless'd thee once do not whisper now thy name.
And perished is the thought,
Of all thy arm has wrought,
And tarnish'd by the mean and base thy well-won wreath of fame.
But the loss of fame is nought,
To thy bosom's deeper thought,
And the only word of misery which thou hast uttered yet,
Is, that with thy name of pride,
All affections too have died,
And the maid that pledged so much to thee, should also all forget.
In thy anguish thou hast rung,
The dread secret from thy tongue,
And the hollow chambers give thee back the false one's name once
more;
Thou hast left the gloomy hall,
Thou art on the hanging wall,
God of mercy, yield thee grace, for thy earthly time is o'er.
MISSOURI,
THE CAPTIVE OF THE PAWNEE.
A token from the spirit land
A hallowed gift from fairy hand;
A withered leaf, a flower whose stem,
Thus broke, we liken unto them.
A rainbow hue, that now appears,
Then melts away, like hope, in tears.
The Pawnees and the Omahas were neighbouring
nations, and perpetually at war with one another. A
deadly hostility, increased by every contest, existed
between
them; and it became evident that no cessation of
war could be hoped for, from the inextinguishable
hatred
of either people, unless in the total annihilation of
one or the other, or, more probably of both. They
were equally numerous, equally brave, equally cunning
and cautious; equally matched, indeed, in almost every
respect. The advantage obtained by either side, was
most generally trifling, and the victor had but little to
boast. Sheer exhaustion, and the necessity of a
breathing
spell alone, sometimes interposed to give them a
task of peace, and, in a pause from hostility, to allow
them to rebuild their broken lodges, and provide
materials
for sustenance and war. The original causes of
this vindictive spirit might not well be ascertained at
the date of our story, so remote had been its origin.
Antiquity had, in some degree, to each generation
consecrated
the strife, and given it sanctity; and one of
the first lessons taught, accordingly, to the Pawnee and
Omaha boy, was to learn how to strike and scalp and
circumvent the national enemy, and transmit the same
vindictive lesson to his descendants in turn.
Such was the condition of things at the period of
which we speak. The autumn campaign was about to
be begun, and the Pawnee-loups, before setting out upon
the war path, held a solemn feast and council, in order
to determine upon the most advisable plans, and to
obtain
the sanction of the Great Spirit, as ascertained by
his priests. It is useless to dwell, even for a moment,
upon the many horrid rites which attended and
characterised
this festival. The American reader, with few
exceptions, is familiar with the long details of that
barbarous
mummery, in which, on these occasions, the
savages indulge; without any seeming meaning, and
scarcely with any regular design in view. It is enough
to say, that on this event, nothing was omitted from the
festival, at all calculated, in the mind of the savage, to
give it an air of the most imposing solemnity. The
priests divined and predicted general successtaking
care, however, as in the case of most other prophets,
to speak in language sufficiently vague to allow of its
adaptation to any circumstancesor resting solely on
those safe predictions, which commonly bring about
their own verification. They did not, however, confine
themselves to prophesying the event of the warthey
counselled the course to be pursued, and the plans to
be adopted, and, with too dictatorial a manner to be
resisted or rejected. Among other of their predictions,
they declared that victory should now rest with that
14
nation who took and put to death the first prisoner by the
fire tormenta favourite punishment with the Indians,
as affording a trial of the courage and firmness of the
captive. Such a prediction as this, though seemingly
barbarous and cruel, was in reality of a tendency highly
merciful, and more than any other measure calculated
to arrest the wanton fury of warfare, which is so much
the characteristic of the savage. All unnecessary risk
was avoided; and the object now, with the Pawnees,
was how to obtain a captive from the enemy, without
endangering the freedom of their own people. The
subtlety of the Indian, notoriously great, was not long
wanting in a stratagem to bring about its object. They
effected their designs, and procured their captive
without
loss or exposure to themselves.
The Omahas were not unconscious or unadvised of
the goings on of their enemies. They too had their
grand council, and made their preparations for the
autumn
war path. Their warriors had assembled at
different
points, and both nations, about the same moment,
had sallied forth from their lodges. It was not the
intention
of the Pawnees to proceed to extremities at the
outset. With a degree of caution, which, to them, was
highly unusual, and which awakened the surprise of
their opponents, they contented themselves with
patroling
their towns and villages, making no overtures of
combat, and seemingly bent only on defending their
country from attack. In vain, provoked beyond all
patience by this shyness, did the young braves of the
Omahas sally forth in sight of the watchful Pawnees;
daring them to combat, assailing them with all manner
of reproachful taunt, and denouncing them as mere
women, and degenerate from their ancestors. Though
feeling all this sorely, and scarcely able to command
the natural temper of the nation, the Pawnees still
contrived
to be quiet in the meanwhile, blindly relying on
the prediction of their priests, and satisfied that success
alone lay in the counsels which they had given them.
The Omaha village was one of the most beautiful
that can be imagined, in the verge and limit of a
southern
country, which boasts an almost perpetual spring.
Their principal settlement was upon a small island,
embosomed in a broad and glassy lake, which empties
into the river Platte. There was no approach to it
but by boats, and no invader could make his
appearance
within gunshot, without being at once perceptible
from all parts of the secluded and quiet island. There
every thing wore the smooth and soothing features of a
perpetual summer. The flowers were lengthened in
life and strengthened with odour, and the breeze, from
the broad prairies, in crossing over the little lake, lost
all its sharpness and rigour, and retained only its balm
and sweetness.
The secluded character of this situationits
remoteness
from the enemies' country, and the great and
unalloyed
security, which, in all their wars, it had
heretofore
enjoyed, had served to make the Omahas relax
somewhat in the vigilance, with which, at one time,
they had been accustomed to guard and watch over so
exquisite a spot. But a few warriors, principally
infirm
,
remained on the island; the residue being either
out on the war path, or engaged in the sports of the
chaseit being the custom, arising from the necessity
of the thing, thus to employ one portion of the people
in procuring, and another in defending, the sustenance
and provisions of their community. If the cunning
Pawnees did not exactly know of this fact, they at least
suspected it; and while the great body of their warriors
contrived to keep in check, and exercise the unconscious
Omahas, a small, but selected band, had been despatched
by a circuitous route, with the daring intention of
making
a descent upon the defenceless village, and taking a
captive, no matter of what sex or condition, in order to
secure for their nation the full benefit of the prediction
of their prophets.
There was among the Omaha warriors, a youth,
scarcely attained to manhood, than whom a braver or
more daring man the nation did not possess. Though
young, he had been often engaged in conflict, and had
acquired a name among his tribe, which placed him
among the foremost in war, and won for him the
respect
of the most aged in the solemn deliberations of
the council. Brave though he was, however, and stern
and terrible among his enemies, the young Enemoya
was not insensible to the tender passion. He had
already
told his love to the gentle Missouri, the loveliest
and liveliest maiden of his tribe, and upon his return
from the present expedition, she was to leave her own
and take up her abode in the lodge of Enemoya.
Many were the thoughts of Enemoyawhile, day
after day, he watched, without any prospect of action,
the motions of the Pawneeson the subject of his love,
and of the hour of his return. Of the spoils, which he
would bear home as a trophy of his victory, and a
pledge of his affections, and of the happiness which
would make all his life before him, like the flower of
the prairie, that expands its leaves during the day for
the reception of the sunshine, which at evening it shuts
up nor allows to escape. He dreamt, as the young
heart always dreams when love is the subject; and in
his dreamings he grew impatient of the war, which kept
him from the maid of his bosom, and gave him no spoils
to take home to her. Finding it impossible to provoke
a fight, the Omahas began to direct their attention to
the sports of the forest, and contenting themselves with
throwing, in the manner of their enemies, a line of
observation
and guard between the assailable points of
their country, and the usual war paths of the Pawnees;
the one half of them set seriously to work, to add to the
stock of venison which was to supply their nation. Not
so with Enemoya. Denied to come to battle with his
enemies, he forbore to join in the chase, but taking his
arms along with him, he stole away from his associates,
and took the path back to the little island and the
beautiful
Missouri. To the light-footed warrior, pursuing
the direct course, the journey was not long in
consummation
;
and in the course of a few days, we find him
on the borders of the placid lake, which lay, like a
slumbering and glad spirit, unmoved and untroubled
before him. He paused but for an instant, to take
from the branch on which it hung, the clear and yellow
gourd, and to drink from the sweet waters; then
stepping
into the light dug-out, or canoe, which stood
ready on its margin, he struck out the paddle
alternately
upon either side, and it shot rapidly towards the
island. Enemoya did not remark any peculiarity in
the village while crossing; for his mind was filled with
that dreamy contemplation, which, directed only to, and
14*
absorbed in but one subject, effectually excluded and
shut out every other; but as he approached, and when
his bark struck the smooth and silvery beach, he
became
conscious of an unusual degree of quietude and
gloom, for which he knew not how to account. There
were but few persons to be seen, and their looks were
downcast, and grave in the extreme, and indicative of
some terrible disaster. He soon learned the worst
from those he encountered. The Pawnees, in a strong
body, had unexpectedly made a descent upon them,
and after putting to death the few who continued to
resist
,
had borne off as captives, several of their maidens,
among whom the horror-stricken Enemoya heard the
name of his Missouri. After a moment of stupid
desolation
,
he rushed to the point of land whence the descent
was made, hurriedly enquired into its several
particulars
,
learned the course taken by the ravishers, and
without hesitation, set off in the pursuit.
The headlong Enemoya went on without other delay
than was necessary to discern the tracks left behind by
the departing enemy. Under any other lighter
circumstances
the free step of Enemoya would have made him
fearful as a pursuer, but an added facility and lightness
of foot grew out of the fury and the frenzy of his heart.
Passion and despair seemed to have provided him with
wings, and he evidently gained upon his enemy. Every
step he took freshened their tracks to his eye, and new
hopes were aroused and multiplied in his heart. At
midnight of the second day of his pursuit he came
suddenly
,
(and by a bend made by a broad river shooting
obliquely from his path, which had heretofore run
beside
it,) upon the blaze of a large camp-fire. Such
a-prospect
would have cheered the white man, but it had
no such effect upon the Indian. He knew that the
enemy for whom he sought would raise no such beacon
for his guidance; but he hesitated not to approach the
fire, around which a group of white men were seated,
partaking of a rude repast, which they had just
prepared
.
The savage was not ignorant of the civilised;
and the intercourse of Enemoya with the fur traders,
in which business his nation largely dealt, had even
given him some knowledge of the language. They
started to their arms, and demanded his business. It
was soon revealed, and with a degree of warmth and
passion, which, as it was supposed to be uncommon
with the Indian character, surprised them. They heard
his story, and immediately gave him intelligence of the
party which he pursued. They were a party of settlers
from Kentucky, who had drawn stakes, and were now
on the look-out for a new whereabout, in which they
might replant them. They were a hardy set of
adventurers
,
and as they sat around their blazing fires, while
their wives were preparing their repasts the young
warrior, for the first time, conceived the idea of
craving
their co-operation in the rescue of the fair
Missouri
.
Such leagues were not unfrequent between the
settlers and the proprietors, and in this way, in most
cases, as in the history of the downfall of the Roman
empire, those who came as allies remained as
conquerors
.
Having, by joint effort, destroyed one tribe, it
was no difficult matter for the auxiliaries to turn upon
those they had succoured, and in their weakened
condition
,
as little difficult to overpower them. This,
indeed, is in most part, the history of American sway
in the valley of the Mississippi. The squatters heard
his prayer with attention, and found their account in
it. They determined to assist him, and making a hasty
but hearty supper, they somewhat varied their original
line of march, and joined in the pursuit.
It was not long before the pursuers came upon the
certain and sure signs of the enemy. The eye of
Enemoya
soon perceived, and his quick and awakened
spirit did not delay in pointing them out. He knew
the country, its bearings and character, and taking
them to a turn by which they might head the waters
of a creek which ran across their path, he gained
greatly upon the Pawnees. They came upon them
suddenly and unexpectedly, but the Pawnees were
warriors too good to suffer total surprise. They had
put out their sentries, and, though not dreaming of
assault
,
were not unprepared to encounter it. They
were sitting upon the ground, not in a group, but
scattered
here and there, at a few paces from one another.
Some lay beneath a tree, others in the long matted grass
of the prairies, and a few were entirely uncovered to the
eye of the pursuers. The Indian maiden lay bound
betwixt two of the most powerful of the marauders
her hair dishevelled, her face unmoved but anxious,
and her demeanour that of the captive who felt all her
misfortune, yet knew how to bear it. It was a sight
that did not permit of a single moment's consideration
with the young Enemoya. With a single bound and
uplifted hatchet, he sprung forward from the covert in
which his party had concealed themselves, and by thus
exposing his person, destroyed the chances of a
surprise
.
He beheld his error when too late to amend it.
The Pawnees leapt to their arms, and the warrior, in
the shelter of a tree which secured his person from
their rifles, had leisure to repent of his rashness, so
unlike the Indian, and so injurious to the prospect of
success. But this was not his sole danger. On the
first exhibition of his person, the two savages, to whom
the custody of the maiden was given, seized her by
her long hair, and raising their knives to her bosom,
prepared on the first attack to put an end to her life.
It was this that arrested the arm of Enemoya, and
subdued
a spirit that had never before quailed, and seldom
hesitated. It was now necessary to take counsel, and
he regained the shelter in which, as yet concealed, lay
his white allies. In number they exceeded the force
of the Pawnees, and could easily have destroyed them.
This was, indeed, the first impulse; but from the
fiendish cunning of the foe, they were taught to fear
and feel that the signal of strife would be that of death
to the fair Indian. The squatters were men of daring,
but they were also men of experience; and while they
held boldness and confidence as primary requisites in
the character of the warrior, they felt that rashness and
precipitance would undo and ruin every thing.
Accordingly
,
having deliberated among themselves, it
was determined that two of the squatters, in company
with Enemoya, should appear, and tender the flag of
truce, a white handkerchief attached to a willow, which
the Indians had by this time learned to respect; to see
upon what terms they could procure the freedom of the
maiden. At their appearance the Indians emerged
from their several places of repose and shelter, and
advanced
to meet them, with no more signs of civility,
however, than were absolutely necessary to avoid the
appearance of attack. The squatter undertook to be
spokesman, and, in a way, accommodating his language
to the understanding of the Pawnees, by a liberal
sprinkling of words from theirs, he sought to make his
business understood. He told them of their captive,
and of the folly of keeping her for their torture, which
was of no use, when they might make her a subject of
speculation. He concluded by making proposals to
purchase
her for himself, offering arms, knives, and such
other objects of use with the Indian, which, as a
sometime
trader among them, he knew would be in demand.
The chief of the Pawnees heard him out with great
gravity and the most respectful attention, but told him
calmly and deliberately that there could be no trade
that the fate of the Pawnees or Omahas depended
upon
her life, and that he had, with his warriors, taken a
long journey to get her into his power; that no price
could tempt him to forego his hold, and that in a few
hours the captive would undergo the fiery torture.
While speaking, the young and passionate Enemoya
had approached his beloved Missouri. Her head had
been cast down, but upon his approach, she looked up
and fixed a long, fond, and earnest gaze upon him,
with an entreating and pleading expression which
almost
maddened him. Yet, without violating the
privilege
afforded by his flag of truce, he could not
approach or speak to her. Impatiently did he await
the final determination of the Pawnee, lengthened out,
as it was, by the figurative and glowing language which
he employed; but when the final resolve fell upon the
ears of Missouri, she rushed from between the two
warriors, who had relaxed their hold upon her, and
endeavoured
to throw herself into the arms of her lover;
but her captors were not idle, and before she could
effect her object, a blow from the arm of one of them
precipitated her to the earth. In a moment, the work
of death had begun. The conference was broken off,
and the hatchet of Enemoya had been driven deep
into
the scull of the brutal chief who had struck his
betrothed
.
The Indians were taken by surprise, and did
not offer a very ready resistance. A second blow from
the young warrior, and he had struck from his way the
only opponent between himself and Missouri, and he
was now rushing towards the maiden, when the leader
of the Pawnees with whom the conference had been
held, threw himself between them, and grappling
Enemoya
,
they fell together to the earth. Their grasp
was taken closely around the bodies of one another,
and the chief effort of both was to get hold of, and
employ the short broad knife which each wore in his
belt. This task was not so easy, and in the meanwhile,
the struggle was one rather of fatigue than danger.
These employed, the rest were not idle. The
Kentuckian
made his retreat to a neighbouring tree, the
click of his rifle was the signal to the rest of his party,
and before the Pawnees had dreamt of the presence of
so numerous an enemy, several of them had bit the
dust. The squatters rushed on with their knives,
exhibiting
too large a force for opposition, and the
enemy
fled; all but one, who, after the hesitation of a
moment, with a look of concentrated and contested
anger and triumph, leapt through the thicket which
lay between himself and where their chief and
Enemoya
were still vainly struggling, and seizing the still
bound maiden with one hand, he struck his hatchet
deep into her brain, then, without pausing to extricate
it, and before the deed might be revenged, with a
howl, betwixt a shout of victory and derision, he
rejoined
his party. Enemoya beheld the blow and sought
to release himself, but without success; and turning
his eyes, as it were, unconsciously, to where the
bleeding
and insensible form of the young maiden lay
stretched out before him, he stood at the mercy of his
enemy, who had drawn his knife, and with hand
uplifted
,
was about to plunge it into his bosom; but
before
he could do so, the stroke of a rifle from one of
the squatters prostrated him, and determined the
struggle. But the hope of our warrior was blighted,
and he moved along as a shadow. He returned with
the squatters, and they reached with him the quiet lake
and the beautiful island; yet he but came to hear of
new disasters. The relaxed discipline and weakened
force of the Omaha warriors, opposed to that of the
Pawnees, added to the encouraging account of the
success
of the party, sent for the purpose of taking their
captive, had emboldened them to an attack, which,
conducted with skill, caution, and spirit, had terminated
in the total defeat of the former, and the slaughter of
the best of their warriors.
We will build our cabins here, said the head man
of the squatters, by this quiet lake, and on these
verdant meadows. Here will we make an abode.
But this is the abode of my people, brother; here
is the wigwam of Enemoya, and this is the dwelling I
had built up for the hope of my heart, the gentle
Missouri
.
Your people are destroyed, and have no dwelling,
Enemoya; and Missouri is a fair spirit in the heavens.
You are a brave and a good youthbe with us, and
dwell with our people, and here will we live together.
No, said the Omaha, my people are indeed no
more, but I can mix with no other. Be yours the fair
island and the quiet lake, and when you have made it,
and all the forest round, a dwelling for you and your
children, and your children's children, as it is with
you white men the way always to do, remember the
Omaha, and call the nation you enjoy after the
beautiful
Missouri. For me, I shall go over the great lakes,
and hunt the buffalo in the black prairies of the west,
till the Great Spirit shall send for me to dwell once
more among the people of the tribe.
The squatter gave the promise he required, and the
country thus granted by Enemoya, is even to this day
called Missouri, after the beautiful maiden of Omaha.
15
LA POLA.
'Tis still the sameand this the tyrant's creed,
The brave must perish still, the virtuous bleed
Yet, lesson'd by the examples which they leave,
The living shall avenge them, but not grieve
Their blood has watered well our freedom's tree,
And sweetly hallows human liberty:
Even woman tooa dearer sacrifice,
Oh! hapless gain for freedom, when she dies!
The Colombians, generally, will long remember La
Pola. With the history of their struggle for freedom,
her story is deeply associated, and the tragical destiny
which followed her love of country, is linked with all
the interest of the most romantic adventure. Her
spirit
seemed made of the finest materials, while her
patriotism
and courage, to the last, furnish a model which
it would have been well for her country, had it been
more generally adopted and followed by its sons.
Dona Apolinaria Zalabariata, better known by the
name of La Pola, was a young lady of good family in
Bogota, distinguished not less by her personal
accomplishments
than her rich and attractive beauty. She was
but a child when Bolivar commenced his struggles with
the ostensible object of freeing his country from the
trammels of its oppressors. Her father, a gentleman of
considerable acquirement as well as wealth, warmly
seconded the designs of the Liberator, though from
circumstances
compelled to forbear any active agency,
himself, in their promotion. He was a republican of
considerable resources and sleepless perseverance; and,
without taking up arms himself, he probably contributed
quite as much to the success of the experiment for
liberty, as those who did. In this, he was warmly
seconded
by his daughter; who, with that ingenuity of
contrivance, commonly ascribed to her sex, was,
perhaps
,
the most valuable auxiliar that Bolivar had in
Bogota.
She was but fourteen years of age, when accident
gave her the first glance of the man afterwards the
president
of her country. At this time, with few resources
and fewer friends and coadjutors, Bolivar occasioned
little distrust, and, perhaps, commanded as little
attention
.
Still, he was known, and generally recognised as
an enemy to the existing authorities. Prudence was
necessary, therefore; and it was at midnight, and during
a severe thunder storm, that he entered the city, and
made his way, by arrangement, into the inner
apartments
of the house of Zalabariata. A meeting of the
conspiratorsfor such they werehad been
contemplated
on this occasion, and many of them were in
attendance
.
The circumstances could not be altogether
concealed from the family, and La Pola, who had heard
something of Bolivar which had excited her curiosity,
contrived to be present; though partially concealed by
her habit, and by a recess situation which she had
chosen. The Liberator explained his projects to the
assembly. He was something more than eloquenthe
was impassioned; and the warmth of a southern sun
seemed burning in his words and upon his lips. La Pola
heard him with ill-concealed admiration. Not so her
countrymen. Accustomed to usurpation and
overthrow
,
they were slow to adventure life and property
upon the predictions of one, who, as yet, had given so
few assurances of success for the game which he had in
hand. They hesitated, they scrupled, and opposed to
his animated exhortations a thousand suggestions of
prudencea thousand calculations of fear. The
Liberator
grew warmer and more vehement. He denounced
in broad language the pusillanimity, which, as much as
the tyranny under which they groaned, was the curse of
his country.
Am I to go alone,he exclaimed passionately
am I to breast the enemy singlywill none of you
come forward, and join with me in procuring the
liberation
of our people? I ask you not, my countrymen, to
any grievous riskto any rash adventure. There is
little peril, be assured, in the strife before us. We are
more than a match, united among ourselves and with
determined spirits, for twiceay thricethe power
which they can bring into the field. But even were this
not the casewere it that the chances were all
decidedly
against us, I cannot see, still, how you can, or why
you should, hesitate to draw the sword in such a strife.
You daily and hourly feel the exactions and witness the
murders and cruelties of your masters. Thousands of
your friends and relatives lie rotting in the common
prisons, denied the most common attentions and
necessaries
,
and left to perish under innumerable privations.
Thousands have perished in torture; and over the
gateway
of your city, but now as I entered, hanging in
chains, the bleaching bones of old Hermano, one of our
best citizens, destroyed because he dared to speak freely
his thought of these doings, attest the uncompromising
and bloody tyranny under which you must momentarily
look for a like fate. If you be menif you have hearts
or hopesif you have affections to lose and live for
you surely will not hesitate as to the choicethe only
choice which a freemanone worthy and desirous of
the nameshould be allowed to make.
The Liberator paused, as much through exhaustion,
as from a desire to enable his hearers to reply. But,
with this latter object, his pause seemed made entirely in
vain. The faces of all around him were blank and
speechless. They were generally quiet, well meaning
citizens, unaccustomed to any enterprises save those of
trade, and they were slow to risk the wealth which
many of them possessed in abundance, to the certain
confiscation which would follow any overt exhibition
against the existing authorities. While in this state of
hopeless and speechless indecision, the emotions of the
chief were scarcely controllable. His whole frame
trembled with the excitement of his spirit. He paced
their ranks hurriedlynow pausing with this and that
personageappealing to them singly as he had done
collectively, and suggesting a thousand arguments of
weight for the effecting of his purposes. He became
impatient at length, and again addressed them.
Men of Bogota, you are not worthy to be free if
you can hesitate longer. Your chains and insecurity
will have been merited, and be assured, when they
become
necessary to the wants of your enemy, your
present
acquiescence to his power will not avail for the
protection of your lives or property. They are both at
his mercy, and he will not pause, as you have done, to
15*
make use of them. To save them from him, you must
risk them for yourselves. To suppose that his mercies
will keep them for your benefit is to think madly. There
is no security against power, but in power; and to check
the innovating terrors of the one, you must exhibit, at
the threshold, the strong armed vengeance of the other.
A dayan hourand it may be too late. To-morrow,
unless I am betrayed to-nightlooking with a
sarcastic
smile around him as he spokeI shall unfurl the
banner of the republic, and if there be no other name
arrayed in arms against the oppressor, the more glory
to that of Bolivar.
While the chief spoke, the emotions of the youthful
La Pola could not be concealed. The colour came to,
and went from, her cheeksthe tears started to her
eyesshe rose hurriedly from her seat which she
unconsciously
again resumed, and, as the Liberator
concluded
his address, rushed across the narrow space
which separated her from her father, and seizing him
by the hand, with an action the most passionate, yet
dignified and graceful, she led him to the spot where
Bolivar still held his position; then for the first time
giving utterance to her lips, she exclaimed enquiringly,
He must not stand alone, my father. You have a
name, and you will give ityou will not withhold it
from your countryand I, too,I will do what I can,
ifand her eye sunk before that of the chief as she
spoke,while her voice trembled with a tone of modest
doubt, the most winning and expressiveif you will
let me.
The eloquence of the woman did more than all that
had been uttered either by way of reason or patriotic
impulse and exhortation from the lips of the chief.
The men, touched with a sense of shame, at once came
forward, and entered into the required pledges. There
was no more hesitationno new scruple; and the
Liberator pressing the hand of the bright-eyed girl to
his, lips called her a spirit worthy of her country, and
such as if possessed generally by its sons, could not
fail, in a short time, most effectually to recover its
liberties.
In another day, and the standard of the republic
was raised. The republicans assembled numerously
beneath it, and but little foresight was necessary to
perceive, that in the end, the cause must eventually
triumph. Still the successes were various. The
Spaniards had too strong a foothold, easily to be driven
from their possessions, and the conflict, as we know,
was for a long time of the most indecisive and various
character. What the Colombians wanted, however,
in the materials for carrying on a protracted warfare,
was more than made up in the patriotism, the talent
and the vigilance of their leaders generally; and
however
delayed may have been the event which they
desired and had in view, its certainty of attainment
seems never for a moment to have been questioned,
except by those who vainly continued to keep up an
ineffectual and hopeless conflict against them.
For two years, that the war had been carried on, no
material change had been effected in the position of
the combatants. The Spaniards still maintained their
ground in most respects, except where the Colombians
had been unanimous in their rising; but their resources
were hourly undergoing diminution, and the great
lessening
of the productions of the country incident to
its unsettled condition, had subtracted largely from
the inducements held out, individually, to their officers,
for the further prosecution of the war. In the mean
time, the patriots were invigorated with hope in due
proportion with the depression of their opponents;
and the increase of numbers, not to speak of the
added skill and capacity of their arms, following their
long and continuous warfare, not a little contributed to
their further encouragement. But how, in all this
time, had La Pola redeemed her pledge to the
Liberator
?
It may be supposed that the promise of the girl
of fifteen, was not of such a nature as to warrant a
reasonable hope or prospect of its fulfilment. It
certainly
was not regarded by Bolivar, himself, as any
thing more than the hasty utterance of her emotion,
under particular excitement, having no other object,
if it had any, than to provoke, by a sense of shame and
self-rebuke, the unpatriotic inactivity of her
countrymen
.
The girl herself did not think so, however. From
that moment she became a womana strong minded,
highly persevering, and most attractive woman. All her
soul was bent to the achievement of some plan of
co-operation
with the republican chief, and circumstances
largely contributed to the desire thus entertained. She
resided in Bogotathe strong hold of the royalist
forces, under the control of Zamano, a military despot,
who, in process of time, in that country, acquired by his
cruelties a parallel notoriety with some of the foulest
governors of the Roman dependencies. Her family
was wealthy, and though favouring Bolivar's enterprise,
as we have seen, had so conducted, as to remain
entirely
unsuspected by the existing powers. This
enviable security, the management of La Pola, herself,
had principally effected; and under its cover she
perfected
a scheme of communication with the patriots,
by which she put into their possession all the plans of
the Spaniards. She was the princess of the Tertulias
a mode of evening entertainment common to the
Spaniards. She presided at these parties with a grace
and influence which brought all their officers to her
house. They listened with delight to the power and
delicacy with which she accommodated her voiceone
of singular compass and melodyto the notes of her
guitar, in the performance upon which she was
uncommonly
successful. Unsuspected of any connection
with politics, and regarded only as a fine woman, more
solicitous of a long train of admirers than of any thing
else, she contrived to collect, from the officers
themselves
,
most of their plans in the prosecution of the
war. She soon learned the force of their several
armaments, their disposition and destination, and,
indeed
,
in timely advance, all the projected operations
of the Spanish army. She knew all the officers, and
from those present obtained a knowledge of their
absent companions. In this way, she knew the station
of each advanced postwho was in command, and
most of those particulars, the knowledge of which
tended as frequently to the success of Bolivar, as his
own conduct and the courage of his men. All these
particulars were regularly transmitted to him, as soon
as obtained, by a trusty messenger; and the frequent
disappointments of the royalist arms attested the
closeness
and general correctness of the information thus
obtained.
Unfortunately, one of her communications was
intercepted
,
and the cowardly bearer, intimidated by the
terror of impending death, was persuaded to betray his
employer. She was arrested in the midst of an
assembled
throng, to whom her voice and guitar were
imparting
a mingled melody of most attractive romance.
She was nothing alarmed at this event, but was hurried
before a military courtmartial law then prevailing in
the capitalwith a rapidity corresponding with the
supposed enormity of her offence. Her lovera noble
youth named Gomerothough perfectly innocent of
any connection with her acts on this occasion, was
tried along with her, and both condemnedfor, at this
time, condemnation and trial were words of
synonymous
importto be shot. Zamano the viceroy,
desirous
of more victims and hoping to discover her
accomplices, granted them a respite of twelve hours
before execution, sparing no effort in all this time to
bring about a confession. The friar sent to confess
her, threatened her, if she ventured upon any
concealments
from him, with eternal punishment hereafter;
while promises of pardon and reward assailed both
herself and her betrothed, in the hope of effecting the
same objectbut all equally in vain. She resolutely
denied having any other accomplice than the
messenger
she had employed, and prayed a release from the
persecution of all further enquiries. Perceiving that
Gomero, her intended husband, was about to speak
and probably confess, through a very natural dread of
the death he saw so nearshe seized his arm
impressively
,
and fixing her dark eyes reproachfully upon
him, she exclaimed,
Gomero, did I love you for this? Beware lest I
hate and curse you as I die. What! is life so dear to
you that you would dishonour us both to live? Is
there no consolation in the thought that we shall die
together?
But we shall both be saved! rejoined her lover.
It is false! The tyrant Zamano spares none; our
lives are forfeit, and all that you could say would be
unavailing to avert either your fate or mine. He only
desires new victims, and will not release his grasp
upon those in his doom. If you have ever loved me,
Gomero, speak no more after this fashion. Show
yourself
worthy of the choice which I have made, in the
manner of your death.
The lover persevered in silence, and they were led
forth to execution. The friars retired from the
hapless
pair, and the firing party made ready. Then, for
the first time, did the spirit of this noble woman shrink
impulsively from the approach of death.
Butcher! she exclaimed to the viceroy, who stood
in his balcony overlooking the scene of execution
Butcheryou have then the heart to kill a woman
and as she spoke, she covered her face with the saya
or veil which she wore, and on drawing it aside for
the purpose, the words
Vive la Patria
, embroidered
in gold were discovered on the
basquina
. As the
signal
for execution was given a distant hum as of an
advancing
army was heard upon the ear.
It is hehe comesit is Bolivarit is the
Liberator
!
she exclaimed with a tone of triumph, which
found its echo in the bosoms of thousands who looked
with horror on the scene of blood before them.
Bolivar
it washe came with all speed to the work of
deliverance
the
city was stormed sword in handa
summary atonement was taken in the blood of the
cruel viceroy and his flying partisans. But the
Deliverer
came too late to the rescue of the beautiful La
Pola. The fatal bullet had penetrated her heart, but
a few moments before the appearance of the liberating
army upon the works, and in sight of the place of
execution
.
Thus perished a woman, worthy to be
remembered
with the purest and the proudest who have
elevated and done honour to nature and her sexone
who, with all the feelings and affections of the woman,
possessed all the patriotism, the pride, the courage,
and the daring of the man!
METACOM OF MONTAUP.
Metacom of Montaup, or Philip of Mount Hope, is
associated in New England history with no small
portion
of the trials and terrors to which the early
colonists
in that region were subject. He had the cunning,
and we may add, the capacity of the Greek. He was
a skilful politician, a bold, adroit leader, and a fearless
man; and battled for his country with all the tenacity
of one conscious of his rights, and resolute to maintain
them. His memory has not always been spoken of
with justice; and though ruthlessly savage and deeply
treacherous, he does not seem, in a fair estimate of
history
,
to have been more so than his Christian invaders.
His life is one of high interest, and full of striking
adventure
.
His own personal escapes from his pursuers
are wonderfully numerousand, whether we regard
him at the head of a powerful nation, ruling all around
him, or, alone and desolate, deserted by his friends,
and hunted through wild and morass by his enemy, he
is still the dauntless, the proud man who must have
won the admiration, as he certainly did the hatred, of
those who pursued him to the death. He was a true
lover of his country, and never sued for peace from
those who were destroying it. On this subject, such
was his spirit, that he killed upon the spot, and with
his own hand, one of his followers who ventured to
propose
16
the measure. It was, perhaps, well that such a
man should perish, but he certainly must command the
sympathies of all those who admire valour and
perseverance
,
employed so unhesitatingly, in the cause of
one's country. It is matter of melancholy interest,
says Mr. Thatcher, in his clever work on Indian
Biography
,
to know, that the sachem, wretched and
hopeless as he had become in his last days, was still
surrounded
by a band of his faithful and affectionate
followers
.
At the very moment of his fatal surprise by
the English, he is said to have been telling them his
gloomy dreams, and advising them to desert him, and
provide for their own safety. This last incident furnishes
a chief feature of the poem which follows.
'Twas in a vision of the night
The spirit of that eye,
Which tracks the present in its flight,
And sees the future nigh,
Came o'er my own, and I beheld
The past with all its scenes of eld,
In vague confusion fly.
It was a dreary waste, and dim,
As, with ten thousand lights,
Must be the anxious gaze of him
That sees these varied sights
That come in wild and wayward crowd,
The high, the humble, base and proud,
The all, each season blights.
Warriors of other times, and woods,
Where foaming waters play
Wilds, where the hungry tiger broods,
Expectant, for his prey
All changing, in that fitful dream,
To each far land and dark extreme,
And all before me lay.
And in the crowd beneath my gaze
My native land I see,
As now and then, some gleam betrays,
The shadows distantly
But what are these with swarthy brow,
And scowling eye, that round them now,
Look wild and anxiously?
And one is there with musing eye,
The chieftain ye may sean
Whose cheek is stained with purple dye,
A proud and lonely man!
He stood above the ruin'd stone,
That mark'd an ancient warrior gone,
Ere yet his line began.
His chieftainsare they all around?
The few, the brave are there
More lofty in that narrow bound,
More fearless from despair.
They gather round the sterile rock,
All ready for the coming shock,
None touched with coward fear.
A smile is on the monarch's cheek,
But there is sadness too,
As midst that band his eye would seek,
The lost among the few.
Ah! fallen upon the evil days,
His favourite meets no more his gaze:
He turns him from the view.
He look'd upon the dashing wave,
And bade his warriors nigh;
In a stern voice the monarch gave
His latest battle cry
Then laid him on the rocky height,
Whilst slumber came to sense and sight
A nation watching by.
He starts, and o'er the mountain's brow
He leaps in wild dismay
He calls upon his warriors now
The war-cry and away.
The whitemanfoe!'t was all he said,
And shook his weapon o'er his head,
And gather'd to the fray.
They startthe gallant few in might,
But not a foe is there
They bend the sense, they stretch the sight
No foeman see or hear.
They come, he cried, and still I see,
They 've track'd the panther to his tree,
The lion to his lair.
Rock of my sires!'t was thus he spoke,
This is my latest field,
Upon thy brow the spear is broke,
The forest king must yield
Yield!never! let the foeman's feet
Still with mine own for combat meet,
And I no weapon wield:
Even then, my soul shall joy to trace
The features of the foe
And grappling in the death embrace,
My arms shall lay him low:
'T were sweet, though losing all, to tear
The reeking scalp, the dripping hair,
And drink his life-blood's flow.
Eagle that seeks the highest course,
And dares the darkest sky,
That scream'd in joy when winds were hoarse,
And lightnings flaming nigh
They may not tame thy wing, and mine
Has been as soaring high as thine
I shall not fear to die.
So spake the monarchand his brow
Grew darker in its hue
His eye assumed the vengeful glow,
And look'd the eagle's too
Then sung he, in a solemn strain,
The deeds he 'd done, and those again,
His soul had sworn to do!
I lay on the breast of the mountain,
Where the raven was flapping his wing,
Whilst he drew from my heart, like a fountain,
Its warmest, its ruddiest spring.
The winds through the forest were sighing,
From the grave of my father they came
I saw the old warrioraround him were lying
The symbols of fight, for the many were dying,
'Midst havoc, confusion, and flame.
He stood, but his hatchet was shivered,
The arrowhead stuck in his breast,
And the lips of the warrior quivered,
As his eye upward looked to the west
But no fear on his spirit depress'd him,
In the moment of glory he fell
And the prayer of the prophet had bless'd him,
Ere he bade his own forest farewell.
O'eraw'd by his presence, I dared not
Look up at the form of my sire,
16*
I trembled, although my son fear'd not,
The glance of his dark rolling ire.
No! the eagle that soars unsurrounded,
Unless by his own native pride
Has felt not the Nipnet whose arrow has wounded,
And free as the flood from the foeman has bounded,
When the Mohegan stood at his side.
`And where is thy bow and thy quiver?'
At length the old crocodile spoke
`Thy heart's blood shall crimson yon river,
And thy people shall bend to the yoke.
Already thy foe is advancing,
Look up from thy slumbers, and see,
Their blades thro' the forest leaves glancing,
Their lances all buried in thee.'
He turn'd as he spoke.I beheld him,
Look dark on the shades of the west,
And a new life now strongly impelled him,
Having speech in each throe of his breast.
A light from his dark eye was beaming,
I follow'd his gaze in its flight
And saw through the woods faintly gleaming
The blade of the foe, and his long plume streaming,
Beneath the pale moon's misty light.
`Now the foeman is on theego slumber
'Till thou wakest behind the dark hills,
Thy blood shall his falchion encumber
No longer thy bosom it fills.
Then arise from thy sleep and awaken
The last parting hope of thy band
By them thou wert never forsaken,
Then strike for them now and thy land!'
He vanishedI rosea cold tremor
Relax'd every nerve of my frame.
I hear him once more`Thou fond dreamer,
Remember thy nation and name!'
Be at peace, thou old bird, in thy tree,
Enough, that I stand by the side
Of the last of the brave, who are free,
And will die as their fathers have died.
I have call'd up the right arm of power,
I have call'd up the lessons of old
And no breast in the perilous hour,
That thinks on the past, will be cold.
Through the mists of the valley appearing,
The foeman's bright weapons have shone
I meet them with bosom unfearing,
I meet them with soul full of daring,
Let them come, though I meet them alone.
The eagle has never yet cower'd,
The Mohegan's arrow ne'er flew
To the rock, where his mighty wing tower'd
'Midst the freshness of heaven's own dew.
He has glow'd in the sun's brightest splendour,
New vigour it gave to his frame
To me, in my youth, did they render,
His mood, and his might, and his name!
I shrunk not, though worn and surrounded
My tomahawk madden'd with blood.
I clung to the foe I had wounded,
And lapped, from his breast, the red flood.
And who, in the battle's commotion,
E'er saw me withdraw from the fight
I stood, when it boiled like the ocean,
And swam in its streams with delight.
Let them come thenthe freedom our fathers,
Once gave us, if lost it must be,
I care not how soon death's hand gathers,
The fast falling leaves of our tree!
But 'twere shame to the souls of the glorious,
Who have gone to the valley of maids,
That their children should come not victorious,
And followed by enemy's shades.
Then draw ye each bow and prepare now,
To battle the foes of your land;
Let one warrior but tremble with fear now,
And he dies by his own monarch's hand.
The shades of old warriors surround us,
Ye victims of battle draw nigh,
Let Manitto bless or confound us,
Be it ours to conquer or die!
He pausedhis warriors gathered round,
Nor made they vain reply,
True valour never yet has found
It difficult to die.
And in the monarch's song they knew,
The fate was fixed, and he who flew,
Again would never fly.
A smile is gathering on his brow,
As o'er the distant hills,
The dawn with streaks of dusky glow
The dim horizon fills
The sun will rise no more to him,
Nor will he live to find it dim,
Behind the western hills.
But though surviving not to see,
Its red light streak the verge
Of that wild land, which once was free,
As ocean's leaping surge
Will he not, too, escape the chain,
His people's moan, the gloomy strain,
His country's doom and dirge!
And now his band is compass'd round,
Prophetic was his dream,
And death, on easy terms, is found,
Before the sun's full gleam
Ere yet the day had fully broke,
Fate o'er the chief had cast her yoke,
And borne him down her stream.
The monarch waved his battle axe,
And rose the war-whoop's cry
From men that never turned their backs,
And battled but to die.
And now he combats hand to hand,
With onewhose blood is on the sand.
Another camelike cataracts,
Headlong they dash upon the strand.
His gripe is on the Indian's throat,
Whose eye-balls roll and quiver:
Those are the monarch's plumes that float,
All bloody down the river;
Yet once again his war-cry rose
Upon the windand all is still:
There 's blood upon the stream that flows,
And blood upon the hill
Their monarch bade them never yield
And not an Indian left the field.
THE CHILDREN OF THE SUN.
In the year sixteen hundred and , a conspiracy
was entered into by several of the Indian tribes
inhabiting
South Carolina, instigated thereto by the Spanish
government of St. Augustine, against the inhabitants of
that province. Among these, were the Yamassees and
Huspahs, or rather the Yamassees; for the Huspahs
were but a portion of the same government and nation,
assuming to themselves the name of a local governor or
prince. They occupied a large and well watered
territory
,
lying backward from Port-Royal Island, on the
northeast side of Savannah river, which, to this day,
goes by the name of Indian land. It is now included
in the parish of St. Peter, in the present local divisions
of the state above mentioned.
The conspiracy became known to the Carolinians,
through the means of a white trader, before it was
sufficiently
matured to be carried into execution.
Declaration
of war was the immediate consequence; and,
unsupported by the faithless allies, who, after inciting
them to insurrection, refused them all succour; the
tribes were, one by one, defeated by the whites, and
either wholly exterminated or driven from their
possessions
.
The war was now drawing to a close. The
resources
of the Indians had been almost entirely
exhausted
;
and deserted by the few tribes with which
they had been allied, and who had either been
destroyed
or had submitted to the clemency of the
conquerors
,
the Yamassees, under their king Huspah,
prepared
to risk the fate and fortunes of their nation on a
single battle, at their own town of Cayanoga, near
the site now occupied by the whites, called
Purysburgh
.
They had encamped outside the limits of the
town, which they had partly barricadoed with logs,
closely jointed one in another, according with the mode
of defence among the whites during their primitive
struggles against the rude and commonly ill-directed
assaults of the Indians. But what had been a
sufficient
obstacle to the advance of a band of savages,
proved no defence against the whites; and, whilst
lying upon their arms, the bulwarks were stormed, and
their dwellings in flames, before they were apprised or
conscious of the attack. Nothing could exceed the
confusion and disorder among the miserable wretches
upon this occasion. The women and children rushed
through their blazing habitations, naked and howling
with affright. The men seized their defences, and
although
the struggle was hopeless, it afforded the
assailed
some opportunities for revenge. Many of the
whites were slain; and, in one instance, a warrior, who
was kept off by his enemy's sword, resolutely rushed
upon it, in order to glut his vengeance by strangling
his foe, which he did with all the fury of a wild beast.
They neither gave nor asked for quarter; and in the
confusion and darkness of the night, they were enabled
to maintain the struggle against the assailants, with the
courage of men fighting for the homes of their fathers,
and that conduct, which, in a midnight affray, is as much
the property of the Indian as of any other people on the
globe. But when the day broke, the struggle was over.
The first gray of morning found the bayonet at the
breasts of the retreating savages, and themselves at the
mercy of those, to whom, in all their successes, they had
granted no mercy. Few escaped. Men, women, and
children, alike fell victims to the sword of devastation;
and, before mid-day, the fight was ended, and the
Yamassee
nation ceased to have an existence.
On the morning after this fatal termination of the
war, a warrior might have been seen standing upon a
small hillock, within a few miles of the scene. His
appearance was indicative of recent fight, and much
weariness. The hunting-shirt which he wore, made of
finely dressed buckskins, inwrought fantastically with
beads and decorations of shells, was torn, and stained
in many places with blood and dirt; and, while his
features evinced nothing less than manly determination
and firmness, it would require no close observation to
perceive that he was one of those with whom the
strong principle of grief had become a settled
companion
.
His eye had the look of the exile, but not of
despair. He gazed anxiously around him: seemed to
strain his sight upon the far groves, as if expecting
some one to emerge from their gloomy intricacies;
then turning away disappointed, glided down into the
hollow, and bending to the small brook that slowly
wound its way beside him, he drank long and deeply
from its cool, refreshing waters. Having done this, he
again rose to the hillock he had left, and seemed to
renew
the search he had made in vain before, and with
similar success. He sung, at length, in a low and
unrepressed
,
but not subdued tone, something like the
lament which follows, over the fortunes of his people:
They are goneall gonethe morning finds them
not; the night covers them. My feet have no
companion
in the chase; the hollow rocks give me back only
their echoes. Washattee! where art thou? On the far
hillsthou hast found the valley of joy, and the
plum-groves
that are for ever in bloom. Who shall find thy
bones, my brother; who take care of thy spoils? Thou
art all untended in the valley of joy, and the ghosts of
the slain bend about thee with many frowns. Where is
the maid of thy bosom? Comes she with the smoking
venison; does she dress thy food at the board, where
the hunter sits down at evening? Thou art slain in
thy morning, Washattee, and thy sun forgot to rise. I
sing for thee thy hymn of deaththy war-song for
many victories. Thou wert mighty in the chasethe
high hills did not overcome thee. Thy boyhood was
like the manhood of other men; thou didst not sleep in
thy childhood. Well did they name thee the young
panther
the
might and the eye of the young panther's
mother was thine. Sickness fled from thee affrighted, and
thou laughed'st in scorn at the black drinks of Estutee.
The strong tide, when thou swammest, bore thee not
with it; thou didst put it aside as an infant. Thou
wert a long arrow in the chase, and thy flight was on
the strong winds. Who shall mate thee, my brother?
What chieftain stood up like Washattee? And the day
of thy glory is gone, O Huspah! the father of many
kings. Yamassee, where wert thou sleeping when thy
name and thy nation expired? When the belt was
burned, thou didst weave them, and the temple of thy
17
spirit overthrown? Huspah, thy day has gone by in
darkness, and the strong night is over thee. Canst
thou wake up the brave who are sleeping? Canst
thou undo the eye which is sealed up, and kindle the
sharp light that is hidden therein? What shall restore
thee, Yamassee; and where shall the brave men of
Huspah now find their abode? The wild grass has
taken root in their dwelling-place, and the hill-fox
burrows
under the hearth of the hunter. The spirit has
no place in the wigwams of many fathers; silence has
made a home of their ruins, and lives lonely among
them. Oh, spirit of many ages, thou art vanished!
Thy voice is sunk into an echo, and thy name is
whispered
on the hill-tops. Thy glories are the graves of
many enemies; thy own grave is unknown. Thou art
scattered to the broad winds, and hast fallen upon the
waters. They have carried thee down with them
away, and the hunters of the hill find thee not. A
curse is gone forth upon thee, and thou art smitten
with death!
Thus mourned the Indian warrior over the graves of
his fathers, and the recollections and affections of his
youth. No single trace, however, of those emotions,
which might be supposed to have been exhibited as
accompaniments to his uttered sorrows, appeared either
in his look or his actions. To one who witnessed their
expression, they might be compared to the language of
sorrow falling from a statue. His was the majesty of
grief, without its weaknesses.
A something stirred the leaves, and the quick and
watchful sense of the chief recognised it as the object
of his search. His eye rested upon the deep and
shadowing
umbrage, whence proceeded about thirty other
Indians, of both sexes, belonging to his own tribethe
all that was now left of their nation. With downcast
looks and no words, they struck a light, and in a few
moments kindled a fire, around which they sat down in
silence to a repast of parched corn, flour and sugar
called among them sugamit;with a small portion of
dried venison.
Here they remained not long. They wished to
divest
themselves of all recollections of their misfortune,
yet were quite too near the spot at which it occurred,
easily to effect their object. Without a word they
stepped
,
one by one, into the order of march, which is called
the Indian file; and at equal intervals of ten or fifteen
feet they followed the chief; and, avoiding all beaten
tracks of human form, they took their way through the
close and pathless wastes of the forest.
Many years had now elapsed, and men ceased to
remember the noble tribe of the Yamassees; once
the most terrible, and at the same time, the most
accomplished
of all the Indian nations of the south.
They had even gone out of the memories of their
ancient
enemies the Creeks; and the Carolinians, while
possessing, and in full enjoyment of the rich lands of
their spacious territory, had almost forgotten the hard
toil and extreme peril by which alone they had been
acquired.
It was in the midst of a bright October month, that
a small canoe was seen ascending the river, now known
as the St. Mary's, having its source in a vast lake and
marsh, called Okefanokee, and lying between the
Flint and Ockmulg rivers, in the state of Georgia.
There were but two persons in the canoe, both Indian
hunters of the Creek nation; a gallant race, well known
for high courage among the tribes, and distinguished
not less by their wild magnanimity and adventure,
than by their daring ferocity. The warriors were both
young, and were numbered, and with strict justice,
among the
lite
of their people. At peace, for the
first time for many seasons, with all around them, they
gave themselves up to the pleasures of the chase, and,
sought, in the hardy trials of the hunt for the bear and
the buffalo, to relieve the inglorious and unwelcome
ease which this novel condition of things had
imposed
upon them. Our two adventurers, forsaking the
beaten track, and with a spirit tending something more
than customary to that which distinguishes civilisation,
had undertaken an exploring expedition into the
recesses
of this vast lake and marsh, which, occupying
a space of nearly three hundred miles in extent, and
in very rainy seasons almost completely inundated,
presented
amidst the thousand islands which its bosom
conceals, fruitful and inviting materials for enquiry and
and adventure. Girt in with interminable forests, the
space of which was completely filled up with
umbrageous
vines and a thick underwood, the trial was one of
no little peril, and called for the exercise of stout
heart, strong hand, and a world of fortitude and
patience. It was also the abiding-place of the wild
boar and the pantherthe southern crocodile howled
nightly in its recesses; and the coiled snake, ever and
anon, thrust out its venomous fangs from the verdant
bush. With words of cheer and mutual
encouragement
,
the young hunters made their way. They were
well armed and prepared for all chances; and fondly
did they anticipate the delight which they would
entertain, on relating their numerous adventures and
achievements, by field and flood, to the assembled
nation
,
on the return of the ensuing spring. They took
with them no unnecessary incumbrances. The well
tempered bow, the chosen and barbed arrows, the
curved knife, suited to a transition the most abrupt,
from the scalping of the enemy to the carving of the
repast, and the hatchet, fitted to the adroit hand of the
hunter and ready at his back for all emergencies, were
the principal accountrements of the warriors. They
troubled themselves not much about provisions. A
little parched corn supplied all wants, and the dried
venison in their pouches was a luxury, taken on
occasions
only. They knew that, for an Indian, the woods
had always a pregnant store, and they did not doubt
that their own address in such matters, would at all
times enable them to come at it.
Dreary, indeed, was their progress. An European
would have despaired entirely, and given up what must
have appeared, not merely a visionary and hopeless, but
a desperate and dangerous pursuit. But the
determination
of an Indian, once made, is unchangeable. His
mind clothes itself in a seemingly habitual stubbornness,
and he is inflexible and unyielding. Though young,
scarcely arrived at manhood, our warriors had been too
well taught in the national habitude, to have done any
thing half so womanlike as to turn their backs upon an
adventure, devised coolly, and commenced with all due
preparation. They resolutely pursued their way,
unfearing
,
unswerving, unshrinking. The river narrowed
17*
at length into hundreds of diverging rivulets, and, after
having run their canoe upon the sands, they were
compelled
to desert it and pursue their further way on foot.
They did not pause, but entered at once upon the new
labour; and now climbing from tree to banknow
wading along the haunts of the plunging alligator,
through pond and mirenow hewing with their hatchets
a pathway through the thickest branches, they found
enough to retard, but nothing to deter them. For days
did they pursue this species of toil, passing from island
to islandalternately wading and swimminguntil at
length, all unexpectedly, the prospect opened in strange
brightness and beauty before them. They came to a
broad and lovely lake, surrounded on all sides by the
forestthrough a portion of which they had passed with
so much difficultyto which the storms never came. It
lay sleeping before them with the calm of an infant, and
sheltered by the wood, the wild vine, and a thousand
flowers. In the centre rose a beautiful island, whose
shores were crowned with trees bearing all species of
fruit, and emitting a most grateful fragrance. The land
was elevated and inviting, and, as they looked, the young
warriors conceived it the most blissful and lovely spot
of earth. Afar in the distance, they beheld the white
habitations of the people of the strange land, but in
vain did they endeavour to reach them. They did not
seek to adventure into the broad and otherwise inviting
waters; for occasionally they could behold the
crocodiles
,
of the largest and fiercest class, rising to the
surface
,
and seeming to threaten them with their unclasped
jaws, thickly studded with their white sharp teeth.
While in this difficulty, they beheld a young maiden
waving them on the opposite bank; and Onea, the
youngest of the two hunters, attracted by the
incomparable
beauty of her person, would have leapt without
scruple into the lake, and swam to the side on which
she stood, but that his more grave and cautious
companion
,
Sanut, restrained him. They observed her
motions
,
and perceived that she directed their attention to
some object in the distance. Following her guidance,
they found a small canoe tied to a tree, and sheltered
in a little bay. Into this they entered fearlessly, and
putting out their paddles, passed in a short time to the
opposite shore, the beauty of which, now that they had
reached it, was even more surpassingly great than when
seen afar off. Nor did the young Indian maiden, in
the eye of the brave Onea, lose any of those charms,
the influence of which had already penetrated his inmost
spirit. But now she stood not alone. A bright young
maiden like herself appeared beside her, and, taking
the warriors by the hand, they sung sweet songs of
pleasure in their ears, and brought them the milk of
the cocoa to refresh them, and plucked for them many
of the rich and delightful fruits which hung over their
heads. There were oranges and dates, and cakes
made of corn and sugar, baked with their own hands,
which they cordially set before them. Many were the
sweet glances and precious sentences which they gave
to the young warriors, and soon did the gallant Creeks
understand, and gladly did they respond to their
kindness
.
Long would they have lingered with these
maidens, but, when their repast had ended, they
enjoined
them to begoneto fly as quickly as possible,
for that their people were cruel to strangers, and the
men of their nation would certainly destroy them with
savage tortures, were they to return from the distant
chase upon which they had gone, and find the intruders.
But will they not give you, said the fearless Onea,
to be the bride of a brave warrior? I shame not to
speak the name of my nation. They are men, and
they beg not for life. I, myself, am a man among my
people, who are all men. They will give you to fill
my wigwam. I will do battle for you, Anyta, with the
knife and the spear; I will win you by the strong arm,
if the strange warriors stand in the path. Alas,
said the young girl, you know not my people. They
are tall like the pine trees, which rise above other
trees; they look down upon your tribe as the prairie
grass that the buffalo tramples down, and the flames
wither. The sun is their fatherthe earth their
mother
and
we are called the daughters of the sun.
They would dash you into the flames, if you told them
of a lodge in the Creek wigwam for a maiden of our
tribe.
The Creek is a warrior and a chief, Anyta, and he
will not die like a woman. He can pluck out the
heart of his foe while he begs upon the ground. I fear
not for your people's anger, but I love the young maid
of the bright eye and sunny face, and would take her
as a singing bird into the lodge of a great warrior. I
will stay in your cabin till the warriors come back from
the hunt. I am no fox to burrow in the hill side.
You will stay to see me perish then, Onea, said
the girla gleam of melancholy shining from her large
dark eyesfor my people will not let me live, when
I speak for your life.
See you not my bow and arrows, Anyta? Is not
the tomahawk at my shoulder? Look, my knife is
keenthe sapling may speak.
Your arm is strong, and your heart true, you could
say to Onea; but what is one arm, and what are thy
weapons to a thousand? You must not linger, Onea;
we will put forth in the little canoe. I will steer to a
quiet hollow, and when thou art in safety I shall leave
thee and return to thee again.
It was with difficulty the hot-headed Onea was
persuaded
to comply with the suggestions of prudence,
and nothing but a consideration for the safety of the
maiden had power to restrain his impetuosity. But
assured
that, in the unequal contest of which she spoke,
his own individual zeal and valour would prove
unavailing
,
he submitted, though with an evident ill grace, to
her directions. A like scene had, in the meanwhile,
taken place between Sanut and Henamarsa, Anyta's
lovely companion, and attended with pretty nearly the
same results. A mutual understanding had the effect
of providing for the two warriors in the same manner.
Entering once more the canoe in company with, and
under the guidance of their mistresses, they took their
way down the lake, until they lost sight of the island on
which they had first met. They kept on until, far away
from the main route to the habitations of the tribe, they
came to a beautiful knoll of green, thickly covered with
shrubbery and trees, and so wrapt from the passing
glance of the wayfarer, by the circuitous bendings of
the stream, as to afford them the safety and secresy
they desired. The maidens informed them that they alone
were in possession of the fact of its existence, having
been cast upon it by a summer tempest, while
wandering
over the rippling waters in their birchen canoe.
They found it a pleasant dwelling-place. The wild
fruits and scented flowers seemed to have purposely
embellished it for the habitation of content and love,
and the singing birds were perpetually caroling from
the branches. The vines, thickly interwoven above
their heads, and covered with leaves, afforded them the
desired shelter; and gladly did they appropriate, and
sweetly did they enjoy its pleasures and its privacies.
But the day began to wane, and the approaching
evening
indicated the return of the fierce warriors from the
chase. With many vows, and a tender and sweet
sorrow
,
the maidens took their departure for the dwellings
of their people; leaving the young chiefs to contemplate
their new ties, and the novel situation in which they
had found themselves. Nor did the maidens forget
their pledges, or prove false to their vows. Day after
day did they take their way in the birchen bark, and
linger till the evening in the society of their beloved.
The hours passed fleetly in such enjoyments, and happy
months of felicity had only taught them the beauty of
flowers and their scents, and the delights of an
attachment
before utterly unknown. But the wing of the
halcyon ceased to rest on the blessed island.
Impatient
of inactivity, the warrior Sanut came one
day to the vine-covered cabin of Onea; his looks
were sullen, and his language desponding. He spoke
thus:
It is not meet, Onea, that the hawk should be
clipped of his wings, and the young panther be caged
like a deer; let us go home to our people. I am
growing
an old woman. I have no strength in my sinews
my knees grow weak.
I would go home to my people, replied Onea,
but cannot leave the young fawn who has taken
shelter
under my protection. And will Sanut depart from
Henamarsa?
Sanut will depart from Henamarsa, but Sanut
has the cunning of the serpent, and can burrow like
the hill-fox. Sanut will no longer take the dove to
his heart, dreading an enemy. He will go home to
his peoplehe will gather the young men of the nation,
and do battle for Henamarsa, Onea is a brave
warrior
will
he not fight for Anyta?
Onea would die for Anyta, but he would not that
Anyta should perish too. Onea would not destroy the
people of his wife.
Would they not destroy Onea? They would hang
his scalp in the smoke of their wigwams, they would
shout and dance about the stake when his death-song
is singing. If Onea will not depart with Sanut, he
will go alone. He will bring the young warriors; and
the dogs who would keep Henamarsa from his
wigwam
they
shall perish by his knife, and the wild
boar shall grow fat upon their carcasses.
Thus spoke the elder of the two warriors, and vain
were the entreaties and arguments employed by Onea
to dissuade him from his purpose. The Indian habit
was too strong for love, and his sense of national, not
less than individual pride, together with the supineness
of his present life, contrasted with that restless activity
to which he had been brought up and habituated,
rendered all persuasion fruitless, and destroyed the
force of all arguments. Deep, seemingly, was the
anguish
of Henamarsa, when she learned the departure
of her lover. A settled fear, however, took possession
of the bosom of the gentle Anyta, and she sobbed
upon the breast of the brave Onea. She felt that their
happiness was at an endthat the hope of her people
was insecurethat the home of her fathers was about
to suffer violation. She saw at once all the dangers,
and did not hesitate to whisper it in the ear of Onea.
All her hope rested in the belief, that Sanut would
never succeed in tracing his way back, from the
intricacies
of the swamp to his own people; or if he did,
that he would not succeed in guiding them to the
precise point in its recesses, in which her tribe had
found its abode. But Onea knew better the
capacities
of a warrior among his people. He seized his
bow and equipments, and would have taken the path
after Sanut, determined to quiet the fears of his
beloved
,
even by the death of his late friend and
companion
;
but the maiden restrained him. She uttered
a prayer to the Great Spirit, for the safety of herself
and people, and gave herself up to the wonted
happiness
of that society, for which she was willing to
sacrifice every thing.
A new trial awaited Onea. One day Anyta came
not. The canoe was paddled by Henamarsa alone.
She sought him in his wigwam. She sought to take
the place of his beloved in his affections; and loaded
him with caresses.
Where is Anyta? asked the young warrior.
She is no longer the bride of Onea, was the
reply. She has gone into the wigwam of a warrior
of her tribeHenamarsa will love Onea, in the place
of Anyta.
Onea will love none but Anyta, was the reply.
But she is now the wife of Echotee, the chief.
She can no longer be yours. You will never see her
more.
I will tear her from the cabin of the dogI will
drive my hatchet into his skull,said the infuriated
warrior. He rejected all the blandishments of
Henamarsa
,
and taunted her with her infidelity to Sanut.
She departed in anger from his presence, and he lay
troubled with his meditations as to the course he
should pursue with regard to Anyta. His
determination
was adopted, and at midnight, in a birchen canoe
prepared through the day, he took his way over the
broad lake to the island. It lay, but not in quiet,
stretched out beautifully under the twinkling stars that
shone down sweetly upon it. These, however, were
not its only lights. Countless blazes illuminated the
shores in every directionand the sound of merry
music came upon his ear, with an influence that chafed
still more fiercely the raging spirit in his heart. There
were shouts and songs of merrimentand the whirling
tread of the impetuous dancers bespoke a feast and a
frolic such as are due among the Indians to occasions
of the highest festivity.
Drawing his bark quietly upon the shore without
interruption
,
he proceeded among the revellers. No one
seemed to observeno one questioned him. Dressed
in habiliments the most fantastic and irregular, his
warlike
semblance did not strike the gaze of the spectators
as at all inconsistent with the sports they were
pursuing
,
18
and he passed without impediment or check to the
great hall, from whence the sounds of most extravagant
merriment proceeded. He entered with the throng, in
time to witness a solemn ceremonial. There came, at
one side, a gallant chief, richly dressed in furs of native
productionyouthful, handsome, and gracefully erect,
at the head of a choice procession of youth of his own
age, attired in like habits. Each of them bore a white
wand, the symbol of marriage.
On the other side came a like procession of maidens,
dressed in robes of the whitest cotton, and bearing
wands like the men. What bright creature is it that
leads this beautiful array? Why does the young chief
startwherefore the red spot on the brow of Onea?
The maiden who leads the procession is his own, the
gentle Anyta. Grief was in her face; her eyes were
dewy and sad, and her limbs so trembled that those
around gathered to her support. The first impulse of
Onea was to rush forward and challenge the arrayto
seize upon the maiden in the presence of the assembly;
and, on the strength of his arm, and the sharp stroke of
his hatchet, to assert his claims to the bride in the teeth
of every competitor. But the warrior was not less
wise than daring. He saw that the maiden was sick at
heart, and a fond hope sprung into his own. He
determined
to witness the progress of the ceremony, trusting
something to events. They dragged her forward to
the rite, passive rather than unresisting. The white
wands of the two processions, males and females, were
linked above the heads of Echotee and Anytathe
bridal
dance was performed around them in circles, and,
agreeable to the ritual of the tribe to which they
belonged
,
the marriage was declared complete. And
now came on the banqueting. The repast, fruitful of
animation, proceeded, and the warriors gathered around
the board, disposed alternately among the maidens,
Echotee and Anyta presiding. Onea stood apart.
Who is he who despises our festivalwhy does
the young man stand away from the board? The brave
man may fight and rejoicehe wears not always the
war painthe cries not for ever the war-whoophe
will come where the singing birds gather, and join in
the merriment of the feast.
Thus cried a strong voice from the company, and all
eyes were turned upon Onea. The youth did not
shrink from reply,
The warrior says what is true. It is not for the
brave man to scorn the festivalhe rejoices at the
feast. But the stranger comes of a far tribe, and she
who carries the wand must bid him welcome, or he sits
not at the board with the warriors.
Anyta slowly rose to perform the duty imposed upon
her. She had already recognised the form of her lover,
and her speech was tremulous and the sound slow.
She waved the wand which she held in her hands, and
he approached unhesitatingly to her side. The
Indians
manifested little curiositysuch a feature of
character being inconsistent, in their nation, with the
manliness indispensable to the warrior. Still there
was something marked in their habit which taught them
to believe him a stranger. At such a time, however,
the young men, intriguing with their dusky loves,
rendered
disguises and deceptions so frequent, that less
notice ensued than might otherwise have been the
case, and the repast proceeded without further
interruption
.
Then followed the bridal procession to the
future dwelling of the couple. The whole assembly
sallied forth to the sound of discordant music, each
with a flaming torch within his hand. They frolicked
with wild halloos in the train of the bridal pair, waving
their flaming torches in every direction. A small
stream, consecrated by a thousand such occurrences,
rippled along their pathway, upon approaching which
they hurled the lights into its hissing waters, leaving
the entire procession in darkness. This was one part
of the wonted and well known frolic. The transition
from unaccustomed light to solemn darkness,
producing
the profoundest confusion, the merriment grew
immense. One party stumbled over the other, and all
were playing at contraries and cross purposes. Shouts
of laughter in every direction broke the gloom which
occasioned it, and proved the perfect success of the
jest.
But, on a sudden, a cry arose that the bride was
missing. This, perhaps, contributed more than any
thing beside to the good humour of all but the one
immediately concerned, and the complaint and clamour
of the poor bridegroom met with no sympathy. His
appeals were unheededhis asseverations received
with laughter and shouts of the most deafening
description
.
All mirth, however, must have its end; and
the joke grew serious. The bride was really missing,
and every thing was in earnest and undreamt-of
confusion
and commotion. Vainly did the warriors search
vainly did the maidens call upon the name of Anyta.
She was far beyond the reach of their voices, hurrying
down the quiet lake with Onea, to the green knoll of
their early loves and unqualified affections.
There was one who readily guessed the mystery of
Anyta's abduction. The heart of Henamarsa had long
yearned for that of Onea. The rejection of her suit
by the scrupulous warrior had changed its temper into
bitterness, and a more vindictive feeling took
possession
of her breast. She determined to be revenged.
The warrior lay at sunset in the quiet bower, and he
slept with sweet visions in his eyes. But why shrieks
the young maiden, and wherefore the strong hand upon
him? Who are they that bind with thongs the free
limbs of the warrior? Vainly does he struggle for his
release. Many are the foes around him, and deadly
the vengeance which they threaten. He looks about
for Anyta,she too is in chains. Above him stood
the form of Henamarsa, and he now knew who had
betrayed him, yet he uttered no reproach. She looked
upon him with an eye of mingled love and triumph,
but he gave her no look in return. He knew her
not.
They took him back to the island, and loaded him
with fetters. They taunted him with words of scorn,
and inflicted ignominious blows upon his limbs. They
brought him food and bade him eat for the sacrifice; for
that, at the close of the moon, just begun, he should be
subjected, with the gentle Anyta, to the torture of fire
and the stake. A Creek warrior will teach you how
to die, said Onea. You are yet children; you know
nothing,and he shook his chains in their faces, and
spat on them with contempt.
That night a voice came to him in his dungeon.
18*
Though he saw not the person, yet he knew that
Henamarsa
was beside him.
Live, said the false onelive, Onea, and I will
unloose the cords about thy limbs. I will make thee
free of thy keepersI will carry thee to a quiet forest,
where my people shall find thee never. The warrior
spake not, but turned his face from the tempter to the
wall of his prison. Vainly did she entreat him, nor
forego her prayers, until the first glimmerings of the
daylight urged her departure. Rising then with
redoubled
fury from his side, where she had thrown
herself
,
she drew a knife before his eyes. The blade
gleamed in his sight, but he shrunk not.
What, said she, if I strike thee to the heart,
thou that art sterner than the she-wolf, and colder
than the stone-house of the adder? What if I strike
thee for thy scorn, and slay thee like a fox even in his
hole?
Is there a mountain between us, woman, and canst
thou not strike? said the warrior. Why speakest
thou to me? Do thy will, and hiss no more like a
snake in my ears. Thou hast lost thy stingI should
not feel the blow from thy knife.
Thou art a brave warrior, said the intruder, and
I love thee too well to slay thee. I will seek thee
again in thy captivity, and look for thee to listen.
The last night of the moon had arrived, and the noon
of the ensuing day was fixed for the execution of Onea
and Anyta. Henamarsa came again to the prison of
the chief, and love had full possession of her soul. She
strove to win him to his freedom upon her own
conditions
.
She then proffered him the same boon upon
his own terms; but he disdained and denied them.
Deep was her affliction, and she now deplored her
agency in the captivity of the chief. She had thought
him less inflexible in his faith; and judging of his by
the yielding susceptibilities of her own heart, had
falsely believed that the service she offered would have
sanctioned his adoption of any conditions which she
might propose. She now beheld him ready for death
but not for dishonour. She saw him prepared for the
last trial, and she sunk down in despair.
The hour was at hand, and the two were bound to
the stake. The torches were blazing around them
the crowd assembledthe warrior singing his song of
death, and of many triumphs. But they were not so
to perish. Relief and rescue were at hand, and
looking
forth upon the lake, which his eyes took in at a
glance, he beheld a thousand birchen canoes upon its
surface, and flying to the scene of execution. He knew
the warriors who approached. He discerned the war
paint of his nation; he counted the brave men, as they
urged forward their vessels, and called them by their
names. The warriors who surrounded him rushed, in
a panic, for their armsbut how could they contend
with the choice men of the Creeksthe masters of a
hundred nations? The conflict was brief, though hotly
contended. The people of Onea were triumphant, and
the chief and the beautiful Anyta freed from their
perilous situation. The people whom they had
conquered
were bound with thongs, and the council
deliberated
upon their destiny. Shall they go free?
shall they die? were the questionssomewhat novel,
it is true, in the history of Indian warfare; whose
course of triumph was usually marked with
indiscriminate
massacre. The voice of Onea determined the
question, and their lives were spared.
Will you be of us and our nation? asked the
conquerors
of the conquered.
We are the children of the sun, was the proud
replyand can mingle with no blood but our own.
Our young men will not yield the fair lake, and the
beautiful island, and the choice fruits.
They are worthy of women and children only, and
to these we leave them. We will seek elsewhere for
the habitations of our peoplewe will go into other
lands. It is nothing new to our fortunes that we
should do so now. The spoiler has twice been among
us, and the places that knew us shall know us no more.
Are we free to depart? Let not your young men
follow
to spy out our new habitations. Let them take
what is ours now, but let them leave us in quiet
hereafter
.
You are free to go, was the response, and our
young men shall not follow you.
The old chiefs led the way, and the young followed,
singing a song of exile, to which they claimed to be
familiar, and calling themselves Seminoles, a name
which, in their language, is supposed to signify
banishment
.
All departed save Anyta, and she dwelt for
long years after in the cabin of Onea.
THE YOUNG SIOUX.
Deep hidden in the forest wild,
Where yet the savage wander'd free,
A manly Sioux boy beguiled
The hours beneath a tree;
And gaily, in his native tongue,
A wild, unmeasured lay he sung.
Its theme was love, yet none was near,
No sunny maid to list the strain,
And save my own, no other ear
Might know the lover's pain;
Yet, as to please some secret thought,
This story of his flame he wrought.
To-morrow, on the Pawnee's trail,
Sweet Mann, must the warrior go;
And I must hear his women wail,
And meetly use the bended bow;
And hurl the spear, and lift the knife,
And win or lose the forfeit life.
I glad me that the time is come
To win among the tribe a name,
And in thy tent no longer dumb,
To tell thee of my flame;
Nor whisper, when the path is clear,
What thou dost tremble still to hear.
And 'mong my people thou shalt be,
The youthful warrior-hunter's love;
And he shall shoot the deer for thee,
As bounding through the grove,
With head erect, and hoof of steel,
He scorns the shrinking sands to feel.
And 'neath the gentle summer sky,
With me in valley and in grove,
Sweet Mann, fearless wilt thou fly,
To see the bison rove;
While, with an arrow from my bow,
I lay their boldest leader low.
And bring thee from the morning chase
Unhurt, the young and spotted fawn,
While, proudly, at thy feet I place
The skin from leopard drawn;
Torn from him, with a warrior's art,
Whilst yet the life is at his heart.
And thou shalt make the moccasin,
And well repay the hunter's deeds,
When thou hast wrought the red-deer's skin,
Worked with thy many beads;
Meet for a chief, when from the west
An hundred braves become his guest.
A TALE OF FAERIE.
THE IDEA BORROWED FROM THE GERMAN.
There be spirits that do lurk,
Where the yellow bees do work;
In the wild grass, in the flow'rs,
Now in sunshine, now in show'rs,
Ever in some sportive play,
They do while the hours away
Would your eyes their follies see,
And their pleasures?come with me.
I had been to the
soiree
of Isabel Beaumontyoung
Isabel, as her neighbours called hersweet Isabel, as
she truly deserves to be called. I had spent an
evening
most pleasantly; and though not extravagantly
impressed
with the many blooms and beauties scattered
around me, I was not so much of the stoic as to reject
entirely the influence of their sweet and various
associations
.
Besides, I had been caressed and flattered.
Isabel, herself a wit and poetess, had freely bestowed
her eulogies upon my own poor efforts in that way;
and though affecting a stubborn indifference to all the
honours of popular renown, I could not altogether resist
the gratification which its applause, coming through
the medium of such sweet lips, necessarily brought
along with it.
Why do you not come oftener? she enquired, as
she rebuked me for my past inattention; why shut
yourself up in that dim bachelor abode, with your
brother
sinners, denying yourselves the sunshine, whether
of nature or society; plotting, no doubt, as much
against the state, as against its female sovereignty?
Are you really so insensible as you pretend? and must
we in truth be taught the mortifying consciousness,
that charms such as ours can do nothing towards
making
you more civilisedmore human? Be assured,
unless you show signs, and those shortly,of a better
disposition, in sheer pique and mortification, I shall
quarter myself upon you. I shall penetrate your
innermost
sanctuarybreak the mystical silence of your dim
abode, with all the various real and imagined terrors
which the proverb has ascribed to the woman voice;
making your ears ring with a peal to which they have
not as yet become accustomed, and which, I flatter
myself
,
like other severe specifics, warrantable only in
cases the most desperate and hopeless, will go very far
either to cure orkill you.
She shook her fan threateningly as she spoke; and,
though trembling with apprehension lest she should, at
some future period, and under the impulse of some one
of those whims which have a large influence, at all
times, upon the female understanding, and sometimes
made away even with hersactually do as she had
threatenedI made large promises of future
amendment
.
I even went so far as to utter my satisfaction
with the terms and tenor of the proposed visitation; but
I need not say to the reader, with how much insincerity.
Three quiet bachelors as we wereso unfamiliar to
all noise and bustleso unwilling to be crowdedso
unprepared for such an intrusionwhat an awful
event was this for contemplation; and how could the
members of our college survive the shock and terrors
of such an infliction. The quiet deities of our
worship
,
effectually frightened away by the unwonted din
which such a creature would bring along with her,
would never look behind them in their departure, and
surely never contemplate a return; and all the repose
and security to which we had so completely given
ourselves
up, would be lost for evermore in the advent of
that terrible power, which, though clothed in petticoats,
is any thing but petty. The subject was quite too
painful for contemplation, and I did not linger long
after this dialogue. All my spirits, animal and mental,
had taken their departure, and I felt the necessity of at
once going after them. I found myself momently
growing
more and more sick and stupid; and, as the
arrangements
of the party were in rapid progress towards a
country dance, without beat of drum, I sidled along by
the noisy array, and found the stairway pleasantly
contiguous
.
Be assured, I paused not to number the steps.
I hurried home as quickly as possible; and marvellous
long was the breath I drew on entering once more in
safety the sacred walls of our symposium.
Such had been the hurry in which my exit had been
taken, that I had altogether forgotten to cast from me,
on leaving the abode in which I had suffered so much
peril, a fine, full rosebud, one of the first of the season,
given me at the commencement of the evening by the
fair hostess, with a grace and sweetness of manner
which was irresistible. I had, at the time, placed it,
with an air of the most tragic description, in the folds
of my vest, from whence, with a most lack-a-daisical
19
expression, it peered forth upon the company. With
my veteran habits, and grave temper, such a foppery
was not only unbecoming, but particularly ungracious
in my own sight; and I gave into it, merely to avoid
reproof for that ruggedness of demeanour which the
vulgar are always apt to couple with the pursuits and
temper of philosophy. Had I not been so thoroughly
troubled and terrified with the threat which had driven
me home, the
outr
appearance of such an ornament,
would not, as may well be supposed, have been suffered
so long to distinguish the garb of one to whom it could
yield so little satisfaction.
I hurried into the garden immediately on my return.
I felt too much disquietude to take my usual seat in the
sanctum, and had no wish for supper, in the
discussion
of which I saw that my two companions were
already lustily engaged. I threw myself upon a bench
that lay half buried in the long grass of our arbour, and
gave myself up to meditation. While speculating upon
the subjects suggested by the manner in which my
evening
had been passed, I unconsciously took the flower
from my bosom, and proceeded to pull it to pieces. It
was a beautiful bud, of the largest size, swollen almost
to bursting, and promising in a few hours to unfold itself
and all its sweetness to the desiring sense. At another
moment, and in another mood, I should not have
destroyed
it.I should have regarded the act as
inhuman
.
But now I was fairly roused and ruffled; and,
with a malicious delight, mingled pretty evenly with
an abstract wandering of my thought, I beheld leaf
by leaf torn away rudely from the purple mansion of
its birth, and crumpled cruelly under my unhesitating
fingers. As I thus toiled, I mused and murmured.
Yes, her tongue would make a fine abode for the
studentwe should never hear the end of itthere
would `be no sleep for all the house,' any more than
for that of Dunsinane. The same cry might fill our
ears as filled that of Macbeth. She would not only
murder sleep, but one would not be permitted a snore
beyond one's breathshe would murder silence too.
And, as I soliloquised, sentence by sentence, the
rose, leaf by leaf, was undergoing demolition; until but
the last circlet, the innermost fold of the poor flower
was all that survived, in mournful attestation, as well
of its own beauty, as of the misplaced generosity of
Isabel Beaumont. I paused as my fingers approached
this last recess. I shuddered at my own barbarity. I
could not help the thought which rebuked me for thus
wantonly destroying that which gave so much, though
perhaps momentary, gratification, and was at the same
time, intrinsically, so sweet and beautiful. How many
senses, so much more deserving than my own, had I
not deprived and defrauded of their proper solace?
What life had I not wronged of its true subsistence?
Though, possibly, not constituted myself to find luxury
or delight in a source so humble, were there not
thousands
to whom the bud which I had destroyed and
trampled, would have been both cheering and
charming
?
Would not the waning life of the consumptive
have gathered something from its fine odour and
delicate
tints, well adapted to gladden senses attenuated to
kindred and like delicacy? I shuddered at my
thoughtless
brutality, and was about to restore the remnant of
the dismembered flower to my bosom, when a faint
sigh rose from the still unbroken petals, which audibly
commanded my attention. I paused and listened. In
a few seconds, something, savouring of human tones
and familiar language, struck upon my senses, and I
bent down to hear. They had not deceived me, for
after a slight interval, a voice again syllabled forth,
from the bosom of the flower, sounds which, though
confused and broken, I was yet enabled to understand.
What did this mean?I was almost tempted to dash
the mysterious blossom to my feet, when the prisoner,
for such he was, as if comprehending my emotion and
design, appealed to me in terms of energy and feeling;
calling upon me in language of the utmost entreaty to
conclude the labour I had begun, and by destroying
his dungeon, release him from his captivity.
I did as he desired. I tore away the few leaves that
still adhered to the stem, and then, for the first time,
discovered the cause of that great size, which had
made it remarkable. A tiny and glittering form, with
shape like our own, but of dimensions the most
diminutive
,
rose from the recumbent and contracted position,
which the tightly drawn leaves had forced upon it. It
was slender and gracefulsymmetrically perfect in
every feature; and, with a face whose expression,
though delineated in a compass the most pigmy and
insignificant, was that of winning, yet manly beauty.
Its dress seemed that of the first and freshest leaves
of the early summer, the green of which was
curiously
and gorgeously adorned with hues of gold, of saffron,
and purple, inwrought and intermingled with the main
texture. Golden wings depended from its shoulders,
the seams of whose plumes, were of the richest raven
black, while the down of their extremities was of the
most brilliant yet delicate crimson. It was altogether
a being of light and loveliness. I gazed with wonder,
coupled with unqualified delight, and, for a while, had
no words to express either my astonishment or curiosity.
The little creature, in the meanwhile, as if desiring
more perfectly to comprehend his freedom, leapt
gracefully
into the air, making a dozen circuits, with a
whirling
rapidity indicative of his rapture, then, suddenly,
with an expression of the utmost confidence, stooping,
at last, and perching himself upon a clump of boxwood
that grew beside me.
And who and what are you? was my enquiry
upon his return.
Who?I? I am a fairya prince among the
fairies. My name is Sweet William. You, mortals,
have a beautiful flower which you call after me.
Wonderful! And how came you in prisonwhere
do you livewhere are your people? Tell me your
storytell me all about youand, how came you in
prison?
You shall hear, but first, let me thank you for the
prompt and friendly manner in which you released
me from my dungeon; but never pull a flower to
pieces so roughly again. I was in terror, lest you
should take off one of my wings, which had never
been so much jeoparded before. As it is, I have
sustained
divers rents and bruises which will call for care
and a leech.
Well, well!I exclaimed somewhat impatiently
I'm sorry I've hurt you; but to your story. I am
19*
anxious to know the history of your concerns. I am
curious to know all about you.
Know then, that I belong to, and form one of, the
Spring tribe of fairiesa tribe which enjoys its
existence
more perfectly at this than any other season.
Indeed
,
we know no other. We follow the season in its
round through the different countries of the globe, and
though we should not perish, yet we should suffer
greatly were we to be left in the enjoyment of another
period, for the influence and effects of which our
habits have not prepared us. Thus, for example, we
dwell with you in April and May, and as the season
becomes oppressive, we fly to a region less advanced.
It is thus we live, and, in this way, in the course of the
year, we have the entire possession of the globe. I am
one of the heirs to the chief rule of our tribe, and, but
for my misfortunes, and the injustice I have met with,
would be, even now, upon the sun-flower throne of my
fathers. But, adverse fate and fortune, with us and
ours, as with you and your people, has had its way;
and, instead of being a prince in authority, with an
entire
people in obedience at my feet, my legitimate sway
has been usurped and appropriated by anothermy
sister has been forced to become the wife of the usurper,
in this way to afford some countenance to his usurpation,
and, defeated in an effort to restrain these objects, I have
been placed in the custody from which you have just
effected
my release.
And who is this usurper, and by what agency did
he obtain so great an influence with your people as to
bring about such a revolution?
His name was John Quill, or rather, that was the
only name by which our people knew him. He was
an obscure wretchan author,a paltry fellow, who
wrote politics, and history, and criticism, and verses.
Le diable! and could such a creature effect so
much? It is not credible. The pursuit of letters, quite
abstract and reserved as it usually is, would seem to
forbid any approach to the strifes and terrors of popular
life, particularly at a season of wars and revolutions.
Why, so it is thought, but I am persuaded
incorrectly
.
Once aroused, and always an irritable and
discontented
race, I am satisfied of all creatures, these poets
are the most difficult to managethe most dangerous
to deal with. The only reason, perhaps, why they so
unfrequently interfere in the concerns of state and
government
,
is, simply, because they affect to regard the
prizes and honours of popular life, as unworthy and
beneath
the true dignity of their aim. Mere popularity
is not enough for those who are perpetually clamouring
for, and claiming, immortality.
You may be right, and, indeed, we too have some
authority for your notion, in our own experience; but
I am anxious to hear your story in detail:will it
please your princeship to go on with it?
It is long, and you may find it tedious; but, since
you desire it, that is no concern of mine. You pluck
for yourself the difficulty, and may not complain of its
thorns. Thus, then, as I have already told you, I am
the legitimate male heir to the Sunflower empire. My
father, whose name I bear, having reached the allotted
term of one life on this, was transferred, during the last
season, to another planet, and I was left in the
peaceable
possession of his throne. At the period of his
departure
,
I was wandering up the Oronico, in company
with the Star nation, for one of the daughters of which
I had imbibed a high admiration. The news was
brought me by our old and favourite servant, Will o'
the Whisp, who urged my immediate return. I
delayed
,
however, unfortunately, and in the delay, the evil
had been done. John Quill, always a moody and
somewhat
savage thing, who had commenced his life with
writing eulogies upon my father, but who, failing
thereby
to acquire place and pension, had become his most
bitter satirist, now appealed to the populace, and made
a faction among the vulgar. He talked of reform and
such other things, and by referring perpetually to the
supposed interests of the herd, he did not long want for
an attentive auditory. He went about making speeches
like the most thorough-paced demagogue. He called
my father a bloody tyrant, and me, he set down, as
little, if any, better. All the evils, whether of the laws
or of the seasons, were laid to our account respectively.
If there came no rains to allay the burning heats of the
sands on which we were to dance by night, it was all
the doing of one or other of us. If our sun-flower
crops happened to be limited in productiveness, and,
our people, in consequence, were compelled to
emigrate
to other sections of country, we were the guilty
and ours must be the punishment. In short, every
thing evil or unfortunate in our affairs, was laid at our
door, and, however wild the charge, the result you
must already have foreseen. You know enough of the
nature of a thoughtless and ignorant populace, wrought
upon by unanticipated misfortune, to understand how
it is that he who proposes a remedy for their real or
imagined grievanceshowever extravagant his
suggestions
however
dishonourable his motives, can always
most readily gather his faction, and will never want for
attentive consideration among them. When I returned
home, I was hailed with reproaches, and my reception
was blows. Unsuspecting conspiracy or assault, I was
made a prisoner, and placed in the dungeon in which
you found me, and for my release from which I am
solely indebted to yourself. John Quill, assuming to
himself the titular distinctions of our family, to which
he had not the most solitary pretension, seized upon
my sister and compelled her to marry him. He has
seated himself most complacently upon the throne of
my father, the golden sunflower of our exclusive
inheritance
,
and sways its sovereignty with a despotism
as wild and reckless as were his denunciations of our
rule. Our tribe is ground down by a taxation, the
most villanous and partial. My fathers, and my own
friends, are the victims of his wanton injustice. Their
property, if they dare complain, is wrested from them,
on the slightest pretences, and appropriated to the use
of his creatures. Nothing, indeed, can exceed the
gloom and misery which now overhang our unhappy
nation. Nor, as far as I can see, is there any apparent
remedyat least, not for the present. The usurper
has surrounded himself with his guards and
mercenaries
he
has expended upon them and the materials of
warfare, all the wealth of the country, and, in this way,
he contrives to keep in subjection the large body of my
own and father's friends, who might be disposed to
declare
in my behalf, while the fruits of their industry are
torn from them, for the pay and reward of those who
are employed in keeping them in subjection.
This is, indeed, a horrible state of things; but why,
let me ask, do the sufferers not unite in the common
cause for resistance to this tyranny?
They would do so, if they could at less
disadvantage
.
The usurper is in power, and has all its
advantages
at command. He holds the purse, and controls
the armoury of the nation. The idle, the dissolute and
desperate, considerable in number, are the merest
mercenaries
in his employ. A rebellion would be rash,
and almost hopeless, under circumstances such as
these.
But did your friends and party make no effort for
you at the outset? Did they suffer you quietly to be put
down?
Nothey did what they couldbut taken by
surprise
,
and imperfectly prepared for conflict, they made
head in vain. They were defeated in a pitched battle,
with considerable loss, and once dispersed, and without
a leader to direct, they have not had the spirit to
reassemble
for another conflict. Now that I am free,
though, as I have reason to think, surrounded by the
spies of the usurper, I shall proceed to organise and
rally them, as well for the recovery of their rights as
my own.
Well, what you have told, surprises me greatly. I
had always been taught to believe that you fairies were
the most sportive, pleasant and happy of all God's
creatures
that
there was nothing of strife, of sadness or
suffering among you. That you lived only among sweets,
and sunbeams, and zephyrs, with a life as sweetly
sinless
as theirs, and knew nothing savouring of
malevolence
,
which was not, at least, playfully, and not
injuriously
,
so. I grieve to hear that passions and a pride
like ours, disfigure your lives and blot up your
enjoyments
.
This has been the notion of your poets, but they
knew little in truth about us, and their fancies did not
go very far in their better education. We have our wars,
for have we not our women?we have our hates, for
we also have our loves: we have our fears, for we are
not without our hopes: we have our jealousies, for we
are not less ambitious of place, power and glory, than
yourselves. Judge then, for yourself, in how much,
possessing such characteristics, we should hope for
escape
from the trials and troubles of your humanity.
There is one matter on which I should like to be
informed. How is it, that, in the possession of spiritual
and other agencies, superior to ours, it should be
permitted
me to release you from a captivity imposed upon
you by one of your own species?
Did you not assume for our condition a destiny far
more grateful and elevated than it really is, you might,
without difficulty, answer your own enquiry. Superior
though we may be in many things to you, the Creator
of our common tribes, with that equal eye which is the
prominent feature in our ideas of the eternal justice, has
found it necessary to restrain our pride and power as
well as yours, by denying many attributes to the one in
common with the other. With this reason, a mortal is
sometimes permitted the performance of an act which
a fairy may not think ofand in this way we live as
mutual restraints upon one another. Do you not
perceive
,
that, without some such arrangement of the
overruling
Providence, your race would be entirely at the
mercy of ours? At our caprice, were it not so, you
would perish; as it is, we may and do annoy and
torment
you in a thousand ways, though your philosophies
have traced your annoyances to any other than the true
cause. It is well for both of us that we are under the
same equal protection from one anotherthere being
cases of exception, only, in which nations, differing so
decidedly from, and in some respects so adverse to
one another, may mingle together, and furnish in few
instances mutual checks and impediments to the
progress
or the desires of each other. It is thus, that a
fairy, enthralled by a fairy, may be so spelled in his
prison that fairy power may not effect his release. My
place of confinement on this occasion, happened to be
one, which, by our nature, we are not permitted to
destroy
.
The rose is sacred in our estimation and is
utterly
beyond our power. For this reason, it was chosen
as my prison, by my cunning enemy. The fairy who
destroys
a rose, descends from his grade, and on some
obscurer planet passes into a lower condition of life.
I understand; but, let me ask, if your enemy had
been malignantly disposed towards you, why did he not
destroy you? Why did he place you in a prison, from
which the chances of escape were so numerous?
You mistake again. His malignity was certainly
not less than I now describe it. He would have
destroyed
me had he well dared. But it would have been
a doubtful policy to have done so, since, even with his
own faction, there are some, with whom the blood of
legitimacy is still, to a certain degree, considered
sacred. There might have been a great re-action in my
favourand he feared itin the event of an open
attempt
upon my life. He chose a mode, however, less
fruitful in peril, but almost as certain to bring about my
destruction as the most direct design. He knew how
much the fortunes of the flower were under the control
of mortals; and relied upon the strong probability of my
being torn in pieces, or crushed under feet, as soon as
the little perfume of my prison-house had been
exhausted
.
Such, most probably, would have been my
fortune, had it not suited your mood to articulate a long
soliloquy, as leaf by leaf, with measured determination,
you tore away the walls of my dungeon; nor, as it is,
have I entirely escaped. You see by the rents in my
wings how much I have suffered in the mode of my
release
.
I was about to condole with the little prince on his
misfortunes, and to offer my assistance, such as it was,
in his cause, when, all of a sudden, his countenance
exhibited
the strongest signs of mental agitation. His
eyes were turned scrutinisingly and quickly in all
directions
of the garden, and without a word, leaping to the
rose-bush which stood near, he tore away several of the
largest thorns, and took an attitude and put on an air
of the most manly defiance.
As I feared, said he, my enemies are upon me.
The spies of the usurper have apprised him of my
escape
from prison, and the whole garden is surrounded
by his myrmidons.
I looked as he spoke, and, to my great surprise,
beheld
a numerous array, armed with long spears of
pointed
cane, bows of yew, blow-guns of willow, and arrows
20
fitted to them of the most pointed thorns of the forest.
They approached the young prince, who stood firmly
the assault. At their head came one, whose fierce
gesture
,
manner and authority, at once, in my mind,
determined
him to be the usurper, John Quill, himself. I
was right. Despising all humbler enemies, the
dethroned
prince, without waiting for the assault, and with a
rashness only commendable in the desperateness of his
situation, rushed fearlessly upon him, and challenged a
single combat. But he was not so to be encountered.
The whole force of the foe hemmed him round, and
pressed in upon himthey girt him in with their
weapons
he,
struggling and raging gallantly, striking
down an enemy at every blow, and resolutely rushing
on, and aiming at, their chief. But valour and skill
were nothing to the odds against him. He fought in vain.
He was overthrown. I saw him borne to the earth
his foemen upon hima thousand spears were at his
breast, and I could bear the sight no longer. I seized
a weaponI dashed forward into the arrayI struck
right and left. Already had I stricken the heads from
a couple, the most forward of the enemymy next
blow, and John Quill himself must have perished, for
my weapon was uplifted and hung over him without the
most distant probability of his escape with life; when
suddenly my arms were pinioned by a superior power
the weapon wrested from my grasp, and, in the twinkling
of an eye, myself overthrown and struggling for release
upon the soft carpet of our sanctuary.
Why do you hold me back? I exclaimed to my two
brother bachelors of the symposium, whom I now found
to be the powers which had so inopportunely arrested
the stroke of justice upon the head of the tyrant.
Why, what's the matter, would you break every
thing in the house in your sleep, was the reply.
I remonstrated with them in vain. Will you, then,
I asked, leave young Prince Sweet William to perish?
Will you permit that tyrannical usurper, John Quill, to
destroy him?and as I spoke, I again advanced to the
contiguous garden, which I had just before left in order
to procure the sabre which I had handled so lustily, and
which I now endeavoured to regain; but they interfered
and prevented me. Laughing in my face, they pointed
to the two victims I had overthrown. Alas! they
seemed
no longer the emissaries of the tyrant. They were
our two decanters of sherry, from which the heads had
been most adroitly stricken, and through the rents of
which the goodly liquor was now streaming over the
floor. The demijohn well-stored with the same precious
juice, which to my bewildered eyes had personified the
usurpating Quill, had been only preserved from a like
fate by the timely interposition of my comrades.
What have you seenwhat have you dreamed?
said they in a breath. I was dumb. It was true the
fairies were no longer before me, but I had certainly
been under the power of the
incubi
. I could not bear
the jest and laughter which assailed me on all hands,
and strangely wondering at the hallucination which had
so wrought upon my senses, I went hurriedly, yet full
of meditation, to my chamber.
I could not sleep. Was it possible that I had been
dreaming?that a narrative so methodicalso
regularly
drawn out to all its proper consequencesso
perfectly dramatichad been the mere phantasm of
my wild and wandering senses? I could not even
then believe it. The thing was impossible, and half
distracted between doubt and credulitybetween faith
and scepticism, I rose from my couch and took my
seat at the window which looked directly down upon
the garden.
There, all was silent as the grave. The winds had
scarce a whisper. The leaves waved not; and the tall
trees, with an inclination the most slight and shadowy,
barely bent themselves forward beneath the wing of
the zephyr that now and then stooped to take ts shelter
within their branches. Over all, the moon shone forth
with most incomparable and touching brightness, like
some guardian mother pale with watching, and now
keeping careful guardianship over her sleeping
progeny
.
The scene throughout was one of faeryof the
richest fancy, and it need occasion little wonder when
I say that my faith grew strong in my former vision.
All things seemed to contribute to the madness of my
mood. All things grew spiritual to the eye, in strict
accommodation with the impulses of the mind and
heart over which they had wrought so large an
influence
.
Surely I dream not now, and what means the long
procession which I see before me? Once more the
garden walk has its throng. The tiny tribes are at
work, and busy in the most various circumstance.
The flowers livethe trees have exercisenot a bush
or a branch lacks its arraythey are all in motion.
God of the various worldhow wondrous are thy
workshow more than wonderful art thou!
They are engaged in the performance of a mournful
duty. They bear the body of the unfortunate prince,
Sweet William, to the place of sepulture. They form
that class of his former subjects who had not altogether
deserted him, and are now permitted by the politic
usurper to do the last offices at his burial. Did you ever
see a fairy funeral, gentle reader. I would that I could
describe it for your sake. The monotonous hum of
the horn, blown at regular intervals by the trumpeter
beetle. The mourning candles carried by the
glow-worm
.
The chant of the bee-birdthe occasional
cry of the whip-poor-will keeping time and tune with
the sorrowing cavalcade, attest the loss which they have
all sustained; for the fairy is well beloved by the
innocent
populace of his garden regions. He is the
protector and patron of bud, bird, and insecthe
countenances their sports, shares in their pleasures,
and revenges their injuries. Should they not be
present
at his funeral?
They bore him to his sepulchre in a green hillock,
over which I had often rambled, Little did I dream
then of its peculiar uses. They wrapped his lifeless
body in the greenest leaves, and laid it with due
reverence
in the open grave, freshly hollowed out for the
purpose by the industrious hill-fox. Then came the
chant of the mournersa melancholy song, reciting
the virtues, and deploring the loss, of the deceased.
It told of his beauty of form, his gentleness of spirit
how he loved all things that were beautiful, and how
all things that were beautiful came to sorrow at his
departure. They described him now as the occupant
of a brighter and more durable garment of animated
20*
materialityas the dweller in fresher and richer
gardens
the
partaker of choicer fruits and flowersthe
sharer in more delicious sportsthe loved of more
lasting affections. Their creed was not unlike our
own.
But one lingered by the grave when all had departed.
A delicate forma gentle beautythe maiden he had
loved. She was one of the daughters of another tribe,
called the Star nation, and wore its badge in the shape
of a brilliant star, now suffused in sorrowful dews,
upon
her forehead. Her name was Anne-Mon. Long
and earnestly did she pour forth her wail over the form
of the buried lover. She planted a rose-tree at his
head, and turned away at last; broken words upon her
lips, and tears streaming from her long eyelashes. She
came towards my window. A sudden bound placed
her upon a branch of the tall tree, which hung directly
before it. I felt my head swim and my senses grow
confused at her approach. My limbs were paralysed
my strength was gonemy heart ceased its most
perceptible pulsations. She leaned forward, and half
sung and half whispered in my earswhat delicious,
what melancholy music. She told me the story of her
lovesof the misfortunes and the loss of her lover;
and avowed her determination to exile herself
henceforward
from all her people, until the hour of her own
departure to the sphere of her lover. It was to fly the
solicitations of another suitor, whom her friends and
family desired to force on her, that she had come to
this determination. This much of herself and hers.
What she next said concerned me alone. She spoke
of my youthof the wrong I was about to do to my
own nature, and in fate's despite, by the isolation
which I had been prevailed upon to adopt. Was I
happy, or could I be happy, shut in from the
associations
of that other sex, the communion with which is
one of the first conditions that comes with existence.
Such was the question, which, asked by her, the widow
and the desolate of love, I knew not well how to
answer
,
even had speech, at that moment, been permitted
me. She placed her hand upon my own, I was
incapable
of resistance. With a word, the import of
which, I could not understand, I was lifted from the
seat, which, in all this time, I had occupied. I was
conscious of motionof flightof a whirling rapidity
but of nothing beside. All then was confusion,
until, after a brief interval, the words of the young
fairy again fell upon my sense, in sounds sweeter than
music!
You would have saved him, and I would serve you
in return. While I dwell on this planet, let me toil for
the gentle and deserving. You have wronged, and
still continue to wrong your own nature, and I would
bring back your spirit to its better teachings. Look!
A gorgeous, but dimly burning lamp, lay on a table
before me. I was in an apartment to which I was
unfamiliar
.
It was a chamber. A richly decorated couch
rose to the ceiling in its centre, and as the light flickered
more brightly at intervals, I beheld extended upon it in
deep and sweet repose, the form of a beautiful woman.
The features are familiarit is Isabel Beaumont
herself
the
coquette, the capricious Isabel, for so I thought,
and as usual, I feared her. What do I hear? It is my
name she has uttered. What delicious tones. Her lips
part againagain she utters my name, and coupled too
with an association of sentiment so flattering. She loves
meme, the ennuithe discontentthe misanthrope;
and, oh! worse than allthe bachelor!
She never looked half so lovely in my eyes before.
Her hair wandered in rich profusion, raven-like, glossy
and of the most silken texture, over a neck white and
spotless as the new fallen snow. The drapery of her
dress had fallen, and I maddened at the prospect. My
soul was on firemy lips bent down instinctively to hers,
but before they yet pressed that virgin shrine and
mansion
of heavenly beauty and deliciousness, I felt the touch
of my fairy companion upon my arm. My limbs were
nerveless. My head swamI felt myself again in
motion
,
and knew nothing more, until the close and now
oppressive walls of my own room grew familiar to my
sight. A single sentence the fairy uttered, with uplifted
finger, as she left me.
You knowyou have seen and hearddeal nobly
by the maidenshe is worthy of all your love.
I had penetrated into a new world. I was another
creature. I had a new life. What now were my
emotions
was
this new feeling love? I could not resolve
my own doubts. I had no answer to the question which
perpetually suggested itself to my sense. I rose a
changed man the next morning. My companions had
no longer the wonted expression. I shrunk fromI
had no further confidence in themthey could have no
sympathy with me. My thought was only upon the sweet
vision I had witnessed the preceding night. Once more
I gazed upon that fair picture of sleeping loveliness.
Once more the broken murmurs of love which then
escaped her lips, coupled with my own name, inflamed
and excited my heart. But was it not all a dreama
fond, a foolish delusion. I grew more and more
distracted
the more I meditated upon it; until at length,
as night again drew nigh, I sallied forth. I will see
her, said I, I will watch her closely. No passion, no
prejudice shall blind me in my examination; and if she
look but pensiveif she put on no habit of capricious
vagary, I will confideI will permit myself tolove!
So I spake. Fond fool! I was already the slavethe
victim of the passion, upon the existence of which I
yet presumed to entertain a will!
She was aloneshe was sad. How beautiful was
shehow much more beautiful than ever, with that
unaccustomed
sadness. A slight blush (so at least I
dreamed) mantled her cheek on my appearance, and I
became more confident. With a hesitation of manner
and speech, quite foreign to her wonted ease and dignity,
she addressed me, with something of the air of
badinage
,
which had characterised, on her part, our last
conversation
,
a sentence or two which appears in the first part
of our narrative.
So you are come. You would crave forgiveness, I
imagine, for your uncourtly retreat last night, but I shall
not forgive you. What! shall we have no sway in our
own empirewhere all are pleased and proud to do
homage, shall one, alone, be permitted to withhold his
knee? It cannot be. The refractory knight must be
taught obediencehe must learn his duty and our
sovereignty.
She smiled, and the tones of her voice, in
correspondence
with the words she uttered, were intended to be
playful and sportive, but I could see the secret effort
the labour of her manner throughout; and when she
ceased speaking her eyelids droppedher lips became
slightly depressed, and her glance was pensively vacant.
Isabel, the capricious Isabel, whose sarcasm I had feared,
whose mirth had troubled and terrified me, now
appeared
in a character entirely new. She was no longer the
tyrantthe conqueror. She was herself a captive. Her
secret was mine, and mine soon became hers. The
college
of bachelors was endangered. The pledge which I
had made my brethren was soon forgotten in the more
attractive influence of other pledges; and night after
night, and hour after hour, of close communion in word
and sentiment, only linked me more directly with the
beautiful, the sweet creature, of whom I have spoken,
in language how far short in expression of a due
estimate
of her thousand attractions.
I had her vow, she had mine, and, but a few months
were required to elapse before our union. In that time,
however, we were to be separateda thousand miles
were to intervene. Business called my attention to
another region, and we parted, sadly, it is true, but full
of hope; without distrustwith no fear, no
presentiment
.
Sleepless I lay upon my couch in the city of.
In a week more, and I should commence my homeward
journey. In a month, Isabel should be mine. She would
sleep in my bosomthe pulses of her young heart should
beat in corresponding sympathies with my own. Such
were my fanciessuch the dreaming mood of my
excited
spirit. A languor suddenly overspread my senses.
I could see and feel, but had no visible motionno
capacity
of life. I recognised once more the form of the
young fairy before me. Her look was sad; she pressed
her hand upon mine, and shook her head with a
melancholy
slowness which had volumes of emphatic
meaning
in its manner. A sudden tempest passed over the
garden; the moon was obscured by clouds; the flowers
were prostrate; and, with something of consternation at
these shows of nature, I looked round for explanation
to where stood the fairy girl, but she had gone. There
was something of a strange terror to me in these omens,
and I only waited for the daylight to take my departure.
I lingered not, in my return, by the way. I hurried to
the well-known dwellingI asked for Isabelmy
Isabel
so
soon to be mine, at leastand they showed me
her grave. There was a sweet sympathy in the fortunes
of the fairy, and the no less spiritual being on whom she
attended. A strain of music that night came to my
ears, as I mourned in the solitude of my chamber on
the desolation of my hopes; and looking forth from my
window, I beheld once more the long procession, and
witnessed for the second time, the melancholy rites,
which like our own, distinguish the funeral of a fairy.
THE FEARFUL MEMORY.
The idea of the following poem was suggested by the perusal
of a single and small paragraph, rendered from a German
romancer
of repute. The object was to furnish a grouping of
successive
and corresponding images and ideas, in themselves vague
and indistinct, which would nevertheless form, when taken
together
,
a perfect narrative, such as, in matters of jurisprudence,
may be considered the collected body of circumstantial evidence
necessary to the conviction of the criminal. How far I may have
been successful in carrying out my design, it is not with me to
determine.
It comes but as a dream, yet is no dream,
And my rack'd soul requires no sleeping hour
To shadow forth its presence. It is here:
By daylight and in darkness still the same,
Keeping its watch above my desolate heart,
And, when it would escape to other thoughts,
Bringing it back, with stern unbendingness,
To its curst prison, and its scourge and rack!
Some years, and many thoughts we never lose,
Howe'er time changes. This is one of them!
Seasons on seasons, since that hour is gone,
Have passed away, with many a circumstance,
To root the dreadful token from my soul;
And yet its fearful memory, freshly still,
Stands by me, night and day;and, with a voice,
Monotonous as the evening bird, sends forth
One fearful adjurationone deep tone
Of dread reproach, and omen, and dismay!
It is no flickering shadow on the wall,
That startles me at midnight, and expels,
The sweet sleep and fond quiet, all away
Fills me with horrid thoughts, with many a dread,
And leaves me wan and spiritless at dawn.
No childish spectre, such as fancy paints,
Sudden, before the trembling criminal,
When the bell tolls at midnight, and the vaults
Of the old minster echo back the sound,
With replication wildhaunts me with scowl
Of horrible complexiona vague spright,
Of chattering teeth, and wan and empty glance,
And stale, lack-lustre semblance!Would it were
I were not half the wretch that now I am!
Back to that fearful hour, I need not look,
The past is ever present! There it stands
The time, the scene, the dreadful circumstance,
Vividly in my soul, and fresh as when
Each fell particular of thought and deed,
Came to me, as a parcel of myself,
Destined thence, ever, to abide with me!
Let folly, all agape, at some dread mask,
Wonder, with shooting pulse and bristling hair,
At the poor trick of fancy, which invests
Each fleeting, flick'ring shadow on the wall
With spiritual semblance. Nought of this
Troubles my sense, and with unmeasured arm,
Shakes some unshapely terror! I see nought
'Tis in my soul the fiend hath ta'en abode,
And yields not up his watch. There, all night long,
He tells the monotonous story of my crime;
Paints, in detail, each dread particular,
With horrible recital. On each part,
21
Dwells with a deep minuteness, loud and long,
Portrays my haggard fright to mine own eyes,
At mine own work of sorrow; and forbears,
Not even when day has come, and with it brought,
The busy mart, the crowded festival.
There, in the wildest hum, he seeks me out,
Becoming my sole partner. In my ear,
Some feature, even more dreadful than the rest,
With jeering tone and gibbering laugh of scorn,
He whispersand the sound like rushing fire,
Or, subtlest poison, from the mountains won,
When spirits are abroadthrough my chilled veins,
Without arrest, goes sure and fatally;
And all grows dark around meand I lose
The crowded presence, and the lights grow dim,
And I behold myself, again, as once
In that old hallthe long-gone hours restored
Darkness around me, save, at intervals,
When inauspicious lightnings broke the gloom,
And the foul bat from out his sooty wing,
Shot through the heavy air, a glimmering ray,
That deepen'd the accumulated gloom,
Of that deep gloom about me. Then, once more,
Appears that form of matchless excellence,
Creature of ravishing mould, and grace that came,
From Eden, ere 'twas blasted. Did I then,
Cold, selfish, worthless,as even then I was
Destroy a flower so bless'd and beautiful?
Bless'd in itself, and more than happy now,
Yet doubly bless'd with me its enemy.
She comes to me againI see her now
How glorious every glancehow smooth each limb,
In exquisite proportion, never match'd;
All rich but ruin'd, and the sightless gaze,
The sole perfection dimmed. Could I have seen,
That moment, what, a moment after, stood
Before each sense of my spirit, she had been,
A living creatureI, a happy one!
And yet, I struck her not. The blow thatreft
Earth of so fair a creaturelopt away,
Suddenly from its stem, as recklessly,
The ploughshare smites the daisywas not mine;
That crime is spared my soul; and yet, the crime,
For which I suffer this pursuing fiend,
Was not less deadly, though less dark and dread.
Yet, in that Gothic hall, as then I stood,
Scarce seeingall unseensave by the God,
Whose minister this demon has become
Even now I stand, beholding all anew,
With freshest glance; and ever since that hour,
Which brought the doom on her, the curse on me,
The deadly circumstance, the fearful crowd,
Of images, all terrible and stern,
Is
present to my soul. Before my eyes,
Limned in the outline, by a scanty gray,
Thrown in the latter aperture, from which,
The broken shutter, creaking sullenly, swings,
I mark a prostrate forma silent mass,
No feature markedno colour, shape or face,
Tone or expressionnothing to the sight,
Worthy the sight's observance; yet to me,
My soul aroused and with a spirit's gaze
All's clearall vivid, bright. Her eye no more,
Sends forth its fine expressionall is dim!
The dark knife lies beside herin her hands,
The fatal scrawl that drove her to despair,
Writ in my madness. I can see no more.
But madden as I move, for, at each step,
My feet do clammily adhere to the floor,
As if'twere clotted blood that bound them there,
Unwilling they should flyunyielding still.
In vain would I retreatfor as I move,
Wildly, with face turned backward on the scene,
I fain would fly from, down the narrow stairs,
I hear the trickling drops, keeping full pace,
In concert with my feeble falt'ring steps.
Bloodblood!pursuing wheresoe'er I fly,
And reeking to the heavens, and calling down
This vengeful memory, that, with demon spite,
Inhabits mine own soul, and makes me yield,
A prison of myselfof mine own heart,
A prison meet for mine own punishment.
What further of my story would you hear,
What boots the name, the deed, the hour, the place,
And each foul feature of what men call crime;
Brief name, to mark a history so long,
So wild, so very fearful as is mine,
Was hersis memory's still. It were all vain;
Words are not things, and fail to paint our thoughts,
When they are dark and terrible as mine,
Else, should you hear it all, from lips that now,
Blanch with the recollection. But you see
Its truth in what you see. A little while,
The demon will give up its dread abode,
And still will be the tongue of memory
Desolate soon must be its dwelling place,
And the torn spirit it has rack'd so long,
Freed from its presence and its bonds all broke,
Will seekah, will it find what still it seeks,
The form it crush'dthe spirit it deplores.
A LEGEND OF THE PACIFIC.
Why should there be a life, when that the love,
That gave to life its sunshine, all is gone;
The heart should die, then; nor in endless pain,
Broken, live on.
A Spanish vessel, touching at one of the beautiful
islands of the Pacific, shortly after the discovery of
Vasco Nunez had made them available, left, at its
departure
,
a young Spaniard upon it, who having strayed at
some distance from the vessel into the interior, had
been unobserved and forgotten. The island, at the first
glance, seemed uninhabited; and so indeed, in reality,
it proved to be, subject only to the migratory visits of a
tribe from one in the neighbourhood. Our Spaniard,
who was named Velasquez, was of good family, and
was among the many, seduced from the luxurious
enjoyment
of an independent fortune in his own country, to
the paradisal enjoyments accounted to belong to the
modern discoveries of the new world. He was not
unknown
to the perils of war; and, with all the chivalrous
spirit of his age and nation, he contemned and met
them boldly, and with sufficient firmness; but the perils
of labour for life were perils hitherto unknown, and the
first moment of consciousness which followed the
knowledge
of the ship's departure, was one little short of
despair. In a paroxysm of frenzy he cast himself down
21*
upon the sand, bewildered with nameless and
numberless
terrors, and frantic with their contemplation.
Velasquez was not, however, so greatly the nursling
of nobility and ease as to yield the contest to his fate
without a struggle. He was of noble spirit, and his
energy of character had been at all times his peculiarity.
He was romantic, too, and after the first paroxysm of
apprehension had subsided, the feeling of its desolation
was strangely connected with the novelty of his
situation
;
and, in a mood somewhat more lively, he betook
himself to a survey of the dominion, of which he found
himself in the exclusive possession.
The island was but a few miles in extent, and in the
course of a second day's journey he had made its circuit.
It possessed the shelter, from the sun, of several
delicious
groves, of which, during the mid-day heats, he
availed himself and found repose; while they yielded
him, at the same time, an abundance of the various fruits
common to these islands, obviating any and every
inconvenience
from hunger. A few muscles also contributed
to his repast; and the human mind, always subtle in
expedients when sharpened and brought into action by
necessity, did not permit the young Spaniard so quietly
to suffer, as to make his grief insupportable. He felt
his privations, it is true; but, with the philosophy which
comes of a stout heart and a buoyant spirit, he contrived
to make the best of a situation in which he had no
alternative.
The island upon which he was left offered no means
by which he might have constructed a shallop, for the
exploration of its neighbourhood. This, the main evil
of his exile excepted, was the chief subject of regret
with Velasquez. Could he have traced the waters
dependent
upon his sovereignty, he might have explored
the contiguous shores which hung before his eyes upon
the verge of his horizon, like a dim streak, curtaining
the distance. An arm of the sea interposed, presenting
a wall of waters to his progress, which, though but a
few miles in extent, was effectually a barrier to him.
Day by day, after providing for his repast, would he sit
upon the edge of the island, contemplating that faint line
in the distance, which he felt assured was inhabited,
and which he so longed to behold. Even the presence
of a savage tribe would have been grateful, assuring
him, as it must have done, that he was not entirely
alone. When, however, as was frequently the case on
these occasions of survey, he began to despond, like a
good catholic, he told his beads and said his prayers,
and promised many a pilgrimage to the shrine of his
patron saint in the event of her succour and assistance.
One day, while engaged in this mournful
contemplation
,
surveying the wide waste stretching before him,
ruffled into a petty fury by the influence of a sudden
tempest, he beheld a dark speck in the distance which
strongly attracted his attention. Its course was directly
onwards to his island, in which direction the currents,
operated upon violently by the force of the prevailing
wind, set steadily. For a long time with straining eye
he watched its progress, without being able to
determine
what in reality it was; yet a something of hope
kept him chained to the survey of its progress, with a
feeling deeply alive, as if it had an especial interest
important
to himself. It hadand, in a little while, our
exile had the felicity to discover that the object before
him was an Indian canoe, in which, however, he saw
but one person, managing it with wonderful dexterity;
and, though unable to control its progress in the one
direction, yet so guiding it as to steady it safely, even
against the influence of a strong breeze and a chopping
sea. The current bore it directly towards the spot on
which Velasquez stood; and he now perceived, with
pleasing emotion, that the warrior who had, with such
good fortune, conducted the shallop safely through the
waters, and under circumstances of so much peril, was
a young and beautiful Indian woman. All his
apprehensions
were now awakened to observe how she would
escape the breakers, upon which he saw the boat must
inevitably drive; and he rose, and, with a degree of
eagerness becoming indifferently well a young cavalier
of old Spain, he rushed waist-deep into the chafing
waters, ready to yield all necessary assistance. Nor
did he do so in vain. As the skiff entered the foaming
billows it became whirled among them with a rapidity
beyond all human control, and was torn at once into
fragments by their fury; while the young Indian, plunged
between two struggling waves, for a moment lost all
command of her person, and was borne violently up the
shore, and as violently forced back in their equally
terrible
recoil. It was now the moment when our young
Spaniard could render the service for which he stood
prepared; and, with unhesitating boldness and noble
vigour, he dashed in among the struggling waves, and
soon reached the almost supine and certainly helpless
form of the young savage. Grasping her with
tenacious
firmness around the body, he supported her upon
the water until the return of the surf, which he followed
with rapidity; pausing, however, and steadying both
himself and charge, with their heads towards the
returning
billow which broke over them innocuously. A
second effort placed them within their depth, and in a
few moments they attained the shore.
But the Indian girl, who was both beautiful and
young, lay without sign of life before him; and
Velasquez
almost wept to think that a moment the most
luxuriously delightful, which he had for so long a time
experienced, was possibly to be dashed by the loss of
the only creature whom fortune appeared to have
designed
to lighten his solitude. He did not despair,
however, but immediately proceeded to put in
execution
every available plan for her restoration. Nature
came to the relief of both; and the young Indian
opened
her eyes, which the Spaniard perceived to be both
black and beautiful. She spoke faintly too, and in
muttered sounds, which, though they did not syllable
forth his language, were as soft and tender as the
breathings of the night-wind through the twisted core
of the sea shell; and the already enamoured Spaniard
knelt down beside her, and gently raising her in his
arms, imprinted a deep kiss upon the pure coral of her
lips, that gave a beautiful relief and lustre to the clear
and sun-dyed brown of her glowing cheeks. The
action
restored her to something like consciousnessshe
looked around her enquiringly, and her eyes at length
settled long and earnestly upon the face of her preserver.
As sense returned, she spoke rapidly in her own
language
,
and seemed to make many enquiries, which
Velasquez endeavoured to answerthough he could not
understandin words as meaningless to her as hers had
been to him; but as in his speech his eyes had taken
part, and as the tones of his voice were mellowed into
a subdued and touching eloquence, all was not thrown
away upon her ear, and the young savage smiled with
unalloyed delight and artlessness, at the first lesson she
had learned in the language of the pale stranger. As,
at the first, in the primeval hour of the creation, the
speech which heaven bestowed upon its creatures was
that of love, it is fortunately the basis of that ancient
language which the senses of all men comprehend,
whatever may be the difference of clime and custom;
and accordingly, our two islanders were not slow to
ascertain the tenor of certain and sundry dialogues
which their spirits carried on. Thus, at evening, when
the Spaniard returned to his usual repose in the recesses
of the grove, which had been knotted overhead with the
sheltering palm, and strewn below with the long and
pliant cane-grass, she lay upon his arm, with the
confidence
of innocence at its birth; and the bridal hour of
the two exiles was as sweet and as pure as the love
that produced it was hallowed, and the destiny in which
it had its origin was solemn and peculiar.
The passion thus begun, and sanctioned, as it would
seem, by an especial providence, was neither slow to
ripen nor modified in its character. The desolation of
their fate, their separation from all mankind beside,
more nearly united them; and, before many days, the
young Spaniard, not less than his dusky companion, if
they did not altogether cease to repine at the isolation
of their fortunes, did not, nevertheless, feel this isolation
as a very particular hardship. In a little time he had
taught her the signification of some of those sounds,
which speak of our simplest wants and impulses; and
she, in turn, had not been slow to make him understand
those of her own language, which, having their origin,
as in all countries they are found to do, in some
general
impulses and necessities, are alike common to all.
Thus, day by day, they went on teaching and taught,
until it ceased to be difficult to make them comprehend
their several emotions.
Nor were the lessons of the beautiful Amayafor
such had she already taught him was her namebeen
confined to the use of words. She led him among
the rocks, at the tide-fall, and taught him many
mysteries. Plunging fearlessly into the deeps on one
occasion, and disappearing from his sight, with a wild
shriek of desolation, Velasquez leaped in after her.
He, too was an excellent swimmer, and with a joy
beyond expression, he beheld her in a vast hollow of
the deep, separating from their beds the largest pearl
oysters. He, also, like herself, soon became familiar
with the buoyant element; and though no longer
valuing a treasure, which in his own country had been
beyond estimation, he nevertheless employed himself
in gathering the precious gems, and storing them in
his habitation. Great indeed was the wealth which,
without any prospect or possibility of its use, the
Spaniard was thus enabled to amass; and when he
sometimes looked upon his stores, and thought of his
own sunny lands, and the rich vineyards and the
blooming
groves, which he no longer could behold, his spirit
grew melancholy within him, and he even turned with
a listless eye of indifferent coldness upon the young and
simple creature, whose love was little short of
adoration
,
and who should have been all to him, as, under
such circumstances, he was more than every thing to
her. At such moments of despondency on the part
of her lover she would employ the gentlest artifices,
the tenderest attentions; and sing in her own island
language, notes, the pathos of which spoke as
earnestly
,
in the deep and touching emphasis of their tones,
as they could possibly have done in the sense of their
language. Wooing him to those hollows of the deep,
formed by the growth of the coral rocks, her strains,
describing their savage enjoyments, and soothing him
for the deprivation of those to which his life had been
familiar, would sound not unfrequently, as we may
suppose, in language like the following:
Come, seek the ocean's depths with me,
For there are flowers beneath the sea;
And wandering gems of many a hue,
To light thy path and meet thy view.
And many a pearly shell is there,
In hollow bright and water clear;
And amber drops that mermaids weep,
In sparry caves along the deep.
There, with those thousand gems so bright,
Thou'lt never feel the weight of night;
But in one long and sunny day,
Thy life in calms shall lapse away.
It is not much, too well I know,
The young Amaya can bestow;
But, if a heart that's truly thine.
Is worthy thee, oh! cherish mine.
And I will sing thee songs of truth,
And teach thee tales of endless youth,
Such as our people's prophets hear,
When winds and stars are singing near
Of regions never press'd by time,
Unknown to grief and free from crime;
Whose sons, are spirits pure and high,
Whose daughters, beings of the sky
Of homes and heavenwhich, if we prove
True ever to our mutual love,
Our hearts shall win, where blooms and flowers
And fruits shall evermore be ours.
Come, let us rove the silver sands,
Nor dream thou of those distant lands
Nor teach thy spirit thus to weep,
Thy early home beyond the deep.
I may not give thee much to move
Thy loftier spirit down to love;
But mine, alas! no longer free,
I giveI give it allto thee.
I have no hope, where thou are not
No dream, but thou art there the thought;
No single joy, no dread, no fear,
But thou and I are mingled there.
And though, as our traditions say,
There bloom the worlds of lasting day,
I would not care to seek the sky,
If there thy spirit did not fly.
With a sentiment like this, of the deepest confidence
and love, did the young savage seek to compensate
22
the Spaniard for the loss of those enjoyments of his
own country, and for those many associations of
kindred
and society, which made him often turn upon
her a bleak and melancholy eye.
Nor were her labours in this way altogether without
the satisfaction of their most appropriate reward. Her
song won him from moody contemplations; and her
love, warm from the heart, and kindling with its truest
fires, made the wild blossom around him, and filled
him with associations, which, by their variety, serving
to divert his thoughts from the one direction, brought
his spirit a degree of relief, that supported him in a
life, to him, full of privations.
But a change was about to come over the spirit of
their mutual dreams. There came, at last, a tall and
stately vessel to his relief, in the approaching canvass
and make of which he recognised a countryman, and
a new life animated the bosom of Velasquez. The
bark came to anchor, and Amaya heard, with deep
sorrow, that prevented all speech, her lover declare his
determination to return once more to his native land.
In vain did she entreat, with a warm tenderness, that
was thrown away upon the senses of one too selfish to
yield, too cold to feel, too heartless and ungenerous to
consider, for an instant, the claims of one, from whom
he had derived so much in his solitude, and who had
kept back no feeling, no single sentiment, which, shared
with him, had yielded a solitary delight. Unpersuaded
to remain with her in the secluded abode, so singularly
forced upon both of them, she prepared to depart with
him; but what was her surprise and horror, when he
assured her such should not be the case; that,
hence-forward
they should be no more to each other than
strangers, for the first time meeting; and, when urged
by the sudden frenzy of the savage, he told her of
engagements
,
and a betrothed in his own land, which
forbade their further connection, she forebore all
speech, and, with a mournful sternness of manner, the
solemn emphasis of which he did not understand, she
retired suddenly from his sight. Nor did he experience
much regret, when, after a brief and coldly urged
search, he failed to find out her place of retreat.
He had now taken up his abode in the vessel, and
had removed on board the treasures, for such they had
now become, which he had amassed upon the island.
The young Indian had been a profitable companion.
She had explored the recesses among the rocks, and
had gathered the pearl oysters in abundance, with a
skill and courage known only to the people of her
nation
.
These, with lavish hand she had given,
unconscious
of the value of her gift, into the possession of
the traitor, who had so little deserved them; and had,
probably, in this manner, provoked that feeling of
avaricious
pride in his bosom, which could not tolerate the
idea in his own land, of acknowledging a debt, which
must have called for that gratitude, imperatively
demanded
by nature and humanity, but which would have
resulted to him in a forfeiture of caste and condition.
The selfish spirit triumphed in the struggle; and, as we
have seen, he did not hesitate to sacrifice the hope and
heart of the young creature, whose imagination and heart
knew no other inmate or object of regard than himself.
It was a night of storm and many terrors. The
tempest
was high, and the fierce lightnings, common to that
latitude, kept up a continued blaze, that seemed to fire
the black waters themselves. Secure in a safe
anchorage
,
the Spaniards were merry in a deep carouse, for
with the morning sun they were to take their departure.
The flagon was pledged to many a fair saint in love's
calendar; and, with swimming cup, Velasquez
indulged
in extravagant dreams of a beautiful Spanish
maid, the memory of whom had not entirely departed
from him in his solitude. Still he could not entirely
stifle the workings of his conscience. There was a
sleepless monitor within, that no draught could set at
rest; and all in vain did he seek, in ingenious sophisms,
to excuse to himself his proceeding in relation to the
young Indian. It was with this feeling of self-reproach
and remorse at work, though half stupefied with the
wine he had taken, and surrounded by those entirely
under its control, in an interval of silence in the storm,
such as so frequently marks it, when it appears to
pause in the collection of its scattered terrors, that his
ear caught the well-known voice of Amaya, singing
mournfully broken stanzas of the song already recited,
and which was now familiar to his ear. He rushed
wildly on the deck of the vessel, for he had a
presentiment
of some evil, to which this singular occurrence
now appeared to lend confirmation. It came more
distinctly to his ear, and with a glance, rendered acute
by the active spirit within, he saw, or thought he saw,
a form, dimly defined upon the waters, and floating
with them. The vessel, too, appeared to be in motion.
The song again rose
Come, seek the ocean's depths with me;
and, with a nameless fear, the Spaniard stood
motionless
,
mutely gazing on the dim and distant speck from
whence the well-known voice proceeded. On a
sudden
he understood the mystery. The vessel did move,
and, driven by the insidious and powerful current, was
setting in upon the fatal shoals and coral rocks, which
girded in the bay. The Indian maid had evidently an
agency in this; and the Spaniard well conceived, that,
familiar as she was with the neighbourhood, and
prompted by a feeling of desperation, which his
conscience
assured him was the natural consequence of
his desertion, she had employed herself with an
industry
that resulted in full success, in cutting with a coral
rock the cable that secured them in their position. He
rushed below, and sought to arouse the mariners to
their danger. With a stupid sense they heard him,
but refused to heed, and, indeed, could not be made to
understand, till lifted with a fearful energy among the
rocks, the frail bark reeled and shivered beneath the
shock of their first encounter. Then, indeed, but too
late, did they recover their consciousness. Another
shock, and she partedher back was brokenand the
waters, with a mad fury, rushed into her sides.
Velasquez
seized upon a spar; and floated off towards the
shore. But he was not alone. A wild form swam
beside
him; and the song, which invited him to the
flowers beneath the sea, had not ceased to thrill in his
ears, when the arms of the Indian girl were entwined
about his neck; and, with a laugh, which spoke of a
heart-broken revenge, that chimed in well with his own
shriek of agony, the lately forsaken Amaya went down
to the deep, clinging, with desperate frenzy, to the form
of the perfidious lover, who in vain struggled to be free.
22*
THE GREEN CORN DANCE.
This is one of the primitive and pleasing festivals common to
many of the Indian tribes of North America; and presents a
pleasing portrait of the naturally devotional temperament of this
savage people. On the first appearance of the green corn from
the earth, old and young, male and female, assemble together
in their several classes, and rejoicing in the promise of a good
harvest, unite in offering their acknowledgment to the Great
Spirit for his beneficence. This is the poetry of truthof religion;
and is one of those fine traits in the habits of every people,
however
savage, by which they still seem to indicate a consciousness,
not merely of a superior being, but of a higher hope and destiny
for themselvesa consciousness, which must always, to a
certain
extent, work out its own fulfilment.
Come hither, hither, old and youngthe gentle and the strong,
And gather in the green corn dance, and mingle with the song
The summer comes, the summer cheers, and with a spirit gay,
We bless the smiling boon she bears, and thus her gifts repay.
Eagle from the mountain,
Proudly descend!
Young dove from the fountain,
Hitherward bend
Bright eye of the bower
Bird, and bud, and flower,
Comewhile beneath the summer's sunny glance,
The green leaf peeps from earth, and mingle in the dance.
Not now reluctant do we come to gladden in the boon,
The gentle summer brings us now, so lavishly and soon
From every distant village, and from deep secluded glen,
They gather to the green corn dance, bright maids and warrior
men.
If the grave, the gravest,
Smiling, now come
Of the brave, the bravest
Give the brave room.
Loftiest in station,
Sweetest of the nation,
Comewhile beneath the summer's sunny glance,
The green blade peeps from earth, and mingle in the dance.
Now give the choral song and shout, and let the green woods ring,
And we will make a merry rout to usher in the spring
Sing high, and while the happy mass in many a ring goes round,
The birds shall cheer, the woods shall hear, and all the hills
resound
.
Fathers, who have taught us
Ably our toil,
For the blessing brought us,
Share with us the spoil.
Spirit-God above us,
Deign thou still to love us,
While long beneath the summer's sunny glance,
We see the green corn spring from earth, and gather in the dance.
A SCENE OF THE REVOLUTION.
Happening at the city of Charleston, in South
Carolina
,
some few years ago, and in the course of my
examination of all the peculiarities of that interesting
region, I took advantage of the first pleasant summer
afternoon, to pay a visit to Sullivan's Island, the site of
one of the earliest and best fought battles of our
revolution
.
I stepped, at the proper hour, on board the
little steamer plying between the city and the island,
amidst a large assemblage of
elegants
and
negliges
,
infants and invalids. Some were in search of fresh air,
some health, some pleasure and relief from business,
and not a few for Point-house punch and billiards. My
object differed something from these, as these severally
from each other; but though differing thus, all seemed
most harmoniously to agree in the desire of escape from
the suffocating heats of the city; and a general feeling of
good nature came over us all as the ringing of the last
bell prefaced our hurried departure from the wharf. At
the moment of our departure, a like movement by the
rival boat from the wharf below us, promised a handsome
race, as the boats went off evenly together. The
interest
excited by such a contest, the fresh breeze
winding
freely around us as we rushed fairly into the
beautiful bay, that swells boldly and broadly before the
city, together with the general picturesque grouped out
before us in the various scenery of that fine harbour,
gave a lively charm to the scene, that relieved the
invalid
,
and aroused the indolent and indifferent into an
emotion very like that of a pleasure. We rapidly passed
in succession the vessels at their moorings, the packets
on their flight, the rival steamer, Castle Pinckney, with
its brick walls, shelvy beach and dismounted cannon,
and in thirty-five minutes were at the island cove,
without
finding our voyage of some five miles and a half
either very long or very tedious.
I strolled with the more youthful and sportive of our
fellow passengers up to the house at the inner point of
the island, and facing the city, called the Point House,
and,
as was my custom of an afternoon,
called for my pint o' purl, which together with a fine
green cabanna, I discussed with a very fair amount of
self-satisfaction. The public, however, rapidly growing
filled with the living and laughing cargo of both
steamers
,
and as I detest a squeeze where more than two are
concerned,
I shook,
From out my pocket's avaricious nook,
Some certain coins of silver,
with which,
Thanks to the immortal bard from whom I quote,
For helping me thus far,I paid my shot,
and proceeded at once upon my pilgrimage.
Want a hack, mosser, cried the obsequious whip,
standing, reins in hand before me.
To be sure I do, Jupiter Ammon,
I replied, jumping into the smart gig, and at a word,
following the direction given by the dozen like vehicles
that skirted over the fine drive along the beach, from
which the tide was rapidly retiring. This is a
magnificent
drive, and yields at the same moment a pleasing
view of the city in the distance; the sea, which spreads
out in mighty volume before you, and the scattering but
lively village, about which you wind.
It may be advisable, though perhaps not altogether
necessary, to inform the reader, that the modern is by no
means the ancient Fort Moultrie, so famous in our
revoluntionary
annals for the fine defence which it made,
even before our declaration of independence, against
the British fleet under Sir Peter Parker. We know it
in history as a rude structure of palmetto logs, the
growth of the island, and all that it can produce,
morticed
clumsily together in squares, and filled in and up
with sand. This is not the case with the structure
now--a-days
.
All that it retains of the olden time is the name,
and, of course, the ever-glorious
prteritorium memoria
eventorum
, of which nothing can deprive it. The
palmettos
are all gone from the fort, and, nearly from the
island, having been found a lucrative source of trade,
and having given way to a rage for building summer
dwellings in that salubrious region of retreat. The
modern
battlements are composed chiefly of brick,
presenting
a somewhat imposing, and at the present day, a
rather martial appearance, having recently undergone
large and striking improvements. The garrison,
however
,
is small, and scarcely more than adequate to a salute
upon the national holiday. There is little more about
them at present to strike the spectator, and but for the
ever-grateful association which they must still maintain
in the mind of the American, along with the thousand
altar-places of liberty in our country, they might for
ever have been unknown and untrodden by me. But
under that hallowing and inspiring influence, having first
discharged Jupiter Ammon and his hack, I sat myself
down upon one of the old twenty-four-pounders that
looked grimly from the battlements, and yielded myself
to the thousand far-searching fancies that grew upon
the situation. One thought after another came
crowding
upon me, and I lingered, stretched at length, upon
the engine of war, looking up from sea to sky; on both
of which, the rich and mellowing hues of an evening
southern sun, were spread out lavishly and light, like
the almost living garments of heavenly looms. Below
me, scattered here and there along the beach, strolled
the various crowds, late my fellow passengers,
employed
in the endeavour to make the most of the brief
interval
of time allotted them between the arrival and the
departure of the steamers. Gradually, however, as the
light began to grow more delicate and faint, and
therefore
more surpassingly beautiful, in the western heavens,
and as the airs of evening came more freshly, and spoke
in louder tones of muttering from the booming waters,
their numbers grew less; and finally, but here and there
could the straggling wayfarer be perceived, darkening
with the shadow of a giant the white and tapering shore
of sand, that spread, far as the eye could reach, in the
distance around me. These few, also, disappeared in a
little while, and I was left alone to those musings which
bring more added satisfaction when enjoyed in the most
perfect solitude. The scene, of which I now seemed to
be the sole partaker, was certainly of that character,
which, if not interrupted in its influence, will never fail
to win the heart and all its thoughts to a highly refined
and touching, but still pleasing melancholy. All things
contributed to this end: the far city, like a broken cloud
in the distance, gilded gently by the last smiles of the
sun; the unceasing, low and monotonous beatings of
the sea, spread out before me in the undefinable and
dim distance, like our ideas of eternity; the soothing
softness and gentle murmurings, in its most mysterious
tones, of the evening breeze, gathering itself up from the
bosom of the watersnot forgetting the high and
inspiriting
associations brought by the
genius loci
all
conspired to infuse into my mind, naturally given to
such wanderings, a dreamy kind of insensibility, that
at length wrought within me a total forgetfulness of
my whereabouts, time, place and circumstance, and
lifted me into those regions of romance, so inspiring at
all periods of time, but so foreign to the matter-of-fact
of ours.
Gradually the whole scene underwent a change
before
my viewso gradually, indeed, that, until the
transition was complete in all its parts, I remained
perfectly unconscious of its going on. Strange lights
were before mestrange noises in my ears, and faces
glancing to and fro within my sight to which I was
entirely
unfamiliar. The fort itself seemed to have been
changed. In place of the level plat of folding and
long grass which had so gratified my eye, as it
received
my form, capping the regularly and
scientifically
built battlements, I saw little more than
huge masses of sand. The twenty-four pounder, too,
upon which, won by its pacific appearance, I had
seated
myself ere while, now appeared to have put on an
aspect the most antique and ferocious. The works
around gave no token of a very extended degree of
civilisation in the art of war; and presented, on the
contrary, the appearance of just such an enclosure as
one would expect to see raised in the forest, by the
pioneer, for temporary protection from the onslaught
of the Indian. All was heavy, elaborate, and
unscientific
.
The great body of the fort was composed of
palmetto trees, the tops stricken off, and the trunks
roughly hewn and dovetailed at their extremities one
into the other, forming a square, of some ten or twelve
feet or more, the spaces between being filled up with
sand, either in huge sacks, or shovelled in without.
There was something foreignexclusively foreign
in the flag itself, which surmounted the incongruous
fortification. There were no stars, nor stripes, nor
eagles, but a banneret of a blue ground, with a silver
crescent in one corner. Centrally, however, the word
Liberty appeared neatly worked upon it, as by the
hands of a fair lady. The interior of the fort presented
a prospect fully as picturesque as this. Forming a
triangle, three palmetto trees, still in verdure, waved
their pliant umbrella tops above four rows of white
tents, from which, at intervals, and without any order,
issued numerous small bodies of militia-men in various
guises, half military, half civil. Some of them wore
23
caps of the most fantastic make, domestic evidently,
and of fox and 'coon skins. Others again, aspiring to
something more of uniform in their arrangements, had
on head dresses, of the glazed leather now familiarly
known, on which the word liberty was imprinted in
huge yellow capitals. Groups of officers, here and
there upon the battlements, gazed intently through
telescopes at some distant objects upon the sea, to
whose appearance and approximation we were
evidently
indebted for all the excitement and commotion
afoot. Martial music rung out cheerily, at intervals,
along the old battlements, infusing a sentiment of life
and animation into all around, and of the increasing
influence of which, I felt my own spirit momentarily
partaking. As yet, however, I could not exactly
realise
the nature of my situation or of the things about
me. I knew none of the faces which I then sawthey
had an ancient, if not a foreign air; and their dress, in
comparison with my own, was of the most antique
fashion
.
Unwittingly, however, though I could
comprehend
nothing of the true meaning of the scene, I had
engaged along with others in the performance of its
duties. As I did this, I began to make acquaintances.
Some, I appeared as intimate with as if I had known
them a thousand years; and while I felt, all at once,
perfectly at home, I knew so little of the matter I was
engaged in, that I could not avoid making a comparison
of my own pursuit with that of the soldier, to whom
all causes were the same so that he got the fighting,
who frequently changed sides during an engagement,
returned as found by the one and missing by the other.
But I had no reason for doubt long. An increased
clang of martial instruments hurried our preparations,
and standing at a gun with hundreds of others, the
whole truth burst at once upon my understanding.
There came, in fearless pomp, a well appointed
armament
.
Ship after ship, a strong array, armed with
storm and thunder. It was the red cross of old
England
that came on to the assaultit was the infant
phalanx of Carolina, as a colony, that prepared to
contend with her. I feltI saw the whole mystery,
in a moment, as by some familiar instinct; and awe,
delight, a wild, sweet anxietyall struggled
confusedly
in my bosom. I felt the inspiration of battle
the rapture of the strife. The faces around, each
differing in general expression, had also the same
feature
of enthusiasm with mine. There was one stern,
strong man that had us in command. That was
Moultrie
.
There was no child's-play in his features, though,
except when roused, they wore a decidedly apathetic
expression. His face was broad, large, and
comprehensive
his
forehead, high and comprehensivehis
lips compressed with the concentrated energies of a
character strikingly distinguished for its firmness. He
came and spoke to us, and but few words. But they
were words of mightof a man. We cheered him, as
he spoke, without knowing it, and he went from group
to group, and from gun to gun, and there was no
flinching spirit after he had spoken. As the danger
grew more evident and unavoidable, anticipation found
increased expansion and activity, as night, on the
approach
of day, puts on her darker and more imperial
aspect. Our magazine was now thrown open
our arms in readinessour flag run up on the heights.
Marshalled with others, I took my place about the
rude embrasure, through which we thrust, well-shotted,
an English eighteen pounder, not doubting, that, like
ourselves, it would have no unwillingness to do duty
against its former proprietorsand, indeed, to do it all
possible justice, throughout the whole of the contest,
from beginning to end, it exhibited not the slightest
reluctance. And now we stoodand this was the
moment of fear and anxietyawaiting the awful
moment
.
It is not often that men grow impatient at the
approach of the enemy, and yet, I feel, such was our
enthusiasm, that there were but few, if any, among us,
who, however conscious as were we all that the time
was big with events, not only of moment, but for
which we were almost entirely unprepared, yet felt any
apprehension of its consequences, or any great desire
to get away from them. But we were not suffered to
remain long in suspense. On came the foe, in a
regular
line, to the struggle. First, leading the van, came
the Active, of twenty-eight guns, keeping her way, till
within four hundred yards of our little fortress, then
anchoring, with springs on her cables, giving us a
broadside which went clear over us. Following the
same course, came the flag ship Bristol, of fifty guns,
under the command of Sir Peter Parker, himselfthen
the Experiment of fifty, the Solebay, the Syren, the
Acteon, all of twenty-eight gunsthe Sphinx, the
Friendship, each of twenty-sixthe Thunder bomb,
and a host of supernumerariesa formidable armament,
to be sure, and one well calculated to provoke
misgivings
in the minds of those having the highest
possible
opinion of British valour and a British fleet, and
themselves wholly unaccustomed to war. But when
we involuntarily bent our eyes to where lay our fair
and lovely city, rising, almost like another Venice,
from the bosom of the seawhen we saw the crowd of
friends and fellow citizensthe thousands covering its
battlementstemporarily made like our ownwatching
anxiously the manner of our performanceswhen, too,
under the influence of an imagination, ever obedient
to the excited sense, and assuming, on such an
occasion
,
the powers of a winged spiritwe could perceive
the emotions of their souls in visible array upon their
facesand could see the hope, the fear, and that worst
agony of all, the dreadful suspense which gave to these
antagonist elements the full sway of the heart for their
warfarepainting visibly their deep interest in our
fightthere was no shrinking among us. Our
struggle
was literally for themI do not believe we thought
of ourselves at that moment. How long they were to
remain unemployed, was problematical; but, according
to the most currently received opinions of British
prowess, the overture of our palmetto fortress, was
held only preparatory to the mightier issue of the
main; and with a hope, which was yet as much a
doubt as a hope, that we should be able to do
something
towards taking the sting from the invader, we
braced our souls to the strife, and looked fearlessly
forth upon our enemy.
Let us survey the conflict. Let us witness the young
giant in his morning throw. Let us see if he bears
himself manfully as becomes the cause for which he
encounters such visible odds. The ships of the
enemy
advance in heavy array to the battle, like so many
23*
storm-bringing clouds; yet, how beautiful is their
approach
with
all the calmness that might be supposed
the result of a perfect consciousness of certain victory.
Playfully, the blue waters break away from before their
prowshow silenthow awfully serene is the
prospect
.
Can they come for the purposes of strife.
Where are the ensigns of battlewhere is the fury
the stormthe thunder? Yet, the very silentness of
their approach indicates their object. Though calm
and winning their gallant bearingthough the waters
and the sky are unruffled, terror, muffled up in clouds,
rides threateningly in the distance. Yet, where is
their enemy, and with whom would they contend?
What foe stands forth for the conflictwhat ensign
floats royally in the airwhat trumpet speaks the
defiance
of a rival, confident in prowess, and well known
in the slaughter field of nations? Thus free, to all
appearance, from any opposition, did the fleet of old
England advance to the attack upon her refractory
colony. The eagle had not yet spread forth her wings
amongst the stars, and the banner of Carolina, in her
first field, was a simple strip of blue cloth, bearing a
silver crescent. This little ensign waved silently over
the palmetto battlements, humbly proportionate to
itself. Few were the hearts, and anxiously did they
beat, within that enclosure; but they were firm and
fearless, and gallantly devoted to the danger. As yet,
little appears to indicate the approaching conflictno
bugle calls to armsno knightly challenge is heard.
Death is the bearer of his own summons, and he comes
in silence to his repast. God of the battle-storm, how
terrible art thou!
It was at this moment of repose, that my attention
was called to one of my comrades, whose name was
M`Daniel. As I turned to the salutation, I could not
help being struck with the contradictory expression of
a countenance, scarcely yet marked with the imposing
lines of manhood. His appearance was, indeed,
remarkably
boyish, even for his years, which were few;
and his face was full of blood, and softly and
attractively
rounded. Still, his person was of the most manly
makesturdy, broad-chested, and athletic. As he
spoke there was a degree of tremulous sadness in the
tone of his voice, prevailing above the studied gaiety
of his address. There was too, a dewy suffusion upon
his long eye-lashes, which was sadly at variance with
what might be looked for in the expression of a soldier.
His object in addressing me was curiously melancholy.
It was to make one of those contracts, not unfrequently
entered into by soldiers upon the eve of an
engagement
,
when a presentiment of death warns them to a
testament of their last wishes and effects. In the
trade of blood, such events are of frequent occurrence,
and add another to the thousand testimonies against a
profession, deriving its character and importance
entirely
from the miseries of humanity.
I shall fall, said he, mournfully. I know it. I
have had my warning, and there's no use to argue with
me upon the matter. I am as perfectly convinced that
I shall perish in this day's fight, as if I had seen it
written upon the heavens.
And what is the warning you have hadwhat
shape did it assume; and from what testimonies would
you infer its authority thus to prepare you?
You would laugh, perhaps, were I to undertake
to array them to your mind, because, to the common
thought all evidence not conclusive and substantial,
would necessarily be rejected. But I am disposed to
believe that there is a higher connection between the
worlds of humanity and spirits, than we are generally
willing to assert or acknowledge. I am satisfied too, that
the soul sometimes asserts its freedom long before its
escape from the clay, and taking, in anticipation, the
wings to which it shall shortly lay claim, arrives at the
conviction of the truth, in advance of its own presence.
Perhaps this is now my case, for, beyond the irresistible
mental conviction, and one or two positive, but as you
will say, trifling circumstances, I have no other reason
for the strong faith that is within me.
And what are these other circumstances?
He took his watch from his fob, and pointing to the
shattered chrystal, replied
As I left my quarters this morning, I took this
watch, the gift of my father, from my pocket, simply
to ascertain the hour. As I looked upon it, a film
overspread my own visiona sudden dizziness, as it
were,and when objects became again distinct, as in
a moment after they did, I found the glass shattered,
without stroke or blow, in the manner in which it now
appears. This you will, of course, hold a trifle. It
may be so, but it has its influence upon me, and leads
me to the belief that it is ominous of my approaching
fate. If I fall, therefore, which I myself doubt not,
carry my farewell to my poor mother, and give her
this little bag containing a sum of money, which,
though small in itself, will, nevertheless, be an item of
some importance to her. The watch you will wear
yourself, in return for another favour, which, after
death, I shall need at your hands. Have me taken to
the city for burial, if that be possible.I would not like
to be thrust rudely into these sand-hills, burrowed after
by birds, or laid bare by tempests.
I found all argument vain; and, indeed, we had not
time for much, if any. I received his little deposite at
last, and he was satisfied. Our colloquy was
discontinued
,
as we were now called to the performance of
our several duties. We were both stationed at the
same gun, and many were the glances which I cast
upon his countenance, but it had now nothing
dispirited
in it. The enthusiasm of strife had removed all
trace of gloom from his features. The settled
determination
of true courage, alone, was there to be seen,
in the contracted brow, the compressed lip, the
distended
nostril.
The signal is at last giventhe suspense is over
the action is begun, and one wild interminable terror
shakes the late peaceful waters. The iron rattles upon
our tottering fabric, whose voice is scarce heard in
reply
.
It is almost silenced, for such is our poverty, that
an adequate quantity of powder had not been, and
could not be, provided, without too greatly subtracting
from the defence of the city. A stern old officer came
to us in the wildest of the confusion.
How now, he exclaimedyou use up powder
as if it were punch; have you no more respect for
the enemy than to give them so much powder and so
little ball? Your discharges are quite too frequentit
will not do. You must shoot more truly and more
slowly; and carefully adjusting our cannon before its
discharge, he sighted it himself, and watched its effect,
as it unerringly drove through the thick ribs of the
huge vessel riding before us. That will do, said he,
as he left us, proceeding in like manner to each
cannonier
along the battlements. Who would have known
the stern, almost apathetic, Moultrie, in the easy, the
almost playful alacrity of the veteran who had just left
us.
We now regulated the piece by turnsM`Daniel
and myself. It was for my comrade to perform
this office. He bent himself along the gun, slightly
varied its range, and as he drew his form up to its
height, our whole fort reeled beneath a general
broadside
from the entire fleet of the enemy. Our gun,
undischarged
,
rushed back from the embrasure, throwing
me, with several others, upon the rugged platform,
some feet below us. A sudden cry of dismay ran like
fire along the line. The flag is shot awayit is
downall is over. I bent my eyes instinctively to the
merlin on which it rested. It was indeed gone. I
felt, I know not how. I was madlike the wild boar
stung by the serpent; for the loud huzzas of the
British could be distinctly heard, as they witnessed
what they considered our defeat. On a sudden,
however
,
the flag was again elevated, and waving in the
sight of all. A slight dark from was beheld, amidst
the hottest fire, binding it upon the staff, with the silk
handkerchief which had enveloped his neck. All
knew him by that handkerchief, which, from its
peculiarity
had heretofore identified him. It was Jasper
the daring Sergeant Jasper. He succeeded. The flag
was firmly knotted to the staff, and he descended in
safety, after an exposure of several seconds to the most
dangerous fire. The shouts were vociferous along our
fortress. A faint voice, after all other voices had ceased,
repeated the huzza at my side. I shuddered,
unconsciously
,
as I heard it, and turning, beheld my comrade
almost torn to pieces, Huzza! once more
exclaimed
the dying manhuzza!I am dying, but don't let
the cause of liberty die with me!
[1]
[1]
Historical.
The words run through my veins like electricity. I
shouted them aloudand in a moment, Liberty!
liberty or death! rung terrifically along our
battlements
.
Every voice repeated it; and in that moment
of the most savage terror, I felt that we all realised the
rapture of the strifean enjoyment not peculiar to
Alaric. Every gun was discharged with the shout, and
with an effect the most fearful and decided. The vessel
of the commodore was almost lifted from the water;
her stays were shot away, and she swung round, with
her bowsprit directly upon the guns of the fort. A
voice went up from the lineall heard it, yet none
knew whence it came. Look to the commodore, my
boysremember M`Daniel. Every gun that could be
made to bear upon this fated ship attested the warm
recognition given to the direction, and three successive
discharges went through her before she could be
righted
.
She was raked fore and aft. Her quarter deck
was cleared of every officer but Sir Peter Parker
himself
,
and he fell severely wounded. She was bored in
every direction by the bullets, and the blood ran
smoking
in large streams from her scuppers, and bubbling
upon the black and reeling waters around her. Vainly
does the gallant chief, bleeding and almost alone, call
upon his followers for the honour of old England. The
courage of desperation is in his eyehe cheers, fights,
soothes, and imprecates, but in vain. They will hear,
they will obey him no longerdead or dying around
him, even the name of old Englandthe recollections
of past glorythe recollections of their homeswill
arouse them no more. God of battles, how terrible art
thou!
The cloud is gone from above the fearful scene.
Can it be true? Have the warriors of Britain deserted
the combat, shorn of glory and victory, by such young
adventurers in the race of fame? Look again! The
sight is grateful to freedom. What fitter offering for
her shrine than the blood of the oppressorwhat
incense
more grateful than the burning fleets of invasion.
They sunk before us as the prairie grass before the fire
they took no laurels on that consuming field. The
sling of the shepherd had overthrown the gladiator of
war!
Seldom, O! Victory, hath thy bird of triumph settled
down upon the banners of the just. Thou hast
followed
,
with ungenerous spirit, in the wake of empire and
aggression. Thy beak hath been whetted upon the
hearts of the free, and thy talons are yet dripping with
the life-blood of freedom. Thou hadst no wing for
liberty. Thou hast carried no weapon for the avenging
of human wrong. Thou hast been the ally of bold
Tyranny and consuming Carnage, and hast drunken of
human suffering as of an ocean, until the old world has
been peopled with the widow and the orphan. Well is
it for man and humanity that in the New thou art
endeavouring
to retrace thy path, and redeem the errors of
the Old. There is now a better hope for the nations,
since, long obedient to the dictates of usurpation, thou
hast deserted him at last. Thou hast given in this, a
new guarantee of life and liberty to man, and a new pledge
of a more elevated, and a more lasting glory!
They have fledthey are gone! I shouted aloud
triumphantly. Ay, ay, sir, both the Charleston
and Macon
[2]
[2]
The two steamers plying at that period between the city of
Charleston and Sullivan's Island.
have gone three hours ago, and you'll
not find a packet now, on any terms; was the
somewhat
unceremonious, and certainly unlooked for, speech
of a tall fellow in the United States uniform, who now
stood before me. I rubbed my eyes, and as I looked
upon the broad sheet of water before me, on which the
moon had spread a thin and beautiful garment of
fretted
silver, I saw through the whole mystery.
Sir! said I, half stupid and scarcely well awake,
arising from the grassy mound upon which I had lain.
Ay, sir, the boats have all left you full three
hours ago. You will have to sleep on the island
to-night
,
though, to be reasonable, your nap has been
something long already. You seemed to enjoy it so
well that I could not find it in my heart to wake you.
Too polite by half, was my involuntary
exclamation
,
as I set off to look out lodgings for the rest of the
night.
24
THE CHOCTAW CRIMINAL.
Among the Choctaws of Mississippi, blood for blood
is studiously insisted upon, unless the shedding of it
take place in a fair and equal fight. It is made
legitimate
by this circumstance only. The desire of justice
among this people, and in reference to themselves, is
productive of frequent events, startling, from their
scrupulous
morality, to the less exact Christian. An
instance
of this nature came under my own observation.
Travelling in the state of Mississippi, some few years
since, I found, after a long and fatiguing ride over bad
and lonely roads, that I was at length approaching
something that savoured of a human settlement. The
marks of man are easily known in the wilderness, long
ere you approach his habitations. The long worm
fence, the openings between the trees, the unimpeded
sweep of the winds through the clear open space, the
lowing of distant cattle, and, now and then, the shrill
halloo of the farmer's boy, articulated in half the
number
of instances entirely to diminish the solitude
spreading
about him, are sufficient indications; and on the
present occasion, they became, if not a positive
pleasure
,
an object of no little importance and gratification.
My ill humour at my long day's travel began to
dissipate
;
and what with meditating upon the smoking
supper at hand, of ham and eggs, fresh butter, and
round and glowing biscuits of new Ohio flour,and
the promise of a sweet night's rest after the fatigues of
the day, it appeared to me, that happiness, after all
at least for a timewas no such difficult matter to be
met with. At length the cottage appeared in sight
kept by a
half-breed
the supper ready, and I, nothing
loth, busily engaged in its discussion.
I partook of my repast in comparative silence. The
character of the Indian is any thing but
communicative
as
indeed must be the character of every
insulated people, whose sole pursuit, like that of the
chase, keeps them for ever in solitude. The first step
towards their civilisation, must be the change of their
occupation:a matter not so easily effected, as it will
call for laborious and new exercises from those who
have never seen the necessity of labour before. But I
digress. I ate my supper in silence. My host, though
only half an Indian, partook, in this particular, of the
peculiarities of the people with whom he dwelt; and a
sullen independence, by taking from him the necessity
of society, threw him upon his own resources, and,
while the mind may have still been most actively
employed
,
the tongue had learned to forget its better
purposes
.
The Indian half-breed is, indeed, something
more taciturn, and certainly more sullen than the
Indian
himself. Like this latter, his words are always
sparing, very significant, and never uttered
unnecessarily
his
looks are always ferocioushe possesses, in
short, added to the savage mood of the Indian, the
cunning
,
the caution, and the meanness, so markedly the
characteristic of the low and huckstering white. Such
was my host. He sat before me at the head of the
board, eating only occasionally. His consort, a stout,
sullen woman of the tribe, with a flat head and nose,
and a most unfavourable aspect, stood behind him
during
the progress of supper, and waited upon us. The
looks of both of these, as well as of two young and
rather good looking savages, who sat in one corner of
the apartment, were full of a distinct sadness. Though
naturally gloomy and stern enough, I could yet see that
something unusual had taken place, and accordingly, as
soon as the repast was over, I enquired of the youngest
of the group as to the cause of present appearances.
From him I gathered the following, something novel,
and, in my opinion, highly interesting narrative.
There had been, it appears, a practice for some time
prevalent with the white planters, having settlements
immediately contiguous to the Indians, of planting more
cotton than their own slaves could gather: and when
this was the case, Indian women were usually
employed
in furnishing the necessary additional assistance.
In this manner, and for this object, Col. H, a
wealthy planter in the neighbourhood, had given
employment
to a large body of Indian women and girls,
some forty or fifty, on his settlement, and there they
had been for some days busily engaged in the several
tasks assigned them. Their husbands and brothers
occasionally came to amuse themselves, by the
contemplation
of their labouring relativessolicitous, as they
are always found, of places and occasions for gathering
and festivity. Under the usual habits of this region, it
was but natural that the worthy colonel, whose hospitality
was proverbial, should give some refreshments to his
visiters, and this he accordingly did, in the questionable
shape of whiskey and tobacco. The jug was placed
before them, and there was no withstanding it. They
all, with the exception of a single man, named
Mewanto
,
became, in a short time, completely intoxicated.
Mewanto was a wonderful youth, even among his
people
one
of the most promising of his tribe. To have
resisted in this way, alone, and such a dangerous and
sweeping influence, of itself, must sustain for him no
moderate pretensions to a strong and elevated
character
.
But more than this. Mewanto was not altogether
satisfied with being himself abstemious. He exercised
his energies to the utmost, in the endeavour to prevent
his people from the sad exposure of their weakness, to
which they were inevitably tendingbut in vain; and
with a more individual feeling, the patriotic savage
turned his sole attention to a closely intimate and very
dear frienda youth named Oolatibbe, who, led away
like the rest by the temptation, had bartered the more
manly energies of their primitive character, for the
gross indulgence which was defiling them all so rapidly.
He strove, even against hope, for a long time, to
prevent
this youth from continuing the practice so fatally
begun. But the influence of the custom, and the
example
of the many, proved more effective than the
wholesome advice, and the warm entreaties of
friendship
;
and Oolatibbe, in despite of all exhortations,
became
momentarily more and more intoxicated.
Mewanto
,
with some difficulty, led him away from the
thicket in which their carousals were carried on, and,
in a tone of warmth, sufficiently warranted, as he
thought, by the intimacy between them, in the plain
language of truth, sought to persuade him of the
danger
24*
and error of his present indulgence. He spoke
with a good deal of that native eloquence which is said
to distinguish the Indian, and for which he himself was
greatly distinguished, and did not spare the whites, for
the introduction of an agent, which he said had withered
their fortunes and nation, even as the blasts of
December
wither their leaves and flowers. The drunken
man heard him with a stupid sort of attention for some
time, but starting suddenly at length, as if he had just
then encountered some fearful object, he tore the knife
from his belt, and without a word, plunged it deeply
and fatally into the bosom of his counsellor, who fell
dead upon the spot. The murderer, after a momentary
stupor, grew conscious and sobered. The body of his
friend was before himthe bloody and yet streaming
knife in his hand;and the liquor, which had
heretofore
maddened, now left him to a perfectly restored
capacity of consciousness. A single shriek or howl,
indicative in itself, from long usage, of some horrible
matter, and peculiar to the savages, was the result of
his first awakening to sense and sensibility. That cry
brought all the Indians around, now almost equally
sobered with himself. Mewanto was a great chief and
well beloved, and they looked upon the spectacle of
blood with a general sentiment of terror. A loud and
wild cry called the party together, and the criminal
preceded them to the great council of the nation. He
delivered himself up voluntarily to death, and no
restraint
was placed upon him. None was deemed
necessary
.
To-morrow, said my informant in conclusion,
he will be shot.
And where is he now? said I to the speaker,
anxious to gather from him as much as I could, before
his garrulity should be utterly exhausted.
He sits beside you, was the reply.
I started, and beheld a noble looking youth, not more
than twenty years of age, whose fine countenance had
caught my attention before sitting down to supper.
He sat silent, and seemingly calm and undisquieted, in
the corner, speaking occasionally with one who sat
beside him. The question rose involuntarily to my
lips, for he was perfectly unbound and unguarded.
And will he not escape, and why do they not
confine
him?
No use. He cannot fly, for the law is so, and he
knows that he must die. Oolatibbe is a brave chief.
I was struck with the strong sense of retributive justice
which this sentence implied. Do not unto others
which you would not that others should do unto you,
seemed here in rather better practice than with some
Christian provinces. Curious to ascertain something
of, if not entirely to analyse thisto mestrange
characteristic of a people, whom, before we altogether
understand, we have been taught to despise, I
carefully
fixed my gaze upon the criminal. What could a
spectator, one unacquainted with the circumstances,
have met with there?
Nothing of the precise and awful matter of fact, that
connected itself with the fortunes and life of the object
of observation. I addressed himI brought him to
the subject so deeply interesting to himself. He
spoke of it as of those common occurrences which we
often speak of unconsciously. He took up the handle
of a tomahawk and employed himself in carving upon
it, a space for a bit of flattened silver which he
laboured
to introduce into it. He spoke in detached
sentences
,
during this little effort. In reply to a question
which I put, touching the commission of the crime,
and whether he was conscious that he was doing it or
not he repliedYeshe knew it allhe knew it
was the one of himself, the best partbut he had put
on a horrible shape and the evil one darkened his eye
sightthat while he struck the blow, he knew
perfectly
well that it was his friend he struck, but that he
was made to do it.
We conversed at intervals till a late hourhe
seemed to sing at times, or rather muttered, a few
broken catches of song, monotonous and highly solemn
at length, the rest having withdrawn, he threw
himself
upon a bearskin before the door, and I attended
the little boy, who was with difficulty aroused from a
deep sleep, to my chamber which he pointed out. It
may be supposed I slept little that night. I was filled
with a thousand discordant fancies on the subject; and
could not help the doubt which perpetually beset me,
that before day he would be off, and out of all danger.
I could not believe in the strange degree of obedience
which this rude savage was about to manifest to his
stern and primitive, but really equitable laws. Every
movement in the household below, led me to the
window
,
in the full expectation that it could indicate
nothing less than the flight of the criminal. But
I was mistaken. The moral sublime had too
unfrequently
been the subject of my own experience, to
enable me, in this instance, to appreciate it at a glance.
A large crowd the next morning had assembled in
the neighbourhood. The open space in front of the
house was thickly covered with Indians, all labouring
under the natural excitements of the occasion. I
hurried on my clothes with as much despatch as
possible
,
and went down among them. The house was
crowded as well as the arena before it. After
surveying
the mass, I looked about for the principal in this
extraordinary spectaclehis were the only features
unmoved in the assembly. He seemed busily
employed
in gathering up sundry little articles as well of
ornament as necessity in the Indian's life. His dress
seemed more studiedit consisted of a pair of
pantaloons
,
seemingly much worn, and probably the cast
off donation of some passing traveller. There was a
buckskin hunting shirt on him, with several falling
capes, all thickly covered with fringe; a belt of
wampum
,
studded with beads of various colours, tolerably
well arranged, encircled his waistwhilst his legs,
which were well formed, were closely fitted by a pair
of leggings fantastically worked and literally loaded
with beads. Several other little ornaments, medals,
and trinkets hung about him, particularly over his neck
and shoulders.
Some difference of sentiment no less than of feeling
seemed to operate upon, and to form a division among
the assembled multitude. An air of anger, impatience,
and exultation, fully indicated the friends of the
deceased
,
thirsting for the blood of his murdererwhile
on the other hand, sadness and concern were the
leading
traits of expression in the countenances of those
interested in the criminal. At length the victim
himself
made the first open sign of preparation. He arose
from the ground where he had been reclining rather
than sitting; and giving to a little boy, who stood in
attendance, a bundle of beads, arrow-heads, &c. which
he had been making up as a part necessary in the
burial ceremonialwith the majesty of a chief, he drew
the huge bear skin partially over his shoulders, and led
the mournful procession. I took the way with the
party. The path lay through a long grove of stunted
pines; at the end of which we were met, and from
thence accompanied to the place of death, by the three
executioners, each carrying his rifle unostentatiously
beneath his arm. The criminal walked beside them,
and in his own language gave them due directions for
the performance of their duty. From one, he took
the weapon with a smile, and looked hastily at the
flint, while uttering a sentence which would seem to
have been a jest at the expense of the owner. Never
did I behold a man with step so firm on any occasion
head so unbenta countenance so unmoved, and
yet without any of the effort common to most men
who endeavour to assume an aspect of heroism upon
an event so trying. He walked as to a victory. The
triumphal arch seemed above him, and instead of an
ignominious death, a triumph over a thousand hearts
seemed depicted in his sight.
The grave was now before us. The place of death,
the scene, the trial and all its terrors, were at hand. I
watched his brow attentively as he looked down upon
the fearful paraphernalia; but while I felt the shuddering
run like a cold wind through my own frame, I could
behold no sign of change in him. After a momentary
pause, he began a low song, apparently consisting of
monosyllables only. He grew more impassionedmore
deeply warm. I could not understand a single word
he utteredbut, even though he stood as firm, proud,
and unbending as a Roman might be supposed to have
stood, as if he disdained the addition of action to his
words, the cadence, the fall, the melody and wild
intonation
of this high-souled savage's voice was to me an
active
eloquence, which I could not misunderstand. He
paused at length. Then moving with an even pace, he
took his place at the head of the grave prepared for
himbeckoned the boy near, who had followed him,
with the simple utensils of savage life, and when he had
retired, motioned the executioners. I saw them prepare
their rifles, and take their aimI looked upon the
features
of the victimthey were steady and calmI
turned my head away with a strange sickness. I heard
the single report of the three rifles, and when I turned my
eye again upon the spot, so lately occupied by the
unhappy
victim of an infatuation which has slain more
than the sword, they were slowly shovelling the fresh
earth into the grave of the murderer. The following
poem is devoted to the same subject.
I was a wanderer long, and loved the wild,
Even as a child his mother. I grew fond
Of the sweet keeping of the wilderness,
The solemn warmth, the wooing solitude,
And the deep winding and the silent glooms,
Where, troubled not by hungry pioneer,
Nature still keeps her place, even as at birth.
To me, such home is sacred, and when there,
The bonds of social life I straight forget,
And grow a part of that which I survey.
Nor is this solitude as men may deem,
But a wide glance, even in her palace home,
Where still she keeps her mighty sovereignty,
At all existing Nature. There she sits,
Supreme in tangled bow'r, and toppling hill,
And deep umbrageous forest. At her feet,
Lake, wood and rivulet, bird and bud and beast,
Tree, flow'r and leaf, in matchless quietude,
Consorting with her mood. I bend before
Her solemn temple, and I lay me down,
Even at her turfy footstool, while around,
Her mantle, redolent of flow'rs and fruits,
Hangs o'er, and shields me from the noonday beam.
Have I not on that gentle couch reposed,
The lowly plat of green?a tufted bed
Of leaves and delicate flow'rs beneath my head,
While, sweeter than the soft recorder's voice,
Or lute of ravishing syren, in my ear,
The gentle diapason of the woods,
Soft airs and bending pines and murmuring birds,
Won me to slumber with their strange discourse.
Thus, by that awe-attuning sympathy,
That spirit language, which, upon mine ear,
Came like the wayward whispers of the sea,
To the coy wind-harp in the hands of Night,
O'ercome, in that most wild society,
Far from my home, and human home, I slept,
In a deep Indian forest, where still dwell
The lingering Choctawmelancholy men,
Who love the woods, their ancient fathers gave,
And in their shelter half forget their shame.
Who speaks?the dream is sootharound me stand
The gathering nation; each with solemn brow,
As to a sacrificea deed of dread!
They bring the guilty, the proud, self-arraigned,
To judgment and to death. There, he stands forth,
Alone, unaw'd, unboundand in his eye,
As on his tongue, and in his lofty soul,
No fond, appealing thoughtno fear of death!
He speaks, while all is silence, where had been
Howling, and many a horrible voice before.
I come to dieno vain delay,
I ask for none, to vex my soul
Prepare, ye fellow chiefs, the way,
And let the storms about me roll
By me, Mewanto's blood was spilt,
Behold! my hands are red with guilt.
The tribe has lost its bravest steel
The arrow from the bow is gone;
I saw the brave Mewanto reel,
And I, the fatal deed have done.
Madly I struck him with my knife,
And tore away the slumbering life.
He cross'd me in my hour of wrath,
When hell was in my heart and mood;
Spirits of ill were on my path,
And he and they, alike, pursued,
They look'd the same before mine eye,
And dreadful forms were shouting by.
My fingers grasped my ready knife
A strugglethat alone I knew
I grappled, as it were, for life,
With that dread, dark, infernal crew
And 'till I struck the fearful blow,
I knew not that my friend was low.
The thought that would have spared him then,
Too late appear'd for his relief
He stood no more with living men
And I grew mad with grief.
25
Yet what is sorrowcan it bring
The spirit to that silent thing?
Am I not readydo ye sleep,
Why strike ye not, why pause so long?
Your sorrow like mine own is deep,
Is not your vengeance strong?
His form is by, whom late I slew,
I hear him call for vengeance too.
Far wandering on the distant hills,
Yet watching for the morning's dawn,
He lingers o'er the western rills,
All anxious to be gone:
And only waits my kindred shade,
To guide him from the grave I made.
His hatchet ready for the fight,
When first the war-whoop's cry is heard,
I've placed to meet his waking sight,
When carols forth the bird;
Nor, did my bosom's care forget,
The rifle, knife, and calumet.
Oh, brother, whom I madly slew,
Then shall our kindred spirits join
The red-deer's path by day pursue,
The tented camp by night entwine,
Close, at one time, the mutual eye,
And on one blanket's bosom lie.
No longer spoke the warrior chief,
But sullen sternness clothed his brow
Whilst fate and anguish, fixed and brief,
Proclaimed himready now!
No council spokeno pray'r was made,
No pomp, no mockery, no parade.
He walk'd erect, unaw'd, unbound,
He stood upon the grave's dread brink,
And look'd with fearless eye around,
Nor did his spirit shrink
In terror from that final test,
The fearful rifle at his breast.
A moment's pauseno voice is heard
He only, with unchanging look,
Himself, gave forth the signal word,
With which the valley shook
And when the smoke had clear'd away,
The dark brow'd chief before me lay.
THE SPIRIT BRIDEGROOM.
FROM THE GERMAN.
Albert Holstein was a student in one of the German
universities, the name of which is quite unnecessary to
the narration. He was at the time of which we speak
just entering his eighteenth year, and had been until
his sixteenth, under the guardianship and care of a good
and misjudging mother. His father had fallen in a
domestic feud with some rival baron, and the son, the
only heir and promise of his princely name and
dominions
,
but for a mind and temper naturally excellent,
would have been utterly ruined by her various and
misconceived indulgences. After the usual preparation,
he was admitted, as said above, into a leading
university
;
where he soon had occasion to test for himself the
propriety of that course of education to which he had
been so imprudently subjected. It is not our object,
however, to dwell upon, or seek to analyse, the
impressions
of his mind, under the new changes in his
condition
;
affecting, as they must have done, the whole
structure of his early habits, and pruning and
converting
,
as it were, the dead branches of excess into a new
and fresh capacity of life. He was saved from ruin in
spite of educationnature having been able, a case
not very common, to contend with and counteract all
the mistakes of a foolish parent, and a crowd of
parasites
.
It was on a pleasant evening in the month of June,
that a family party was assembled, as usual, in the
gardens
of D'Arlemont. In this family, Albert had
become
almost an inmate, and his presence on the occasion
was looked for earnestly by all the company, but by
none more anxiously than the fair Anastasia
D'Arlemont
,
the only daughter of the high family of that
name, and the heiress of all its extensive possessions.
This young lady, while holding an almost unlimited
sway in the bosom of the young student, acknowledged
in his fine and graceful person, his accomplished mind
and manners, and that general vivacity of habit which
is the greatest charm of society, a corresponding
influence
.
They had, for themselves, just begun to
ascertain
the nature of those sentiments which had so
frequently brought them together; and their eyes were
opened to the strength of the attachment, which, in
time, was to become so fatal or blissful to them both.
A few evenings previous, an opportunity offering for a
mutual understanding, in the unconscious delight of the
moment, the state of their hearts had been revealed,
and it may be supposed, therefore, that the anxieties of
Anastasia deepened, as he, who had hitherto been all
punctuality, now delayed his appearance long after the
accustomed hour. She waited, and looked anxiously
and earnestly, and yet he came not. She had turned,
all vainly, her dark and dewy eyes along the flowery
pathway through which he had been wont to enter;
and, wondering at a delay so unusual, her soul was
given up to a dread variety of those mysterious
forebodings
,
25*
generally admitted to be at all times so
pregnant
in the fancy of a German maiden. What made
her situation the more painful, and her feelings the
more acute, was the doubt whether her sire, one of the
noblest and most bigoted among the knighthood of the
country, would sanction a closer tie than that of
friendship
between a daughter who could choose from among
the highest, and one who, though noble, had never
quartered his arms in a broader field than the small
baronial privilege of his scant paternal acres. The
doubt was not without its reason. The youth had lain
open his soul to the sire of his sweetheart, and the
rejection
of his suit was coupled with words of contumely
and reproach. Nor, if the subsequent events may be
taken in evidence, did he rest here. The strong arm
frequently in that country, and those times, carried out
and continued the feud and force of the stern word;
and public opinion did not hesitate to ascribe to the
indignant sire the future misery and final fate of the
hapless daughter. It was while gazing with
desponding
hope, and with penetrating but unsuccessful vision,
along the garden grove, for the well known and beloved
form of her lover, that she heard a sudden shriek as of
one in agonythen a deep and hollow groan, and the
fall of some heavy body. Lights were brought, and,
in a state of mind bordering on insanity, the young and
unhappy Anastasia beheld the scarcely less young and
beautiful form of her lover, bleeding before her. The
stiletto yet remained in his breastit had penetrated
deeply, and he gave no signs of life. Her father,
entering
at the time and witnessing her emotion, had her
borne with stern rebuke to her chamber. At that
time, those around remarked the deep exultation and
malignity of his countenance, and made their inferences
accordingly. Albert Holstein was borne away to his
lodgings, where, after a few days, according to the
popular voice, he breathed his last. Enquiry, in a little
time, passed over without discovering the assassin;
and, if suspicion did rest any where, the mark was
quite too high for the arm of public justice.
A few months had elapsed after the occurrence of
this event, and, if grief in the bosom of Anastasia for
the loss of her lover had lost some of its violence, it
did not, however, forego any of its tenacity in its hold
upon her heart. Lingering one evening, long after the
family had all retired, at her latticeindulging in that
mournful contemplation of past images, which had now
become the all absorbing passion of her spirither ear
discerned beneath her window the faint tones of music,
such as she had been accustomed to hear, at those
seasons
,
when, in this manner, her lover had indicated his
affections. The notes were the same; and words such
as he alone had employed, came, arousing in her bosom
a feeling of superstitious dreada sudden and
indescribable
awe, such as she had never before entertained.
The influence became insupportable at length, and she
sought, for the time, a safe retreat in the chamber of
her attendant. Here she remained until her mind had
become somewhat accustomed to the thoughts and
associations
thus forced upon it, when she returned to
her own room, and the sounds were heard no more for
that night. A few evenings after, at the same hour,
the music was repeatedthe same sweet and
mysterious
air fell upon her senses with an increased, and, if,
without any solecism in terms, we may be permitted
the expression, a warmer melancholy. She was no
longer terrified, as at first, and yielding herself, without
a struggle, to the irresistible impulse, she gently undid
the lattice, and looked out in the direction of the music.
Nor did she look in vain. Retreating among the trees
of the garden, she discovered a form so nearly
resembling
that of her departed lover, that she involuntarily
uttered his name. A sigh was the only response which
the figure gavebut so mournfully sad, that it seemed
to rebuke her for the indifference of her grief, and her
sorrows burst forth anew. The form had utterly
disappeared
,
and though for hours she looked and
lingered
,
it returned no more that evening. Night after
night, for a week succeeding, as the hour of midnight
drew near, did she look forth and listen from her
lattice
.
She heard the winds softly rustling among the
branchesthe fall of the dead leafshe saw the
shadows
,
with a quiet beauty, waving in the moonlight, but
her visiter returned not. At length, when she began
to conclude that the spirit was offended, and would not
come again, or that her ever restless and excited
imagination
had deluded her into the belief of the actual
presence of one for ever in her mind's eye, she heard
again that faint, sad murmuring of song, gentle as the
flutterings of an ascending spirit, softly floating on the
breeze, and penetrating her lattice. It grew at last
more distinct, more full and clear, and with such a
tone of true nature to her senses, that she lost all
guidance
of her reason, and called deliriously upon the
name of her lover. Had her voice so much power
had the deity spoken from her lips? Her lover stood
by her side, as in obedience to a spell; fair and manly,
and full of exhilarance and life, as in the gladdest hour
of their earliest communion! She was faintshe
trembled, with a love and awe necessarily arising from
the belief that she was at that moment in the presence
of the dead. His eyes, though clear and intelligent as
ever, were sad, and wore a solemn expressionthey
looked all the divinity of woeand a mingled love and
worship, which she could not restrain, filled and
inspired
her heart. How gentle were all his toneshow
soothing his speechhow true and tender its
expression
!
With what a voice did he assure her of his
existence
of
his continued love, while even at the verge of
dissolution, and in a deep extremity, from the fatal
termination
of which he was only saved by the marvellous
skill of their family physician. He now informed her
of his unsuccessful suit to her fatherof his cruel
language
,
and unqualified rejection of his prayers. He
was now in danger; and the most perfect secrecy was
necessary to shield him from the hand of that power,
which, in striking once, had certainly shown no
indisposition
,
if such were necessary, to strike again. Long
did they linger in that silent garden, with no watchers
but the stars; and no hope but in that true love which
they seemed to smile upon and sanction. Night after
night were his visits, without interruption, repeated;
and the joy of the young lovers increased with the
impatience
with which they watchedto themthe slow
progress of day to night again; never regretting the
sleepless hours of their sacrifice, since the altar was
so wooing and attractive, and while the worship was so
pure and hallowed.
In the mean while, a nobleman of high birth and
gallant
achievement, made his appearance as a professed
suitor of Anastasia, at the castle of D'Arlemont. He
was remotely connected with the family, its equal in all
hereditary and honourable respects; and desirous of
renewing a former intimacy, and increasing its ties.
Count Wallenburg was well known, and ranked highly
among the German chivalry. Honourable,
high-minded
,
generous and brave, there were but few qualities
essential to what, in that age, was esteemed perfection,
which this gentleman did not possess. Shall we
wonder
that, admiring the beautiful Anastasia, he should
find no difficulty on the part of her family? As for the
wishes of the lady herself, that was a concern about
which barons, at that period, gave themselves no
trouble
,
and, perhaps, no enquiry. They dressed the lamb
gaudily up for the sacrifice; and to make more solemn
the cruelty, sacrificed it upon the altar. His addresses
were paid, and, with a ready compliance, accepted by
her father. The anguish of the young girl was
excruciating
on being instructed to prepare for the nuptials,
almost the first intimation which she had of the
arrangement
;
but, assured by her lover, whom she saw nightly,
that she should become the bride of none other than
himself, she offered no fruitless objection, and, to all
eyes, seemed passively resigned to her fate.
The evening appointed for the bridal at length
arrived
.
The chapel of the castle was illuminated; the
company had assembled, and every thing was gay
confusion
and good-humoured clamour. There were aunts
and uncles, and cousins and friendsthe whole world of
various and friendly elements, which such an occasion
so certainly brings along with it. At the head of a
long procession of like connections, came the
bridegroom
,
with as much impatience for the ceremony as
could well comport with his high dignity and German
phlegm. But where was shethe young bride? Why
lingered shewhy came she not, in glittering robes,
heading in gladness the rose-garlanded procession of
capricious and laughing damsels? The castle was in
commotion, and a strange anxiety was over every
countenance
.
The bridal chamber was emptythe fair
Anastasia was not to be found! The castle was
searched
from turret tops to donjon, but they found her not.
The groups dispersed over the gardens and grounds
about, with but little success. At length they
penetrated
the forests. As they advanced the sky
suddenly
became overcast and darkvivid flashes of
lightning added to, while illuminating and making
perceptible the gloom. A storm of frightful energy
passed over the wood, prostrating every thing before it,
and subsiding with equal suddenness. The sky became
instantly clear, and the morn shone forth in purity,
unconscious
of a cloud. The firmament had not a speck.
The bewildered groups proceeded in their search. A
soft and gentle strain of melody seemed to embody
itself
with the winds. They followed the sounds into a
dark and gloomy enclosure of high over-arching trees,
thickly fenced in with knotted vines and brushwood.
The thunderbolt had been there, and it was scorched
and blackened. They advancedthe music still
leading
them onwarduntil, in a small recess, they found
indubitable tokens of the maiden, in the half-burned
remnants of her hat and shawl. They now beheld her
destiny. She had become the spirit-bride! The fiend
had triumphed in the garb of the earthly lover, and the
unhappy maiden had been the victim of a deceit which
had led her to dishonour and destruction!
Such is the tradition; but, about this time, the castle
of Holstein became inhabited. Albert, said the popular
voice, was restored to life and his habitation; and, in
time, there was a bright maiden singing merrily in its
walls, in whom, those who knew, found a strange
likeness
to the beautiful Anastasia D'Arlemont.
CLEOPATRA.
She lay in death before me, yet so calm
So sweetly true each feature to the set
Of earliest nature, that I thought it sleep,
The infant's slumberous sleep, whose gentle breath,
Scarcely articulate, on its young lips hangs,
Even as the zephyr, down among the leaves,
Reposing sweetly in the noontide ray.
Reclined upon a couch, whose draperies fell
Meetly about her, lay her gracile form.
Disturb'd, in the last terror, ere she died,
Her robe had parted, and her soft white neck,
Gleamed through her shading tresses, which down fell,
As if to honour what they did not hide.
But, wandering to the half-concealed recess,
My eye fell on a slope that gently rose
Into a heaving billow, and there seem'd,
By sudden touch of nature, petrified
As if the blood, 'til then, endued with life,
Grew cold when all was loveliest. How sweet
How more than sweet, that picture! One blue vein
Skirted the white curl of the heaving wave,
As if a rainbow-tint had rested there
While, farther on, and at its swollen height,
A ruby crest, borne upward by the swell,
Grew fix'd into a gema living gem
One of those priceless gems for which men give
Their hearts, their lives, their worship, and then die,
Meetly, as having nothing more to give.
But, as in chide of nature's excellence,
And blotting this fair picture, so beyond,
26
All human skill, to conjure, as it was,
Beyond all human power to look upon,
Looking, and not to love,lay a small wound,
Just where the heart had loudest beat with life,
Dabbled with blood, that downward trickling yet,
Made rich and red that spotless drapery:
A small fine stream: then from beneath her robe,
Crawl'd forth a venomous reptile, and it pass'd,
Over that place of rapture, which then seem'd
Instinctlike some foul, envious cloud,
Blotting the silvery sweetness of the sky.
THE FESTIVAL OF ISIS.
It was the annual festival of Isis, and nothing but the
bustle and noise of preparation for this event was to
be heard throughout the ancient city of Memphis. It
was a religious exhibition well calculated to blind and
to dazzle the senses of the ignorant and superstitious.
Where this was not the prevailing motive for attendance,
curiosity and the love of show brought innumerable
thousands. The neighbouring cities were emptied of all
those, whom circumstances permitted to leave their
habitations
;
and assembled nations themselves were
spectators
on the occasion. Greater preparations and an
increased expense, promised to render this festival
superior
to all that had preceded it. The reigning monarch
had emptied his palace of its jewels to enrich the
temple
and add lustre to the appearance of the goddess; and
the great Pyramid of Ghiza had been ransacked, and
its stores of gold, of silver and of pearl, the treasures of
preceding princes, appropriated to this enthusiastic
purpose
.
Unusual anticipations were connected with the
present year; and the crowds brought into the city were
calculated to excite apprehensions, as to the possibility
of providing them with food and lodging. The Arabs,
Meccans, and Mamelukes, who, except on these
occasions
,
never leave the desert, now seemed to have
brought treble their usual number into the capital.
Nor were the expectations of the people disappointed.
The day of celebration had arrived, and the massive
doors of the temple of the goddess were thrown open.
As the crowds in advance rushed forward to anticipate,
as it were, the approach of the deity, they were driven
back and blinded by the streams of excessive light, that,
prepared by the chemist of their college of the
priesthood
,
served to impart an additional mystery to the
religion
of the goddess whose temple was thus revealed,
dark with excessive bright. A large sun, before the
inner door of the temple, sent forth the richest rays;
while innumerable objects of a sacred character among
the Egyptians, were prepared to precede the car in which
Isis was about to exhibit herself to the assembled
multitude
.
First came a milk-white pigeon, with a golden
fillet about its neck, and perched upon a branch,
intended
to represent the palm, and made of gold, borne
by one of the initiated of the year preceding. He was
clothed in a garment of the purest white, and bore
upon his head a globe, indicative of eternity; a butterfly
resting upon it denoted the immortality of the soul. On
his shoulder glittered a costly gem, that bound and
secured
,
with an air of graceful negligence, which
admirably
contrasted with the simple tunic that fell around
and enveloped him. He was followed by an hundred
others similarly attired; all bearing different emblems of
the deity and of the immortality of the soul. As they
advanced from the temple, the silence of that mighty
and mixed multitude was suddenly broken by one
universal
burst of admiration; while the seats which had
been prepared for the nobler and the higher orders
of the people rocked with the emotion of those upon
them. Next came the slaves, bearing censers of gold
and scattering incense upon the people. These were
blacks, with a girdle of silver cloth around the loins and
a collar for the neck, and a cap of the same costly
material
.
Officiates of different castes followed; all
variously
dressed, and each successive host, if possible,
more splendid than the last. Then came the sagas with
long white beards, generally old men, who had spent a
life in acquiring the principles of their several sciences,
and highly reverenced among the Egyptians. They
bore some distinctive characteristic of their profession.
To these succeeded the artificers, the painters, the
builders; and, at length, the sacred sun, borne by two
aged men, advanced into the area followed by the high
priest. This office was held by an experienced magian,
than whom Egypt could boast of none more renowned
or expert in the sacred sciences. His name was
Bermahdi
.
A robe of sable was thrown loosely around
him, and a living serpent twined itself about his arm,
while he grasped its middle with his hand. As he
advanced
,
the assembled multitude, late still and silent, now
burst forth into a mighty shout. The wide area rung
with acclamations, and wisdom and science found an
acknowledged victory over ignorance and superstition.
Lastly came the car of the god, borne upon the back of
a camel whose hoofs were coated with gold, and whose
body was covered with clothes and jewels of the most
costly character, and rendered sacred by previous
purification
.
Around it, danced in wild and lascivious
contortions
,
a troop of priestessesdressed in a manner
calculated to excite the emotions and appetites of the
most dull and insensible. These closed the procession,
26*
and as they passed from the doors of the temple, these
closed of themselves with a startling and tremendous
sound.
Among the crowds assembled to witness this
imposing
spectacle, the youthful Cleon was neither the least
observant, nor the least happy. He was a youth of
fine, natural parts, much improved by an acquaintance
with the learning of the schools as well as a close
observation
upon, and a wide intermixture with men,
in various travel. A native of the Greek islands,
he had come to Egypt to acquire those abstract
and usually forbidden sciences taught by the magi of
that country, in the voluptuous and secluded walls of
their hidden and mysterious pursuits. But the warmth
of his heart and the buoyancy of his imagination forbade
that close attention to studies, which, however grand
and imposing, his good sense enabled him to see had
their foundation in a vicious policy of dominion, and
were built upon the fears and grovelling superstitions of
the common and uninformed. Besides, at his age, there
is one pursuit which of all others is most calculated to
swallow up any set on foot by mere ambition or desire of
supremacy in intellect. This was love. Very soon after
his arrival at Memphis, and before he had as yet made
himself familiar with the elements of those sciences, for
the acquirement of which his journey had been
principally
undertaken, he had met with and become
enamoured
of the beautiful Alme, the only heir and hope
of one of the highest houses in Egypt. She was soon
made acquainted with, and encouraged, his passion with
emotions as warm; and as nothing could be urged either
against the name, character, or wealth of Cleon, the
consent
of their parents was not difficult to obtain. On a
set day they were splendidly attired, and, attended by a
numerous crowd of young friends and relations, they
appeared in the temple consecrated to marriage, and
were solemnly betrothed by the priestess who officiated
and administered the rites. This was, however, only
introductory
to their full and final espousal, which was
fixed to be completed during the continuance of the
next moon, provided her appearance be favourable.
This, among a people so superstitious as the Egyptians,
was a necessary duty; and, however irksome, Cleon was
compelled to endure all the anxiety arising from the
suspense. Pending this interval, the public rites of the
goddess Isis began as before represented; and Cleon,
with the fair Alme, were among the most prominent of
the admiring spectators on this occasion; he for manly
grace and proportion; she for feminine delicacy and
attraction.
On these annual festivals, one privilege claimed by
the high priest of the Temple of Isis was that of
selecting
any young women from the spectators whom
the goddess had previously designated as her favourites.
It was an honour that most of the Egyptian families
were proud of; and many were the hearts that beat
tumultuously
with hope and expectation at this period.
No limit was placed upon the demands of the goddess,
made through the high priest, and six and eight have
been selected at a time, generally from the loveliest of
the fair spectators. After performing many rites and
oblations, calculated to seduce the reason into the arms
of enthusiasm and devotion, the high priest proceeded
to the selection of the youthful and trembling divinities.
Every eye followed his slow pace and searching glance
around the deeply silent assembly. Many were the
mortified looks that succeeded his passage by those
whose consciousness of beauty had, in their opinion,
secured
them a choice; and a low, but not ungracious
murmur of compliment, broke from the crowd, as the
priest, with a wand of ivory and gold, selected his first
priestess, in the person of the fair Alme, by touching
her on the brow with its jewelled extremity, and
commanding
her to follow him. She rose, as if to obey the
summons. The scarcely-breathing Cleon, with trembling
and convulsive hand, was about to clasp her to himself,
when the maiden, with a look of conscious security and
happiness, rather unaccountable to those who had
considered
a selection on this occasion as the highest joy of
life, bade him defiance; and throwing back with her
snowy finger, through which the blood went and came,
the white robe which gracefully encircled her, disclosed
the sacred belt of betrothal, given her by the priestess
of union and domestic love, which secured her from his
demand.
Great was the mortification of the High Priest: he
frowned darkly upon her and her lover; and with
ill-suppressed
looks of anger and rage, he turned to
another
part of the open amphithetre, and made his
selections from several, more willing than the fair
Alme. After the ceremonies of the day had been
concluded
,
according to established usage, the doors of
the temple were again thrown open, and the procession
returned in the same order as it had issued out of
them.
How happy was Cleon that day! Nothing could
have been more calculated to assure him of the love of
his betrothed, than the gladness with which she
exhibited
the badge which secured her to himself. They
separated at a late hour; he to dream of and anticipate
future joys, and she to watch for the coming of that
moon, whose favourable or unfavourable aspect was to
confirm her hopes of immediate happiness, or frustrate
them by a longer delay.
But the next morning arose only to destroy the vain
hopes of the unfortunate Cleon. His bride was no
where to be found. Her chamber was empty, and no
traces of the manner in which she had been spirited
away, could be obtained. Her family were in
sackcloth
and ashes, and lying with their heads covered,
upon the threshold of the house. The men were
searching for her wherever they thought it possible she
had been taken, and Cleon was nearly mad. The day
passed over and no tidings of her were to be had. All
night he searched for her in vain. Morning broke to
discover him more miserable and unhappy than before.
At length, a sudden thought revived him: it rushed
through his brain like an arrow of fire. It is he!
he exclaimed, in a voice where hope and phrenzy were
oddly blended; it is the accursed priest, the villain
BermahdiI see it nowI see it now!
His plan was arranged. It could not be put in
execution
,
however, before the night. It was to enter
the temple, which, as an initiate, he could easily do;
and knowing many of the private passages, revealed
only to its agents, he thought it probable that if his
suspicion were well founded, he must necessarily find
the object of his search. The day passed over slowly;
too slowly for love, and perhaps too fast for the
duration
of his lately revived hope. But at length night
came; and divesting himself of his accustomed dress,
and assuming a disguise, with no other weapon than
a short Egyptian dagger, he went forward to the
western
and least frequented portion of the stupendous and
frowning structure, which he believed to confine the
object of his devotion and search.
It was midnight. All seemed perfectly silent as he
entered the secret wicket, known only to the
hierophant
and noviciate, who pursued the mysteries of
Egyptian science at that period. Through a long and
dark gloomy passage-way, cut in the solid wall, he
pursued
his course. At length, he came to an inner
entrance
which led him into the very bowels of the earth;
for it lay for some distance under the rock on which
was reared the frowning and stupendous turrets of the
temple. A large body of water shortly appeared in
sight, in which a number of young crocodiles were
yearly put, fed and preserved, for the use of the
goddess
.
Here the youth, repelled by the excessive
darkness
,
paused for a moment ere he proceeded. The
only light upon this dreary scene was admitted through
an aperture in the roof of the temple; and the small
lantern, curiously formed out of a sea-shell, with which
he had provided himself, was insufficient to render
light any part of the vast amphitheatre in which he
wandered, except for a few feet in advance of his own
person. He proceeded, however, warmed and
impelled
forwards, by the tumult of his thoughts, which
would not permit the delay of a moment; and felt the
difficulties created by the darkness before him, as
obstacles
which only served to madden and infuriate him.
For a long time he pursued his way, until his eye fell
upon a large iron ring in the wall, which he knew as
belonging to the passage which led to the main body
of the temple, and to the distant apartments of
Bermahdi
,
the High Priest. With a violent effort he
succeeded
in wrenching it open; and as he entered, it
shut of itself with a tremendous sound and horrible
jar behind him. He did not pause, but proceeded on
until he came to the first trial of the noviciate. This
having already passed, he stopped not to think about,
but rapidly passed onwards. The wheel of trial to the
advanced noviciate at length arrested his attention.
He hesitated not, however, but sprung quickly upon
it. It whirled suddenly beneath him, and after turning
rapidly for several minutes, stopped with a quick
shock, and he was thrown stupid and heavy into
another
apartment. The shock, however, roused him: he
rose, and found that his lamp, which, before entering
upon this trial, he had cautiously concealed beneath his
cloak, had been put out by the rotatory motion of the
wheel. He saw, however, the burning plates before
him, and prepared for another and more severe trial.
A pair of glass shoes lay before them, for the noviciate
to put on before passing the flaming bars. He threw
off his sandals, hastily put them on, and leapt upon the
glowing bars. To this trial, as a noviciate, he had
never before advanced, but rather regarded it with
apprehension
:
to his astonishment, he felt no heat. This
was another secret of the Egyptian Magi. By a
chemical
preparation, the glass shoes were prepared as
protectors against the seven-times heated bars, over
which he trod uninjured. Several other trials,
calculated
in appearance to deter most men, and which, on
any other occasion, he would have shrunk from, he
went through with equal facility. At length he reached
the chamber of the High Priest himself. From an
aperture, he beheld for the first time, this first among
the Magi of Egypt in the privacy of his supernaturally
guarded retirement. He now beheld him seated at a
large table with a number of mathematical instruments,
together with the astrolabe and mirror necessary for
the pursuits, computations, and admeasurements of
astrology; in which science Bermahdi had made some
wonderful improvements, and was, in fact, looked
upon
as dealing with beings of a different order from
those over whom he swayed. His knowledge was
immense
,
and his hard study was incomputable. Books
in languages unknown, from among the Scythians and
the wise people of Indus, and even remote Africa and
Spain, from Persia, and the lands beyond the dominion
of the great king, gathered with much care, expense,
and labour. Astronomical instruments and signs were
before him, and he seemed engaged in some
calculations
of the heavenly bodies, as Cleon looked from the
covered door down upon him. His silver beard and
venerable appearance, the character of his studies and
yet more, the firm and commanding appearance which
he maintained, had the effect of impressing a feeling
of awe upon his observer. But this sentiment was
only momentary. The emotion which had led him
thus far, was not to be bound down now by the mere
appearance of sanctity and grace. Accordingly, with
some violence, he burst into the apartment.
Bermahdi
,
whose attention seemed intensely fixed upon
the figures before him, never even turned at the
interruption
,
but several living serpents that lay around
him in wicker baskets, began to hiss and issue forth
from their several cases of earth and mud, in which
they lived; and with forked tongues and open mouths
began to assail the youthful adventurer. They were,
however, arrested and driven back by the voice of
Bermahdi
,
who, after commanding them to be still,
demanded
of Cleon, what induced his intrusion, at the
late hour in which it was made. The youth rather
petulantly observed that he who was able to measure
and compute the stars, and to calculate and predict the
changes of the weather, and the elements, should
certainly
be able to compass the thoughts of mere
mortality
.
My son, replied the old man, some
headstrong
passion moves you to this violence, let me know
its occasion, and I may be able from my knowledge to
afford you some relief: My wife, Alme, where is she?
I demand of you, Bermahdi, tell me, for you must know,
either from your heavenly knowledge, or from your
own connection with the great mother of earth. I
demand
of you to let me know, or I shall this instant take
from you the remains of your treacherous and
unworthy
life, said the infuriated Cleon, as he brandished
his dagger above the magician. I know not where
she is, rash young man, said the old priest, but scarce
had he said the words, when a deep groan issued from
the corner of the apartment which was hidden from
sight by the silver veil of Isis. In a moment Cleon
had placed his hands upon it. The high priest rushed
to prevent him, exclaiming, Hold, young man! your
certain death will follow a violation of the mysteries
of yonder sanctuary. But in vain he spoke. The
27
silver veil was torn down from its place; and Cleon
had just time to behold his bride stretched out upon a
couch of the most costly material apparently in a
lethargic
slumber, as the high priest rushed upon him
with the sharp golden compasses which he held in his
hands. A violent struggle ensued, which was terminated
by Cleon's burying his dagger in the heart of his
opponent
,
who gave but one groan, and fell dead at the
feet of the young man. The serpents rushed upon
him; but they were fangless and hurt him not. It was
necessary that he should make his escape immediately.
How to do this he knew not, burthened with the
lifeless body of Alme. With a convulsive grasp he
threw her upon his bosom and shoulder, and seizing
the golden lamp that burned upon the table he
pursued
his way. All the trials he passed with little
difficulty
,
except that of the wheel, by which, in
endeavouring
to support his bride from injury, as she could
not support herself, he was stunned for several minutes.
Recovering himself, he pursued his way with
redoubled
vigour. Fear lent him wings; and a certain
intutiveness
which served the place of lamp or guide,
(the lamp taken from the priest's table having been
extinguished,) aided his flight, and at length he found
himself in the pure free air, and under the broad blue
and starlit expanse of heaven. A barque was ready
for him on the river; with much care he placed his
bride within it, and bore down for Memphis. Here
he was joined by the family and parents of his Alme,
and before his agency in the death of Bermahdi could
be known, they were all safely steering among the
free and balmy isles of the Grecian Archipelago.
THE LAST OF THE YEMASSEES.
The Yemassees were a powerful nation of savages,
occupying, in the lower parts of the state of South
Carolina, a tract of country extending from Beaufort
on the sea coast. Incited to insurrection by Spanish
persuasion, they had laid a deep plan for the
destruction
of the Carolinians, in which, with the cunning of
Philip, they had contrived to involve many of the
independent
neighbouring tribes. Fortunately for the
whites, the design was discovered, and in the contest
which ensued, the Yemassees were completely
exterminated
as a nation. The following lines refer to this
event, and the last survivor is here made to furnish the
record of their overthrow. That they were
exterminated
,
in that affair, is, however, very doubtful; and the
opinion generally entertained, is, that a number did
survive, and in the wildernesses of Georgia and Florida
find a shelter from their enemies. They have been
traced by some modern writers, indeed, to the vast
swamp, called the Ecfanoka of Georgiaa capacious
marsh, which occupies a large extent of country in the
lower regions of that state; on whose knolls and
islands, thousands of which rise up at every step in this
secluded shelter, they are represented as having taken
up their abode. One of these, according to Bartram,
the Creeks describe as the most blissful spot of earth.
They represent it as inhabited by a peculiar race of
Indians
,
whose women are incomparably beautiful. They
also tell you, that this terrestrial paradise has been
seen by some of their enterprising hunters, when in
pursuit of game, who, being lost in inextricable swamps
and bogs, and on the point of perishing, have been
suddenly
relieved by beautiful women, who kindly gave
them fruits and provisions, and then, putting them on
their path, bade them fly, for that their men were very
fierce and cruel to strangers, and would certainly
destory
them were they to encounter. These hunters
describe the settlement, of which they had a distant
view, on the elevated banks of an island or promontory
in a beautiful lake, but, in their endeavours to approach
which, they were involved in perpetual labyrinths, and
like enchanted land, it alternately appeared and
disappeared
as they continued to advance. The young
warriors, on hearing this account, set out upon a
journey
of discovery, but failed, in the thousand intricacies
of the swamp, which beset them on every side, to
discover
the beautiful lake, the island, and the settlements.
Such is the tradition. It is thought, that some of this
may be truethat the Creek hunters may have lost
their way, and stumbling upon the place of retreat,
chosen by the few surviving Yemassees, were made to
believe a story of danger, told them by the women,
who thus represented their people, in order to
discourage
any enterprise, on the part of the warlike Creeks,
for their discovery, which must have ended in their
further exile, or in their complete annihilation. Some
further use has been made of this tradition in the
present
volume, in which the catastrophe, thus deprecated,
has been made to take place.
He fought his nation's foes 'til night
Had cast her mantle round,
Nor, in the stern, unequal fight,
Where freemen battled for their right,
Gave undisputed ground.
His followers fell before his face
He stoodthe last of all his race.
His brotherhim that pride had named
The eagle of his land
In hunt, as well as battle, famed,
Who once, the furious wolf had tamed,
And with unweaponed hand
Himself the panther in the fight,
Who sought it with a fierce delight
Before him fast expiring lay:
And hewhose name had been
The signal, many a bloody day,
For long and well contested fray
Known by his uncurb'd mien;
Were then a trophy, worth the toil,
Of young ambition, mad for spoil.
Yet who shall tread the thicket's brake,
And with undaunted heart,
Arouse the coil'd and glittering snake
With fearful fang, and eye awake,
Nor backward shuddering start?
There, coil'd as fate, the serpent lies,
And he, who first approaches, dies.
Thus, o'er his dying brother's brow,
The brave Sanut bends
He wails his prostrate nation low,
Lamenting for his kindred now
His people and his friends
But, with a fearful burst of grief,
He mourns o'er all, that bleeding chief.
And thou, he sung in earnest train,
Shalt seek the hunt no more
Nor whet the battle knife again,
Nor strike the living, scalp the slain
Thy battle fields are o'er.
Yet 'mong the western hills alone,
Thou hast not, all-untended, gone.
Slain by thy self, full many a ghost
Thy journey must partake
To waft thee to the happy coast,
The spoilers of our land, a host,
O'erspread the ocean lake
And many a maiden there, for thee,
Shall make the sweet sagamit.
And I have seen thee bend the bow,
And I have watch'd thee spring,
With gleaming knife upon the foe,
And far and fell the hatchet throw,
As swallow, swift on wing,
Pursue the triumph with a flight,
Unbroken by the long day's fight.
And, as becomes the Indian brave,
When, in the battle's strife,
O'erpower'd, he finds a bloody grave,
Thou didst not vainly seek to save
The last remains of life
Content, if fortune could not give
Thy country freedom, not to live!
The hunter, when the day is done
Must bark and dress the pine;
And that the wolf his rest may shun,
When the dark night comes stealing on,
Must bid the fire light shine,
But thou art happy nowI see,
Thy slain foes do this work for thee.
Upon this bloody rock I stand,
And gaze with ling'ring eye
Before me is my native land,
Now blazing with the fatal brand
While round me, the last gallant band,
My fellow warriors, lie.
I may not stand and dwell alone,
When all are perish'd thus, and gone.
The shaft is fitted to my bow,
One shade my soul demands,
One gallant brave, one mighty foe,
To cross with me the river's flow,
And seek the happy lands.
He speaks no morethe shaft is gone,
A plume is lost, a chief is down.
The rose the cry of rage below,
And up the dizzy height,
Burning for vengeance came the foe,
With meditated blast and blow,
Though late all faint with fight.
With folded arms the warrior stands,
And gazes on the coming bands!
And will he tamely fall or fly,
Survivorlast of all his race?
Recreant, who does not dare to die,
When country, honour, liberty,
All bleed before his face
Within his grasp, the foremost foe
Goes with him o'er the mountain's brow.
And still by old Salutah's wave,
The boor, with certain hand,
Will point the Indian warrior's grave,
And still from old tradition save
That story of his land
The fearful fight still known to fame,
And how adown the steeps they came.
THE OPPORTUNITY.
Upon this hint I spake.
Shakspeare
.
I have never been apt at taking the tide of fortune,
when auspiciously setting in the true direction.
Somehow
,
I invariably linger until it is turned or turning, and
then my course is an up current oneall
riffles, snags
,
and
sawyers
, like that of a Mississippi steamboat. In
large and little concerns alike, it is my fate never to
avail myself of opportunities. I can see them well
enough when they have gone bynever before.
Looking
back, they are so many mocking commentaries
upon my dilly-dallying disposition, that I cannot
complain
or repine. They seem to do all that for me,
and, in this respect, at least, I am indebted to them.
My friends, and enemies, I may add, all know of this
failing in my mental make; and with one accord have
denominated me, Topic the Unready. The stage
and steamboat leave me, the show is gone, before I
look to itand all things in nature, animate and
inanimate
alike, seem familiar with my deficiencies, and
perpetually take advantage of them.
One of my misfortunes, arising from this unconscious
unreadiness, I take more seriously to heart than any
other. I loved, and have reason to believe was in a
fair way to make a favourable impression. I danced
perpetual attendance at the house of the fair one
escorted her here, and followed her therewrote song
and sonnet in her favoursighed my love to every
zephyr that travelled in the direction of the beauty's
abodedid every thing in short, that a lover should
doexcept perhaps the simple but most necessary
duty of allI never popped the question. I had
however
determined upon this measure, and had prepared
myself accordingly.
The evening came, and I took my place by the
centre table in the parlour of Miss Emily's parents.
There was something of company present. There
was a poet and a painter, and several other persons
given to such trifling pursuits. I was, to speak with
due modesty, the only philosopher in the room; and
I was something more than surprised to find my fair
devoting more of her time to my neighbours, than, it
struck me, was altogether consistent with good sense
and a proper understanding. Above all, I was vexed
to find her so attentive to my how-d'ye-do
acquaintance
,
Bill Walton, whom, in order that he should
judge of the merits of my chosen, I had myself
introduced
to her acquaintance. But this attention to him,
upon second thought, I set down to her regard for me.
Some fine engravings from Helvetian scenery lay
upon the table before us, to which Walton had called
her attention.
We have no such achievements from the hands of
our artists, Miss Emily, said heindeed we have
not the material, we want the scenery itself. Such
wonderous indications of her power, nature does not
exhibit to our eyes in this country.
None, none, she replied, with something of a
tone of disappointment and regret, coupled at the same
time with an air of unconscious rapidity, which,
however
,
seemed to depart, as Walton, in a whisper,
appeared
to conclude his remark.
Mr. Cambridge, a member of congress, a gentleman
of some pretension and appearance, interfered:
We are not deficient, however, in the objects of
moral contemplation,he said with an air of the
schoolsthough we may lack, he continued, some
few of the physical wonders which are here delineated.
Has not `Liberty' made an effort, and are not her
exhibitions
in America, upon a scale as magnificent as
these rude rocks, and snows, and `shelvings down?'
Her achievements in our land, which, by the way, I
must take occasion to say, is just as well supplied with
stupendous and striking scenery, as any other, have
thrown into a just obscurity the mere physical and
animal wonders of the world. Our moral and
political
stature
Here I interposed. I saw what was coming, and
could not forbear exclaiming, while falling, unhappily
for myself, into the very error of habit, I was seeking
to reproveNay, my good sir, let us have no more
of this same
ad captandum
about what we are, and
what we may be. That would do very well for a
Tammany Hall meeting, and would admirably suit and
split the ears of the groundlings, but cannot very
greatly enlighten or amuse the intellect of a
fashionable
young lady. What does Miss Emily care whether
`Liberty' prefers ours to all other countries or not?
The thing affects her neither one way nor another.
Besides, freedom is a word not known in their
vocabulary
.
Ladies have nothing to do with liberty. Their
business is conquest and captives. Talk to them of
bonds rather, of dungeons in the arms of love: of
chains, though they be made of flowers; and servitude,
though it be in the gardens of beauty, and in the
cultivation
of those plants which are the favourite of that
worst of tyrants, love! Tell them of bands of roses, and
shackles of jessamines and honeysuckle, and prisons of
moonlighted and leaf-covered bowers: any thing but
liberty. We have no liberty. Neither you nor I, nor any
of our sex. We are slaves to some despotism or other;
and obtain our emancipation from one, only to run
headlong
and blind into another. If we are not slaves of
women
,
we are of men, and
vice versa
. We have no liberty.
We are as much in bondage as any people under the
sun. In fact, there can be no freedom for the great
mass. They were never intended to be free. Take
from them that restraint, which, if it be not chains
actually
,
is nevertheless so in effect, and they are the
veriest brutes and savages that walk. There are some
men born expressly to be slavesliberty would be
poison and death to them, as poison in some cases
that of Mithridates of Pontus for instanceis
healthful
and nutritious.
Dear me, Mr. Topic, how long you can talk on so
tedious a subject. I'm sure I have not heard a single
syllable of all you have been saying, except one pretty
sentence about jessamines and honeysuckles. Your
speech has been like a wide wilderness, into which,
being a lover of sterile solitude, you have, with a
niggardly
hand, admitted but a few flowers, and those less
for the sake of relief than for their own beauty and
odour. So spake a lively little girl whom I had not
before remarked, so earnestly had I been engaged in
my observations. And you, miss, I replied, have
been the industrious bee to ferret and find out those
few flowers, without regarding the whole wilderness
you speak of beside. Yet is that wilderness, though it
forms so trifling an object of our contemplation, spread
out in all its variety and loveliness, as, at any time in
our country, we may behold it, as abundantly stored
with the
materiel
of the sublime, as this bungling and
confused succession of clouds and mountains, which,
for the last ten minutes, you have all been so gravely
admiring.
Oh, how can you think so?exclaimed the lady.
I'm sure these are so
pretty
.
What an epithet for a scene like this! whispered
the painter, almost audibly in my ear. The young
girl, whose admiration, like that of many fashionable
people where the arts are concerned, was artificial,
seemed herself conscious of her
faux pas
and the
malapropos phrase of which she had been guilty, and
the blush that suffused her cheek, was a sufficient
atonement for the offence. She sidled to an opposite
corner of the room, and I proceeded in my address to
the fair Emily, but to my surprise, discovered, for the
first time, that she was not in hearing, but at the
opposite
end of the room, in company and close
conversation
with Walton. To be caught and to catch myself
in a soliloquy, as had been the case, so far as she
was concernedwas horrible, and I hastily advanced
to apologise, when suddenly retreating, she left the
room. Confusion worse confounded! I turned for
28
explanation to Walton, who soon satisfied all my
enquiries
by the following reply.
A thousand thanks, my dear fellow. You have
done me a most gracious service. I can well
understand
and shall duly appreciate your friendship, in
occupying
the ears of the company with that smart speech,
and thus giving me a chance for which you must know
I have been labouring so vainly and so long. In fine,
while you spoke, I spoke. I popped the question, my
dear fellow, to my sweet Emily, and all's well. She
consents to make me happy, and I have nothing more
to say, and indeed can say nothing, but bid you to my
wedding, which is to take place on the evening of the
ensuing Monday, at eight o'clock; and return you many
sincere thanks for the present, long desired, and well
employed, opportunity.
DREAMS AND DREAMING.
Oh! then I see Queen Mab hath been with you
She is the Fancy's midwife, &c.
To a mere man of the world, dreams may be
considered
rather troublesome matters. His speculations,
if a merchant, sometimes depend upon them, but
fortunately
,
to no very great extent. If betrayed into error
by them once, it is rarely the case that he does not get
wiser thereonthe warning, serving well, as all
matters
of experience, to keep him out of farther
experiments
of a similar description: and, taking the
experience
which he gets by them into consideration, they
may be said to have been rather beneficial to him than
otherwise. Not so with the man who lives upon
dreamswhose life is made up to themwhom they
put to sleep in the dayparticularly at lunch or
mealtime
and
whom they assist to waken up at night, for
the purpose of building castles which afford no shelter.
Such are your poor-devil poetsthe scurvy tribe. To
one of these, they prove an active principle of
misgovernment
.
They are agencies, passive it may be,
but controlling, directing, and exercising, all of those,
on which he depends for his very existence. I know
some men who live upon dreams, not as a matter of
choice, but of necessity, in a double sense. I don't
know but I may be one of that description myself. I
certainly dream myself, sometimes, out of an appetite,
and,
vice versa;
particularly when my chop-house bears
upon its tesselated but repelling front, the talismanic
and awful characters, no credit, done in the most
legible, and not to be mistaken, Roman charactersa
not unfrequent event, and, for the remedy of which, my
experience in the fine artsalthough, of late, a
professcur
in the school of Jeremy Diddlerhas, as yet,
found nothing. Dreams, on occasions such as these,
may be held rather pleasant than otherwise. They, at
least, with a due sense of retributive justice, contribute
somewhat to silence the appetite they have helped to
provoke. With their aid, I can then calculate, to a
nicety, the relative distance between a doubt and a
negative
the
value of a possibility, and the number of
these necessary to the formation of a single probability.
Hunger and thirst, have you ever remarked, beget an
admirable metaphysical propensity; and dreams are
not apt to lessen, to any great extent, the organ of
speculation. This idea, by the way, is not original.
There is a Spanish proverb, from Andalusia, which
says,
When the cook's out o' the way,
The preacher comes in play!
or something equivalentI cannot lay my hands on the
original. It is curious, however, to observe, that a
supper and no supper, in ninety-nine cases out of the
hundred, are productive of the same effect. The
omission
and commission both bring night-mare. We sleep
indeed, but,
In that sleep, what dreams
do
come!
ay, what dreams do come! You have taken a surfeit,
have you? and in spite of the hourly and daily
exhortations
of the Journal of Health against the practice, you
have eaten heartily, cormorant-like, of a heavy supper,
and gone immediately to bed. Perhaps you have not
taken this trouble. We will couple your supposed case
with one of our own, which, unfortunately for our
comfort
at the time, was any thing but supposed. You
have passed the night, in imagination at least. The
sun looks red and bloody as he rises. A cursed weight
appears resting on the hinder part of your skull, while
a Parthian soldiery employs itself in hurling heated
darts over and throughout the regions of the temples
and the brain. These are your actual bodily
undergoings
.
The dreamsthose evils which are mental
are worst of all. If you are an imaginative manI do
not mean a scribbler of versenothing is more
common
,
than to feel yourself held, by your thinnest and
most gossamery hair, over the brink and threshold of
some infernal precipice, so deep and capacious, that
you may be occupied in falling, a thousand or two
years, before you can, by any possibility, arrive at the
bottom. Some giantsome Passamonte or Morgante,
who,
Plucks up pines, beeches, poplar-trees and oaks,
And flings them
holds and maintains you, by the aforesaid hair; while,
with a degree of indulgence, for which you express but
little gratitude, your eyes, to your infinite satisfaction,
are permitted to go before your person and explore the
horrible recesses and depths of the deep beneath you.
28*
There you behold, in most incongruous confusion,
adders
with green heads and forked tongues; basilisks,
vipers, all sorts of slimy reptiles and monsters, and of
wild beasts, an infinite variety; meant to afford you,
possibly, a free choice in the manner of your death.
You feel yourself tottering and trembling. Though in
other respects, and at any other time, a lean man, you
have now learned to dread your own weight and
substance
;
and are led to entertain a wish, that you had
not, during the days of the past year, been so heartily a
consumer of the various excellent marketabilities of
your good landlady's good table. At this time, you
perceive that the gruff and insolent monster, who, with
the fiendish grin of an ogre, holds you in this
predicament
,
is exulting over your approaching fate, and
playing
,
like a cat, with your mouse-like terrors, before you
are made to feel the final pang, and consummate the
dreadful catastrophe. When you are sufficiently
familiar
with the anticipation of the thing, you behold him
leisurely taking a huge carving-knife from his breeches
pocket; always, providing he be no
sans culotte
no
highlander. You watch him with an eye, that
calculates
to a miracle, the time he occupies in the
application
of the wire-edge to that gossamery thing of hair,
which your heart, all the time, wishes were a chain
cable
of ten-pound links. He cutsyou feel yourself
going, going, gone. You experience a terrible and an
uncomfortable shock. There are strange, uncouth,
and fearful ringings in your earsa hideous noise and
clamor around, and about, and within youa weight,
as of ten thousand ton of rock upon your breast, and a
corkscrew of heated iron, seething and crunching in
your head. Your first thought is, that after sending
you down so hastily, your vindictive and merciless
tyrant has hurled the entire mass of rock down after
and upon you; a conjecture which tends not very
extravagantly
towards increasing your comfort or quiet.
You attempt to scream in your agony, but the effort
dissipates in a weak and husky murmur, the sound of
which dies in your throat, incapable of forcing its way
through the aperture of your mouth. In vain would
you move or stiryour limbs fall relaxed from the
effort, as if under the spell of an enchanter. But while
you are yet undetermined as to the precise occasion of
your present discontent or discomposure, the sounds
that stunned your ears, and shattered and distracted
your nerves and understanding, suddenly ceased; the
mountain rolls from your chest, and, although the pain
does not exacly depart from your head, you feel, to a
certain degree, relieved in that quarter.
But, where are you? That is the question. You look
around, and the first thing you perceive(always
supposing
your dreams have arisen from repletion, and a
hearty supper) and the first natural object your eyes
may be expected to rest upon, is your own proper
person, of course. You are on the floor stretched off
at length, rather quietly and composedly than
otherwise
,
all circumstances considered. The next thing
you perceive, for your eyes fail to take in all these
things at once, is the large family dining-table at your
side, some of the legs of which are civilly resting upon
your own. By an ugly abrasion of your right nostril,
from which the blood still continues freely to flow,
and which you readily recognise and claim as your
own, you perceive that the shin bone of the ham that
rests passively before you, has, upon no very remote
occasion, been cruelly familiar. A large plate, from
which you remember to have eaten an hour or two
agone, has quartered itself in epigrammatic angles
upon the retouched lines of your facea decanter and
sundry glasses, a further survey has made out to
number
among the slain; some utterly and irretrievably
demolishedground to powder. Over all of these, as
your senses begin to comprehend the various details,
ad libitum
, you behold the lean and withered form of
your weather-beaten landlady, who is blind and deaf,
entering the room with a dim lantern in one hand,
and a broom stick in the other, adding to your
enjoyments
by a well sustained application of the latter
domesticality
to your back, head, sides, front, and so
forth, accompanying the physical
development
with a
rapid and running commentary of sis cat, sis cat,
sis cat, in a family tone, to which, from repeatedly
having heard, not one of the whole feline tribe for a
mile round, but would have treated with due and
unequivocal
respect. In vain do you cry out, Mrs.
Jones, it is I; Mr.  (whatever the name may be)
and not the cat. Permit me to assure you, Mrs. Jones,
it is not the cat. I am your lodger, my dear madam
you are beating your lodger and not the cat. The
good old lady has a most religious respect for her
organs
of sight and sense of hearing, however deficient,
in reality, they may be; and continues to belabour
away most unmercifully, until, by a violent and
extraordinary
effort, you at once shake off nightmare, table,
and landlady, and bruised, battered, and broom-sticked,
you retreat to the quiet of your chamber, inwardly
blaming
your stars and cursing yourself that you were not
there a full hour before. Such, in some sort at least,
is the usual fortune of him who suffers from repletion.
But, then comes the opposite extreme. The absence
of enough, even worse than the presence of too much,
begets its own degree of miserable acuteness. A
hungry man, says Butler, is very like unto a
famished
wolf. He is right; the creature is a beast
and a wild one. Incapable, half the time, of
determining
how long the domestic territory may remain
unoccupied
;
an intelligent and cruelly speculative
imagination
comes in to co-operate with the vulture, the
gnawings of which render you gaunt and spiritless, yet
furious and savage. But there is quite too much
reality
,
too much nature in the matter, to need or
receive
,
for the purposes of comment, much aggravation
from one's dreams. It is too certain and too homely
a truth. It will not require to be computed by the
rule of three. It is a horrible state of vacuity, and
we'll have no more of it.
Nothing, after all, is so dreadful in dreaming, as the
breaking off from sudden fright, or awakening in the
very middle of your mystery. Devil take the fractions,
and a fig for the figment, say I, with the Spanish barber
of Seville. In the very midst of good fortune, to open
your unfortunate eyes to lose that, which, with eyes
shut, your active senses have been able to discern and
compass. This is an enlightenment with a vengeance!
The sun becomes any thing but metaphorically dark;
and your only remedy and hope for the renewal of your
luck, lies in your being able again to lose your sightthat
is to say, to fall asleep as speedily as may be possible.
We can well imagineimagine, did we say? egad, we
know, to our sorrow, the excessive labour of an effort to
re-dream ourselves into fortune. Have we not beheld
the buried and hidden treasures of the pre-adamites;
and with the assistance of Aladdin's lamp, looked over
into those glowing heaps of glittering and resplendent
gems, the possession of which, could they be
appreciated
without, might almost compensate the most curious
for every visual darkness? Frequently has it been our
lot, after toiling through the day, and at midnight,
sinking
to our couch and chamber exhausted and prostrate,
to enjoy towards morning some blessed dream of fairy
landwhile thousands of the tiny creatures, all in
green, were busily employed in amassing its golden
treasures, incomputable piles of which were at once
within our grasp; wealth without limit or compass lay
before us, luring us into that seductive but momentary
feeling of happiness, which departed with the glittering
but delusive fancy that produced it. How sweet not
to have sleptnot to have awakened. How many
dreams of another kind are there from which it had
been a pleasure, almost beyond the faculty of the
choicest vision to afford, never to have awakened.
But a truce to our dreams. Queen Mab has been
with us, and is with us no longer. All the fairy tribe,
from the goblin of indigestion, the Gobbleton
Mowbray
of imagination, down to the shadowy pigmy of
famine and non-consumption, have departed, and it
boots us not to speculate upon the absent. Our
daydreams
a
species similarly troublesome, have their
agencies likewise; but of them we say nothing. They
have a more earthly, dollar and cent, and far less
spiritual
likeness. They are
evokable
in the shapes of
bread, beef, beer, and other condiments. Of these we
shall speak hereafter. We shall meet at Philippi!
When Jim Taylor was carried to jail by the deputy,
on some cruel suspicions which went greatly to affect
his credit, he barely and briefly soliloquised, I guessed
how it would be, from what I seed last night. Jim
had been troubled with dreams, and the insolvent
debtor's act gave him an opportunity of rendering to
his creditors a schedule of them. By this he had more
than enough for the payment of all his debts. He had
dreamed, like other specious gentlemen, but when his
tailor refused to credit, Jim's dreams proved
unavailable
.
A voyage of discovery, fitted out under his
assignment
,
failed to discover the land of Nod, in which
his property lay. In
terra firma
he was equally
unfortunate
,
and like his part biographer, he became a
notorious chronicler of the unsubstantials; wrote for
the lady public, as we do; but, unlike ourself, and
here all comparison ends, through the liberality of
reader and publisher, was soon put beyond all farther
necessity to dream.
THE END.